The Canadian C-spine rule performs better than unstructured physician judgment.We compare the predictive accuracy of emergency physicians' unstructured clinical judgment to the Canadian C-Spine rule.This prospective multicenter cohort study was conducted at 10 Canadian urban academic emergency departments. Included in the study were alert, stable, adult patients with a Glasgow Coma Scale score of 15 and trauma to the head or neck. This was a substudy of the Canadian C-Spine and CT Head Study. Eligible patients were prospectively evaluated before radiography. Physicians estimated the probability of unstable cervical spine injury from 0% to 100% according to clinical judgment alone and filled out a data form. Interobserver assessments were done when feasible. Patients underwent cervical spine radiography or follow-up to determine clinically important cervical spine injuries. Analyses included comparison of areas under the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve with 95% confidence intervals (CIs) and the kappa coefficient.During 18 months, 6265 patients were enrolled. The mean age was 36.6 years (range 16 to 97 years), and 50.1% were men. Sixty-four (1%) patients had a clinically important injury. The physicians' kappa for a 0% predicted probability of injury was 0.46 (95% CI 0.28 to 0.65). The respective areas under the ROC curve for predicting cervical spine injury were 0.85 (95% CI 0.80 to 0.89) for physician judgment and 0.91 (95% CI 0.89 to 0.92) for the Canadian C-Spine rule (P <.05). With a threshold of 0% predicted probability of injury, the respective indices of accuracy for physicians and the Canadian C-Spine rule were sensitivity 92.2% versus 100% (P <.001) and specificity 53.9% versus 44.0% (P <.001).Interobserver agreement of unstructured clinical judgment for predicting clinically important cervical spine injury is only fair, and the sensitivity is unacceptably low. The Canadian C-Spine rule was better at detecting clinically important injuries with a sensitivity of 100%. Prospective validation has recently been completed and should permit widespread use of the Canadian C-Spine rule.Radiographic clearance of blunt cervical spine injury: plain radiograph or computed tomography scan?The purpose of this study was to evaluate the roles of cervical spine radiographs (CSR) and computed tomography of the cervical spine (CTC) in the exclusion of cervical spine injury for adult blunt trauma patients.At the authors' institution, all adult blunt trauma patients with physical findings of posterior midline neck tenderness, altered mental status, or neurologic deficit are considered at risk of cervical spine injury and undergo both CSR and CTC for evaluation of the cervical spine. The TRACS database at level 1 of the trauma center at this institution was queried for all blunt trauma patients from November 2000 to October 2001. Patient injury severity score (ISS), Glascow Coma Score (GCS), age, gender, CSR results, CTC results, and treatment data were analyzed.The review included 3,018 blunt trauma patients with appropriate data. For 1,199 of these patients (779 men and 420 women) (40%) at risk for cervical spine injury, both CSR and CTC were performed for cervical spine evaluation. The average age of these patients was 39.4 years (range, 18-89 years). The average GCS was 13 and the average ISS was 8.4 in this study population. In 116 (9.5%) of these patients, a cervical spine injury (fracture or subluxation) was detected. The injury was identified on both CSR and CTC in 75 of these patients. In the remaining 41 patients (3.2%), the CSR results were negative, but injury was detected by CTC. All these injuries missed by CSR required treatment. For this group with false-negative CSR, the average GCS was 12 and the average ISS was 14.6. There were no missed cervical spine injuries among the patients with negative CTC results.No identifiable factors predicted false-negative CSR. There does not appear to be any role for CSR screening in this setting. The data from this study add to the growing body of evidence that CTC should replace CSR for the evaluation of the cervical spine in blunt trauma.Cervical spine clearance after trauma in children.Currently, no diagnostic or procedural standards exist for clearing the cervical spine in children after trauma. The establishment of protocols has been shown to reduce the time required to accomplish clearance and reduce the number of missed injuries. The purpose of this study was to determine if reeducation and initiation of a new protocol based on the National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study criteria could safely increase the number of pediatric cervical spines cleared by nonneurosurgical personnel.The authors collected and reviewed data regarding cervical spine clearance in children (age range 0-18 years) who presented to the emergency department at Primary Children's Medical Center in Salt Lake City, Utah, between 2001 and 2006 after sustaining significant trauma. Radiographic and clinical methods of clearing the cervical spine, as well as the type and management of injuries, were determined for two periods: Period I (January 2001-December 2003) and Period II (January 2004-February 2006). Between 2001 and 2003, 95% of 936 cervical spines were cleared by the neurosurgical service. Twenty-one ligamentous injuries (2.2%) and 12 fracture/dislocations (1.3%) were detected, and five patients (0.5%) required operative stabilization. Since January 2004, 585 (62.4%) of 937 cervical spines have been cleared by nonneurosurgical personnel. Twelve ligamentous injuries (1.3%) and 14 fracture/dislocations (1.5%) were identified, and four patients (0.4%) required operative stabilization. No late injuries were detected in either time period.The protocol outlined in the paper has been effective in detecting cervical spine injuries in children after trauma and has increased the number of cervical spines cleared by nonneurosurgical personnel by nearly 60%. Reeducation with the establishment of protocols can safely facilitate clearance of the cervical spine after trauma by nonneurosurgical personnel.Low-risk criteria for cervical-spine radiography in blunt trauma: a prospective study.Cervical-spine radiography does not need to be performed on selected blunt trauma patients who are awake, alert, nonintoxicated, do not complain of midline neck pain, and have no tenderness over the bony cervical spine.One thousand consecutive patients seen in the UCLA Emergency Medicine Center with a chief complaint of blunt trauma, for whom cervical-spine films were ordered and for whom prospective data questionnaires were completed.Clinicians completed data forms for each patient before radiograph results were known. Data items included mechanism of injury, evidence of intoxication, presence of cervical-spine pain and/or tenderness, level of alertness, presence of focal neurologic deficits, and presence of other severely painful injuries unrelated to the cervical spine. Physicians were also asked to estimate likelihood of significant cervical-spine injury.Twenty-seven patients with cervical-spine fracture were among the 974 patients for whom data forms were completed. A number of findings were statistically more common in the group of patients with fracture than without, but no single or paired findings identified all patients with fracture. All 27 patients with fracture had at least one of the following four characteristics: midline neck tenderness, evidence of intoxication, altered level of alertness, or a severely painful injury elsewhere. Three hundred fifty-three of 947 (37.3%) patients without cervical-spine fracture had none of these findings.Cervical-spine radiology may not be necessary in patients without spinous tenderness in the neck, intoxication, altered level of alertness, or other severely painful injury. A policy to limit films in such patients would have decreased film ordering by more than one third in this series, while identifying all patients with fracture.Can an out-of-hospital cervical spine clearance protocol identify all patients with injuries? An argument for selective immobilization.We sought to determine the sensitivity of the Fresno/Kings/Madera emergency medical services (EMS) selective spine immobilization protocol in identifying patients with potential cervical injuries. We also sought to determine whether the protocol was safe in the out-of-hospital setting.We conducted a retrospective chart review of all patients discharged from 5 trauma-receiving hospitals in Fresno County with the diagnosis of cervical spine injury between July 1, 1990, and June 30, 1996. All of these patients transported to the hospital by EMS personnel were selected for the study group. Medical records of those patients not immobilized were further investigated to identify protocol violations or deficiencies.There were 861 patients with significant cervical injuries during this time span. EMS personnel brought 504 patients to the hospital, of which 495 arrived in cervical spine immobilization. Of the remaining 9 patients, 2 refused immobilization, and 2 could not be immobilized; 3 injuries were missed by the protocol criteria, and 2 injuries were missed because of protocol violations. Of these last 5 patients, 1 patient had an adverse outcome, 2 injuries were considered unstable, 4 patients were older than 67 years, and one patient was 9 months old.The Fresno/Kings/Madera EMS selective spine immobilization protocol is 99% (95% CI, 97.7% to 99.7%) sensitive in identifying patients with cervical injuries for immobilization. Those patients not identified were at extremes of age. These results suggest that selective immobilization may be safely applied in the out-of-hospital setting but should be used with caution at extremes of age.Factors associated with the use of cervical spine computed tomography imaging in pediatric trauma patients.The objectives were to identify patient and hospital characteristics associated with the use of computed tomography (CT) imaging of the cervical spine (c-spine) in the evaluation of injured children and, in particular, to examine the influence of hospital setting.This was a retrospective cohort of children younger than 19 years of age from the Massachusetts Hospital Emergency Department (ED) database who were discharged from the ED with an injury diagnosis from 2005 through 2009. Multivariable logistic regression was used to analyze characteristics associated with CT imaging of the c-spine.Of the 929,626 pediatric patients diagnosed with an injury in Massachusetts EDs and then discharged home, 1.3% underwent CT imaging of the c-spine. Rates of CT imaging nearly doubled over the 5 years. In the multivariable model, patient age (adjusted odds ratio [AOR] = 2.3, 95% confidence interval [CI] = 2.0 to 2.7 for children age 12 to 18 years vs. under 1 year of age) and evaluation outside of a pediatric Level I trauma center (AOR = 2.2, 95% CI = 1.1 to 4.3 for children evaluated at non Level I trauma centers vs. pediatric Level I trauma centers; AOR = 2.1, 95% CI = 0.93 to 4.7 for children evaluated at adult Level I trauma centers vs. pediatric Level I trauma centers) were associated with higher rates of CT imaging of the c-spine.Cervical spine CT imaging for children discharged from the ED with trauma diagnoses increased from 2005 through 2009. Older age and evaluation outside a Level I pediatric trauma center were associated with a higher c-spine CT rate. Educational interventions focused outside pediatric trauma centers may be an effective approach to decreasing CT imaging of the c-spine of pediatric trauma patients.The usefulness of a modified adult protocol for the clearance of paediatric cervical spine injury in the emergency department.To determine if the use of a modified adult protocol that uses cervical spine imaging on presentation for the assessment of cervical spine injury in children improves clinical outcome.This is a case series study on all consecutive trauma patients presenting from April to July 2000 inclusive to the ED of a major paediatric trauma hospital. Children presenting to the ED with potential cervical spine injury (CSI) were identified using standard selection criteria. Patient demographics, mechanism of injury, method and time of presentation, associated injuries, radiological investigation and clinical outcome were recorded. The major outcome measures for this study were: time to clearance of the cervical spine, length of stay in the ED and admission to an in-hospital bed. Data were analysed for compliance to the protocol, this being the standard assessment pathway of cervical spine clearance used by our trauma service.The trauma registry identified 1721 trauma presentations during the 4-month study period; 208 presentations representing 200 children with potential CSI were entered into the study. Males represented 72.5% of the study population, having a mean age of 8.32 years, although 29% were less than 5 years of age. The majority of presentations (69%) occurred outside of normal working hours. In 17.8% of cases the cervical spine was cleared based on clinical assessment alone, half less than 5 years of age. Compliance to the protocol occurred in 78% of presentations. However, when examined by age group, children 5 years of age or above were 1.5 times more likely to comply with the protocol as compared with younger children. Adequate plain imaging was not obtained in 18% of presentations, this group almost exclusively less than 5 years of age. There were no missed injuries and no short or long-term neurological sequelae reported during this study. There were no differences in time to clearance, length of stay and admission rate between compliant and non-compliant groups.Modified adult protocols for cervical spine clearance offer guidance in managing the majority of children suffering blunt trauma. However, we recommend caution in rigidly applying such protocols, especially to children of young age.Clinical indications for cervical spine radiographs in alert trauma patients.Cervical spine fracture/dislocation is a potentially devastating injury that may be clinically difficult to diagnose. Therefore, a vast majority of trauma patients undergo cervical spine X rays when only a relatively small number of them will actually have a cervical spine injury. Because of the costly overuse of radiography, studies have been undertaken to define high yield criteria for evaluation of patients. This study examined the characteristics of acute cervical spine fracture/dislocation in alert trauma patients. Of 79 patients with this discharge diagnosis at St. Elizabeth Hospital Medical Center between 1982 and 1987, 47 met the criteria of Class I level of consciousness. All 47 patients complained of neck pain or demonstrated cervical tenderness to palpation. Other parameters (such as loss of consciousness, paresthesias, decreased sensation, weakness, cervical muscle spasm, decreased anal tone, and associated injuries) did not, individually or in combination with each other, consistently predict cervical spine injury. Although occult or painless cervical spine injuries have been reported in the literature, a careful review of these cases revealed that these injuries were not truly asymptomatic. Our study suggests that selected patients can be excluded from radiologic evaluation of the cervical spine. However, large prospective studies are needed to validate this finding.Cervical spine clearance in the nonalert, noncommunicative, or unreliable pediatric blunt trauma patient.Currently, there is no nationally recognized evidence-based guideline or protocol for cervical spine clearance in nonalert, noncommunicative, or unreliable pediatric blunt trauma patients. This descriptive survey study sought to identify current practices and elicit expert opinion data regarding pediatric cervical spine clearance in a specialized population of children in trauma centers in the United States. A 93-item electronic Pediatric Cervical Spine Clearance Survey was sent to 309 members of the Pediatric Special Interest Group of the National Society of Trauma Nurses. The main areas of interest in the survey included trauma verification, annual volume of pediatric trauma cases, and sequence and time frames of diagnostic testing for cervical spine clearance by age group. Additional areas of interest were perceived supports and barriers to meeting target time frames for diagnostic testing and outcomes to evaluate the impact of a cervical spine clearance guideline for pediatric blunt trauma. The results from 44 respondents demonstrate that trauma centers are using a variety of diagnostic testing sequences and time frames when clearing children for suspected cervical spine injury.Evaluation of the acute cervical spine: a management algorithm.Safe, efficient, and cost-effective evaluation of the spine is the goal in the trauma setting. At our Level I trauma facility, the trauma service, emergency medicine, radiology, anesthesia, and the spine service combined individual concerns into one agreed-upon clearance protocol. Here, we present the effectiveness of a new cervical spine clearance protocol.A retrospective review was initiated of all trauma patients evaluated in a Level I trauma center the year before and after implementation of a new cervical spine protocol to determine the incidence of missed cervical injuries. An additional 6 months were reviewed to detect any missed injuries late in the study period.During the 2-year study period, 4,460 patients presented to the emergency room with some form of cervical spine precautions. Blunt trauma comprised 90% of the study population. According to the protocol, approximately 45% required further cervical radiographs after presentation. In the preprotocol year, 77 of 2,217 (3.4%) patients were diagnosed with cervical spine injuries, 16 of 77 (21%) with multiple level of injuries, and 25 of 77 (32%) with neurologic compromise. Three of 2,217 patients had missed cervical spine injuries on their initial evaluations. In the postprotocol year, 84 of 2,243 (3.4%) patients had cervical injuries, 25 of 84 (30%) with multiple levels of injuries and 28 of 84 (28%) with neurologic compromise. No patient evaluated during the protocol year was missed. All statistics between the two groups were not significant.The current protocol by risk stratifying patients on presentation is effective in assessing patients for cervical spine injuries.Clinical clearance of the cervical spine in blunt trauma patients younger than 3 years: a multi-center study of the american association for the surgery of trauma.Cervical spine clearance in the very young child is challenging. Radiographic imaging to diagnose cervical spine injuries (CSI) even in the absence of clinical findings is common, raising concerns about radiation exposure and imaging-related complications. We examined whether simple clinical criteria can be used to safely rule out CSI in patients younger than 3 years.The trauma registries from 22 level I or II trauma centers were reviewed for the 10-year period (January 1995 to January 2005). Blunt trauma patients younger than 3 years were identified. The measured outcome was CSI. Independent predictors of CSI were identified by univariate and multivariate analysis. A weighted score was calculated by assigning 1, 2, or 3 points to each independent predictor according to its magnitude of effect. The score was established on two thirds of the population and validated using the remaining one third.Of 12,537 patients younger than 3 years, CSI was identified in 83 patients (0.66%), eight had spinal cord injury. Four independent predictors of CSI were identified: Glasgow Coma Score <14, GCSEYE = 1, motor vehicle crash, and age 2 years or older. A score of <2 had a negative predictive value of 99.93% in ruling out CSI. A total of 8,707 patients (69.5% of all patients) had a score of <2 and were eligible for cervical spine clearance without imaging. There were no missed CSI in this study.CSI in patients younger than 3 years is uncommon. Four simple clinical predictors can be used in conjunction to the physical examination to substantially reduce the use of radiographic imaging in this patient population.Evaluation of the use of plain cervical spine radiography in patients with head injury.The records of 457 head trauma patients who underwent plain cervical spine radiography following head injury between January 1991 and December 1991 inclusive were reviewed. Seventy-six patients (17%) all above ten years of age had abnormalities; forty five were clinically suspected to have cervical spine injury because of cervical tenderness and/or neurological deficits and in the remaining thirty-one patients the cervical spine injuries were detected first on plain radiograph. The 31 vertebral injuries consisted off fracture-dislocations 12 fractures, 4 dislocations and one odontoid fracture. None of the 235 patients below the age of 10 years had cervical vertebral or cord injury. It is recommended that plain cervical spine radiography be performed on all patients with head injury associated with altered level of consciousness and who are above ten years of age.Removing the pediatric cervical collar: current practice patterns.To identify the current practice patterns of emergency medicine practitioners and the typical criteria used in discontinuing cervical spine immobilization (CSI) in the pediatric patient.Mail-in survey.All physicians on the mailing list of the American Academy of Pediatrics Section of Emergency Medicine and an equal number of randomly chosen members of the American College of Emergency Physicians. The total number of participants was 1360.The survey consisted of a case scenario describing a 3-year-old child brought to the emergency department with CSI. The approach to such a scenario was assessed. Surveys were mailed with self-addressed stamped envelopes; repeat mailings were sent at 4 and 8 weeks after the first mailing. Those not currently in active practice or not involved in the decision to discontinue CSI were excluded from the study.The response rate was 55%. Most respondents were younger than 44 years (71%), in practice less than 10 years (56%), and practiced in an urban setting (68%). Nearly two thirds (62.6%) had completed residency training in pediatrics, 24% in emergency medicine and 36% a pediatric emergency medicine fellowship. Most (63%) would discontinue CSI without obtaining radiographs. Factors associated with removal were residency training in pediatrics and being in practice for less than 10 years. The most common criteria for discontinuing CSI were normal neurological (96%) and cervical spine (98%) examinations, normal mental status (92%), and absence of neck pain (93%).Discontinuing CSI without obtaining radiographs is common, especially among those with residency training in pediatrics and those in practice for less than 10 years. Knowledge of current practice is essential to future development of guidelines for managing pediatric trauma patients for whom cervical spine injury is a consideration.Prehospital clinical clearance of the cervical spine: a prospective study.Physician clinical clearance of the cervical spine after blunt trauma is practiced in many trauma centers. Prehospital clinical clearance of the cervical spine (c-spine) performed by emergency medical services (EMS) personnel can decrease cost, improve patient comfort, decrease complications, and decrease prehospital time. The purpose of this study was to assess whether EMS personnel can effectively clinically clear the c-spine of injury in the prehospital setting. All paramedics from a single urban fire department were trained in clinical clearance of the c-spine. During the 14-month period from January 2008 through March 2009, clinical examination of the c-spine was performed by paramedics on blunt trauma patients in the prehospital setting. Paramedics immobilized the c-spine and delivered the patients to the University of South Alabama Medical Center. After trauma center arrival, paramedics documented their clinical examination of the c-spine in a computerized data collection form. Paramedic clinical findings were compared with trauma surgeon clinical examination findings and computed tomographic findings of the c-spine. All patients had prehospital Glasgow Coma Score 14 or greater. Patients were not excluded for distracting injuries. One hundred ninety-three blunt trauma patients were entered. Sixty-five (34%) c-spines were clinically cleared by EMS. There were no known missed injuries in this patient group. Eight (6%) patients who were not clinically cleared by EMS were diagnosed with c-spine injury. Trauma surgeons clinically cleared 135 (70%) of the patients with no known missed injury. EMS personnel in the prehospital setting may reliably and effectively perform clinical clearance of the c-spine. Further prospective study for prehospital c-spine clinical clearance is warranted. Cervical spine injury: a clinical decision rule to identify high-risk patients for helical CT screening.We aimed to validate the routine use of a clinical decision rule to direct diagnostic imaging of adult blunt trauma patients at high risk for cervical spine injury.We previously developed and have since routinely used a prediction rule based on six clinical parameters to identify patients at greater than 5% risk of cervical spine injury to undergo screening helical CT of the cervical spine. During a 6-month period, 4285 screening imaging studies of the cervical spine were performed in adult blunt trauma patients. Six hundred one patients (398 males, 203 females; age range, 16-100 years; median age, 38 years) underwent helical CT, and the remainder underwent 3684 conventional radiographic examinations. Clinical and report data were extracted from the radiology department database, medical records, and the hospital trauma registry. Abnormal findings were independently confirmed by additional imaging studies, autopsy results, or clinical outcome.The true-positive cervical spine injury rates in helical CT- and conventional radiography-screened patients who presented directly to our trauma center were 40 (8.7%) of 462 and seven (0.2%) of 3684, respectively. The cervical spine injury rate in patients who were transferred from outside institutions to our trauma center and who underwent helical CT was 37 (26.6%) of 139. This figure included 20 patients already known to have cervical spine fracture.The clinical decision rule can distinguish patients at high and low risk of cervical spine injury, thus supporting its validity.Screening cervical spine CT in the emergency department, phase 3: increasing effectiveness of imaging.The aim of this study was to determine the effect of a clinical education initiative on the appropriate utilization of screening cervical spine CT in the emergency department. The purpose was to assess if clinical education can produce stricter adherence to the ACR Appropriateness Criteria and improve the utilization of screening CT examinations in the emergency department.Institutional review board approval was obtained for this HIPAA-compliant study. All adult patients presenting to a level 1 trauma center with blunt trauma prompting screening cervical spine CT were eligible. For each study, the requesting clinician completed a survey selecting all clinical indications. CT examinations were evaluated by a board-certified radiologist blinded to survey data. Results were compared with retrospective and prospective studies performed before the institution of the education initiative.Of the 388 cervical spine CT examinations performed, 12 (3.1%) were positive for acute cervical spine injury, compared to only 1.0% before the clinical education program (phase 2). Of the 376 examinations without injury, 13% met all 5 National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study criteria for nonimaging (down from 16.1% in phase 2), and 15 (4%) required no imaging when both National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study and abbreviated Canadian cervical spine rule criteria were applied.Implementation of a clinical education initiative resulted in improved adherence to ACR Appropriateness Criteria and improved clinical effectiveness of the studies by increasing fracture detection rate. Initiatives such as these could potentially influence imaging overutilization without burdening emergency department clinicians with excessive roadblocks to image ordering.Risk factors for cervical spine injury.The early recognition of cervical spine injury remains a top priority of acute trauma care. Missed diagnoses can lead to exacerbation of an existing injury and potentially devastating consequences. We sought to identify predictors of cervical spine injury.Trauma registry records for blunt trauma patients cared for at a Level I Trauma Centre from 1997 to 2002 were examined. Cervical spine injury included all cervical dislocations, fractures, fractures with spinal cord injury, and isolated spinal cord injuries. Univariate and adjusted odds ratios (ORs) were calculated to identify potential risk factors. Variables and two-way interaction terms were subjected to multivariate analysis using backward conditional stepwise logistic regression.Data from 18,644 patients, with 55,609 injuries, were examined. A total of 1255 individuals (6.7%) had cervical spine injuries. Motor Vehicle Collision (MVC) (odds ratio (OR) of 1.61 (1.26, 2.06)), fall (OR of 2.14 (1.63, 2.79)), age <40 (OR of 1.75 (1.38-2.17)), pelvic fracture (OR of 9.18 (6.96, 12.11)), Injury Severity Score (ISS) >15 (OR of 7.55 (6.16-9.25)), were all significant individual predictors of cervical spine injury. Neither facial fracture nor head injury alone were associated with an increased risk of cervical spine injury. Significant interactions between pelvic fracture and fall and pelvic fracture and head injury were associated with a markedly increased risk of cervical spine (OR 19.6 (13.1, 28.8)) and (OR 27.2 (10.0-51.3)).MVC and falls were independently associated with cervical spine injury. Pelvic fracture and fall and pelvic fracture and head injury, had a greater than multiplicative interaction and high risk for cervical spine injury, warranting increased vigilance in the evaluation of patients with this combination of injuries.Evaluation of acute cervical spine imaging based on ACR Appropriateness Criteria®.The objectives of this study were to determine the rate of acute blunt cervical spine injury at an academic urban level 1 trauma center and to evaluate the utilization of cervical spine imaging based on the established American College of Radiology (ACR) Appropriateness Criteria®. We retrospectively reviewed all radiography and CT imaging of the cervical spine performed over a year period in adult patients presenting with acute blunt cervical spine trauma. Exclusion criteria were children ≤17 years, non-acute trauma of ≥72 h, and penetrating trauma. Any fracture, dislocation, or ligamentous instability demonstrated by diagnostic imaging and requiring stabilization or specialized follow-up was defined as clinically significant cervical spine injury. A total of 1,325 cervical spine studies were reviewed in 1,245 patients; 32.7% (433/1,325) were cervical spine radiographs and 67.3% (892/1,325) were CT examinations. Approximately 1.5% (19/1,245) of the patients demonstrated clinically significant acute cervical spine injury. There were 6.4% (80/1,245) patients who received both cervical spine radiographs and CT as imaging evaluation. Based on the ACR Appropriateness Criteria®, all of the cervical spine radiographs performed (433) were determined to be "inappropriate" imaging in the setting of acute cervical spine injury.Routine cervical spine radiography for trauma victims: Does everybody need it?The purpose of this study was to evaluate the indication for routine cervical spine radiography in trauma patients.Prospective analysis of radiologic and clinical findings was performed during a 5-year period. Patients suitable for a clinical decision rule were reviewed separately.Of the 1,757 consecutive patients included in the study, 38 were diagnosed with a cervical spine injury. Of the 599 patients suitable for the clinical decision rule, 62 had midline cervical tenderness, including 2 with cervical spine injury. No additional cervical spine injuries were found during follow-up.It is within good practice, and it is also cost-effective, to obtain a cervical spine radiograph only on clinical parameters in trauma patients with no apparent bodily trauma and optimal parameters. With this clinical decision rule, 30.6% of all cervical spine series were redundant, and no (occult) spinal fractures would have been undetected.A multidisciplinary approach to the development of a cervical spine clearance protocol: process, rationale, and initial results.Assessment of potential spine injuries is inconsistent and controversial. Subsequent morbidity includes prolonged immobilization and missed injuries. To address these issues, a multidisciplinary team was organized to design a cervical spine management/clearance pathway. The process, algorithm, and initial results are described.Team members consisted of pediatric surgeons, orthopedic surgeons, neurosurgeons, emergency room physicians, and trauma nurse practitioners. Nationwide standards, guidelines, and experiences across disciplines were reviewed, and a consensus pathway evolved for cervical spine clearance in children 8 years and younger. A short-term retrospective review (5 months) was performed to assess initial performance. Time required for clearance, number and type of imaging studies, and number of missed injuries were compared between a group of patients before (n = 71) and after (n = 56) the implementation of the pathway.Strict guidelines for cervical spine immobilization and clearance criteria were defined. After implementation of this pathway, time required for cervical clearance in nonintubated children decreased (before, 12.3 +/- 1.5 v after, 7.5 +/- 0.9 hours; P =.014). A clear trend toward earlier clearance in intubated patients existed (before [n = 6], 40.0 +/- 16.8 v after [n = 6], 19.4 +/- 8.1 hours; P =.10); there need to be larger numbers to determine statistical significance. The 2 study groups were similar in age; mechanism of injury; Glasgow coma scale score; and number of plain x-rays, computed tomography scans, and magnetic resonance imaging studies obtained. Neither group had missed injuries.standards for cervical spine immobilization, assessment, and clearance. Implementation of such guidelines decreased time for cervical spine clearance, and ongoing analysis of sensitivity is encouraging.Clearing the cervical spine: initial radiologic evaluation.The identification of unstable cervical spine injury (UCSI) in blunt high-energy transfer injury (BHETI) patients is critical to management. In a prospective study of BHETI patients identified to be at high risk for UCSI, the use of lateral cervical spine view (LCV), three-view cervical spine series (FCS), and limited computerized tomography (CT) in the initial evaluation of these patients was analyzed. Thirteen of 204 patients sustained UCSI. Sensitivity of the LCV alone was 0.85 and the predictive value of the negative test was 0.97. Sensitivity and predictive value of a negative study were maximized by the use of FCS combined with CT when plain X-rays were inadequate. We conclude that technically adequate, normal FCS can be safely used to eliminate the presence of UCSI. If these studies are technically inadequate, the addition of a limited CT can be used to "clear" the spine.Canadian C-spine Rule and the National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Low-Risk Criteria for C-spine radiography in young trauma patients.The Canadian C-spine (cervical spine) Rule (CCR) and the National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Low-Risk Criteria (NLC) are criteria designed to guide C-spine radiography in trauma patients. It is unclear how these 2 rules compare with young children.This study retrospectively examined case-matched trauma patients 10 years or younger. Two cohorts were identified-cohort A where C-spine imaging was performed and cohort B where no imaging was conducted. The CCR and NLC criteria were then applied retrospectively to each cohort.Cohort A contained 125 cases and cohort B with 250 cases. Seven patients (3%) had significant C-spine injuries. In cohort A, NLC criteria could be applied in 108 (86.4%) of 125 and CCR in 109 (87.2%) of 125. National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Low-Risk Criteria suggested that 70 (58.3%) cases required C-spine imaging compared to 93 (76.2%) by CCR. National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Low-Risk Criteria missed 3 C-spine injuries, and CCR missed one. In cohort B, NLC criteria could be applied in 132 (88%) of 150 and CCR in 131 (87.3%) of 150. The NLC criteria identified 8 cases and CCR identified 13 cases that would need C-spine radiographs. Fisher's 2-sided Exact test demonstrated that CCR and NLC predictions were significantly different (P = .002) in both cohorts. The sensitivity of CCR was 86% and specificity was 94%, and the NLC had a sensitivity of 43% and a specificity of 96%.Although CCR and NLC criteria may reduce the need for C-spine imaging in children 10 years and younger; they are not sensitive or specific enough to be used as currently designed.Screening cervical spine CT in the emergency department, Phase 2: A prospective assessment of use.The National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study Low-Risk Criteria were established to identify patients with a low probability of cervical spine injury in whom imaging of the cervical spine was unnecessary. The purpose of this study was to ascertain the number of unnecessary cervical spine CT studies on the basis of proper application of established clinical guidelines and, secondarily, to determine indications for ordering studies in the absence of guideline criteria.All patients presenting to a level I trauma center for whom a screening cervical spine CT was ordered in the setting of blunt trauma were eligible for enrollment. For each study, the requesting clinician completed a survey regarding study indications. CT examinations were evaluated by a board-certified radiologist blinded to survey data to determine the presence or absence of cervical spine injury.Of 507 CT examinations, 5 (1%) were positive and 497 (98.0%) were negative for acute cervical spine injury. Five studies (1%) were indeterminate for acute injury but demonstrated no abnormality on subsequent imaging and clinical follow-up. Of the 502 studies without cervical spine injury, 81 (16.1%) were imaged despite meeting all 5 NEXUS criteria for nonimaging. Of these, the most common study indication was dangerous mechanism of injury (48.1%) followed by subjective neck pain (40.7%).Strict application of NEXUS criteria could potentially reduce the number of screening cervical spine CT scans in the setting of blunt trauma; this change would avoid a considerable amount of unnecessary radiation and cost.Detection of pediatric cervical spine injury.In evaluating the pediatric cervical spine for injury, the use of adult protocols without sufficient sensitivity to pediatric injury patterns may lead to excessive radiation doses. Data on injury location and means of detection can inform pediatric-specific guideline development.We retrospectively identified pediatric patients with codes from the International Classification of Diseases, 9th Revision, for cervical spine injury treated between 1980 and 2000. Collected data included physical findings, radiographic means of detection, and location of injury. Sensitivity of plain x-rays and diagnostic yield from additional radiographic studies were calculated.Of 239 patients, 190 had true injuries and adequate medical records; of these, 187 had adequate radiology records. Patients without radiographic abnormality were excluded. In 34 children younger than 8 years, National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study criteria missed two injuries (sensitivity, 94%), with 76% of injuries occurring from occiput-C2. In 158 children older than 8 years, National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study criteria identified all injured patients (sensitivity, 100%), with 25% of injuries occurring from occiput-C2. For children younger than 8 years, plain-film sensitivity was 75% and combination plain-film/occiput-C3 computed tomographic scan had a sensitivity of 94%, whereas combination plain-film and flexion-extension views had 81% sensitivity. In patients older than 8 years, the sensitivities were 93%, 97%, and 94%, respectively.Younger children tend to have more rostral (occiput-C2) injuries compared with older children. The National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study protocol may have lower sensitivity in young children than in adults. Limited computed tomography from occiput-C3 may increase diagnostic yield appreciably in young children compared with flexion-extension views. Further prospective studies, especially of young children, are needed to develop reliable pediatric protocols.[The cervical spine of children in the x-ray and clinical picture].Clearing the cervical spine in victims of blunt trauma.Cervical spine injuries occur in 2.3% to 6.4% of victims of blunt trauma. The difficulty of identifying the minority of patients with cervical spine injuries continues to challenge those who triage and treat the acutely injured. We retrospectively reviewed our practice for cervical spine clearance, which consists of three-view plain radiographs supplemented by focused further studies, such as computed or plain film tomography and flexion/extension views, as needed. Fifty-four patients with cervical spine injuries were identified during a 39-month period, which represented approximately 1% of the patients evaluated. Eighty cervical spine injuries were found, of which nine were missed. Review of the six patients in whom the nine cervical spine injuries were missed demonstrated error in the interpretation of radiographic studies in five patients, only two of whom were felt to have technically adequate films in hindsight. We conclude that a protocol based on three-view plain film radiographs supplemented by focused additional studies will allow the visualization of virtually all cervical spine injuries and that the main cause of missed injuries is errors of interpretation.Cervical spine evaluation in obtunded or comatose pediatric trauma patients: A pilot study.A uniformly accepted protocol for evaluation and clearance of the cervical spine of pediatric trauma patients with altered mental status does not currently exist. We sought to detect cervical spine injuries in this group with minimal risk. Patients were evaluated with standard three-view cervical spine radiographs and CT when necessary. Those patients without radiographic abnormality and altered mental status underwent flexion-extension of the cervical spine using fluoroscopy with somatosensory evoked potential (SSEP) monitoring. Those with abnormal movement by fluoroscopy or changes in SSEP underwent MRI. Fifteen patients were evaluated with this protocol. Two patients had movement on flexion-extension of the cervical spine and 5 had SSEP changes. Three patients had an MRI with only 1 showing injury. Five patients had residual hemiparesis. Evaluation of the cervical spine in obtunded or comatose pediatric trauma patients can be done safely with flexion-extension under fluoroscopy and SSEP monitoring. Further prospective studies are required to determine the efficacy of SSEP monitoring for cervical spine clearance in this select population.Cervical spine injuries to children under 11: should we use radiography more selectively in their initial assessment?To assess the effectiveness of cervical spine radiography in injured children under 11 years old, and suggest improvements.Retrospective survey of radiographs and accident and emergency records for children examined during a one year period in a large teaching hospital.No cervical spine fractures occurred in this age group during the year. The recorded clinical findings did not always justify radiography.Clinical examination appears undervalued by those assessing injured children and is poorly recorded. Radiography can be used more selectively. Initial assessment using a single lateral projection can be followed in doubtful cases by cross sectional imaging.Developing a spinal clearance protocol for unconscious pediatric trauma patients.Spinal injury in pediatric trauma is associated with significant morbidity and mortality, but no current consensus exists on the safest and most effective method of clearance in the high-risk pediatric trauma patient.A retrospective analysis was performed on the records of 115 pediatric patients who had suffered major trauma and required admission to the pediatric intensive care unit of a United Kingdom level I trauma centre during a 7-year period from January 2000 to December 2006. The spinal imaging performed, and methods of clearance for each spinal region were obtained from analysis of written and electronic medical documentation.In the cohort of 115 patients, there was a male predominance (63%) with motor vehicle accidents as the major mechanism of injury (63.5%). Ten patients (8.7%) were identified with spinal injuries, all of whom had sustained closed head injuries. Two of these patients had spinal cord injuries; one subsequently died. Spinal injury resulted in longer intubation times and intensive care stays, but no difference in new injury severity score or outcome. Clearance methods ranged from clinical examination to imaging with radiographs, computed tomography (CT), and dynamic screening. Magnetic resonance imaging was used as a secondary modality in two cases only, and in neither case was it used for clearance. CT demonstrated 100% specificity and sensitivity with positive and negative predictive values of 1 for all spinal regions. There were no cases of Spinal Cord Injury WithOut Radiologic Abnormality and no evidence of missed injuries.There is a need for an evidence-based protocol for the clearance of the spine in the obtunded and high-risk pediatric trauma patient. High-resolution CT with sagittal and coronal reconstructions should be the basis for cervical spinal clearance, in combination with the interpretation of films by an expert radiologist. All spinal regions should be imaged, and clearance should be formally documented. The role of magnetic resonance imaging in routine clearance remains controversial. Multicenter prospective studies are needed to develop consensus for an evidenced-based protocol for clearance in this high-risk group.A prospective analysis of a two-year experience using computed tomography as an adjunct for cervical spine clearance.The role of CT scanning as an adjunct to plain roentgenograms of the cervical spine was reviewed in acutely injured blunt trauma patients. Following institution of a protocol to evaluate the cervical spine in all blunt trauma patients, 179 patients underwent CT scanning of their cervical spine. This was performed for patients whose x-ray findings were positive, for patients with plain x-ray films suggestive of a pathologic condition, for patients with plain x-ray films that did not reveal all of the cervical vertebrae, and for patients who had persistent pain or neurologic deficits despite normal plain x-ray films. Of 123 patients not able to have their cervical spine cleared by normal roentgenograms, 93% were cleared within 24 hours of admission based on CT scans. There were no missed injuries in this setting. A false-positive rate of 28% and a false-negative rate of 1.5% were found for plain roentgenograms. Computed tomographic scans detected 98% of the injuries in our study and when combined with a three-view plain x-ray series of the cervical spine, 100% of cervical spine injuries were detected. Computed tomographic scanning as an adjunct to plain x-ray films of the cervical spine is a highly accurate and expedient modality to clear the cervical spine of blunt trauma patients.Retrospective application of the NEXUS low-risk criteria for cervical spine radiography in Canadian emergency departments.We evaluate the accuracy, reliability, and potential impact of the National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study (NEXUS) low-risk criteria for cervical spine radiography, when applied in Canadian emergency departments (EDs).The Canadian C-Spine Rule derivation study was a prospective cohort study conducted in 10 Canadian EDs that recruited alert and stable adult trauma patients. Physicians completed a 20-item data form for each patient and performed interobserver assessments when feasible. The prospective assessments included the 5 individual NEXUS criteria but not an explicit interpretation of the overall need for radiography according to the criteria. Patients underwent plain radiography, flexion-extension views, and computed tomography at the discretion of the treating physician. Patients who did not have radiography were followed up with a structured outcome assessment by telephone to determine clinically important cervical spine injury, a previously validated outcome measurement. Analyses included sensitivity and specificity with 95% confidence interval (CI), kappa coefficient, and potential radiography rates.Among 8,924 patients, 151 (1.7%) patients had an important cervical spine injury. The combined NEXUS criteria identified important cervical spine injury with a sensitivity of 92.7% (95% CI 87% to 96%) and a specificity of 37.8% (95% CI 37% to 39%). Application of the NEXUS criteria would have potentially reduced cervical spine radiography rates by 6.1% from the actual rate of 68.9% to 62.8%. Of 11 patients with important injuries not identified, 2 were treated with internal fixation and 3 with a halo.This retrospective validation found the NEXUS low-risk criteria to be less sensitive than previously reported. The NEXUS low-risk criteria should be further explicitly and prospectively evaluated for accuracy and reliability before widespread clinical use outside of the United States.Cervical injury in head trauma.Criteria for excluding cervical spine injury in patients who have sustained blunt head or neck trauma were prospectively studied at four hospitals in the Chicago area. The authors attempted to define a subset of these adult patients who, based on clinical criteria, could reliably be excluded from cervical spine radiography, thus avoiding unnecessary radiation and saving considerable time and money in their evaluation. Patients fell into four groups: (1) patients who were awake, alert, and had no complaint of neck pain or tenderness on physical examination; (2) patients who were awake, alert, but had complaint of neck pain or tenderness on physical examination laterally over the trapezius muscle only; (3) patients who were awake, alert, but had complaint of central neck pain or tenderness on physical examination over the cervical spine or center of the neck; and (4) patients who were not fully awake or alert, were clinically intoxicated, had other painful or distracting injuries, or had focal neurologic findings. Patients in group 4 had significantly more fractures (21/387) when compared with all other patients (7/478). Patients with central neck pain or tenderness (group 3) had significantly more fractures (7/237) than patients without pain or tenderness or with these findings limited to the trapezius area (0/236). It is clear that patients who have altered mental status, abnormal examination findings, distracting injury, or pain or tenderness over the cervical spine must have cervical spine radiographs.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Utility of a cervical spine clearance protocol after trauma in children between 0 and 3 years of age.Cervical spine clearance after trauma in children 0-3 years of age is deceptively difficult. Young children may not be able to communicate effectively, and severe injuries may require intubation and sedation. Currently, no published guidelines are available to aid in decision-making in these complex situations. The purpose of this study was to determine whether a safe and effective protocol-driven system could be developed for clearance of the cervical spine in noncommunicative children between 0 and 3 years of age.Children 0-3 years of age, including intubated patients, who were admitted after trauma activation at Primary Children's Medical Center in Salt Lake City or the Children's Hospital of New York from 2002 to 2006 were managed according to a cervical spine clearance protocol. Data were collected in a prospective fashion. Radiographic and clinical methods of clearing the cervical spine, as well as the type and management of injuries, were recorded.A total of 2828 pediatric trauma activations required cervical spine clearance during the study period. Of these, 575 (20%) were children <or= 3 years of age who were admitted to the hospital. To facilitate clearing the cervical spine in these children, plain radiographs (100%), CT studies (14%), and MR images (10%) were obtained. Nineteen ligamentous injuries (3.3%) and 9 fractures/dislocations (1.5%) were detected, with 4 patients requiring operative stabilization (0.7%). No late injuries have been detected.The protocol used has been effective in detecting cervical spine injuries in noncommunicative children after trauma. The combination of clinical information and radiographic studies is essential for safely clearing the cervical spine in these complex situations. Clearance of the cervical spine without CT or MR imaging studies is possible in the majority of cases, even in very young patients.Cervical spine clearance in blunt trauma: evaluation of a computed tomography-based protocol.Prompt identification of cervical spine injuries has been a critical issue in trauma management. In 1998, the authors developed a new protocol to evaluate cervical spines in blunt trauma. This protocol relies on clinical clearance for appropriate patients and helical computed tomography instead of plain radiographs for patients who cannot be clinically cleared. The authors then prospectively collected data on all cervical spine evaluations to assess the sensitivity and specificity of their approach.Any patient without clinical evidence of neurologic injury, alcohol or drug intoxication, or distracting injury underwent cervical spine evaluation by clinical examination. Patients who did not meet these criteria underwent helical computed tomographic scanning of the entire cervical spine. For patients who had neurologic deficits, a magnetic resonance image was obtained. If the patient was not evaluable secondary to coma, the computed tomographic scan was without abnormality, and the patient was moving all four extremities at arrival in the emergency department, the cervical spine was cleared, and spinal precautions were removed. Data were collected for all patients admitted to Santa Barbara Cottage Hospital trauma service between 1999 and 2002. The authors selected for analysis patients with blunt trauma and further identified those with closed head injuries (Glasgow Coma Scale score < 15 and loss of consciousness). In addition, all blunt cervical spine injuries were reviewed.During the period of study, 2,854 trauma patients were admitted, of whom 2,603 (91%) had blunt trauma. Of these, 1,462 (56%) had closed head injuries. One hundred patients (7% of patients admitted for blunt trauma) had cervical spine or spinal cord injuries, of which 99 were identified by the authors' protocol. Only one injury was not appreciated in a patient with syringomyelia. Fifteen percent of patients with spinal cord injury had no radiographic abnormality; all of these patients presented with neurologic deficits. The sensitivity for detecting cervical spine injury was thus 99%, and the specificity was 100%. The risk of missing a cervical spine injury in these blunt trauma patients was 0.04%. The authors missed no spine injuries in patients with head injuries.The use of the authors' protocol resulted in excellent sensitivity and specificity in detecting cervical spine injuries. In addition, it allowed early removal of spinal precautions.What defines a distracting injury in cervical spine assessment?The National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study defined five criteria for obtaining cervical spine radiographic investigations in blunt trauma patients. Distracting injury was given as the indication for more than 30% of all x-ray studies ordered. The hypothesis of this study was that upper and lower torso injuries would have different effects on clinical cervical spine assessment.This is a single-center, prospective, observational study of admitted, alert, adult blunt-trauma patients. All patients underwent cervical spine plain-film radiography. Data were collected on all injuries, physical examination findings, narcotic administration, and radiograph results. Patients with upper and lower torso injuries were compared in their ability complain of pain or midline tenderness relative to a cervical spine fracture.In all, 406 patients participated. All patients received narcotic analgesics before examination. Forty patients (9.9%) had cervical spine fractures, of whom seven had a nontender neck examination. All seven patients with a nontender cervical spine and a neck fracture had at least one upper torso injury. None of the 99 patients with injuries isolated to the lower torso and a nontender neck had a cervical spine fracture (p < 0.05). The frequency of cervical spine fracture among patients with cervical spine tenderness was 19.8% (n = 33).The National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study definition of a distracting injury may be narrowed. Upper torso injuries may be sufficiently painful to distract from a reliable cervical spine examination. Patients may detect spine tenderness in the presence of isolated painful lower torso injuries. Patients with spine tenderness warrant imaging.Epidemiology and predictors of spinal injury in adult major trauma patients: European cohort study.This is a European cohort study on predictors of spinal injury in adult (≥16 years) major trauma patients, using prospectively collected data of the Trauma Audit and Research Network from 1988 to 2009. Predictors for spinal fractures/dislocations or spinal cord injury were determined using univariate and multivariate logistic regression analysis. 250,584 patients were analysed. 24,000 patients (9.6%) sustained spinal fractures/dislocations alone and 4,489 (1.8%) sustained spinal cord injury with or without fractures/dislocations. Spinal injury patients had a median age of 44.5 years (IQR = 28.8-64.0) and Injury Severity Score of 9 (IQR = 4-17). 64.9% were male. 45% of patients suffered associated injuries to other body regions. Age <45 years (≥45 years OR 0.83-0.94), Glasgow Coma Score (GCS) 3-8 (OR 1.10, 95% CI 1.02-1.19), falls >2 m (OR 4.17, 95% CI 3.98-4.37), sports injuries (OR 2.79, 95% CI 2.41-3.23) and road traffic collisions (RTCs) (OR 1.91, 95% CI 1.83-2.00) were predictors for spinal fractures/dislocations. Age <45 years (≥45 years OR 0.78-0.90), male gender (female OR 0.78, 95% CI 0.72-0.85), GCS <15 (OR 1.36-1.93), associated chest injury (OR 1.10, 95% CI 1.01-1.20), sports injuries (OR 3.98, 95% CI 3.04-5.21), falls >2 m (OR 3.60, 95% CI 3.21-4.04), RTCs (OR 2.20, 95% CI 1.96-2.46) and shooting (OR 1.91, 95% CI 1.21-3.00) were predictors for spinal cord injury. Multilevel injury was found in 10.4% of fractures/dislocations and in 1.3% of cord injury patients. As spinal trauma occurred in >10% of major trauma patients, aggressive evaluation of the spine is warranted, especially, in males, patients <45 years, with a GCS <15, concomitant chest injury and/or dangerous injury mechanisms (falls >2 m, sports injuries, RTCs and shooting). Diagnostic imaging of the whole spine and a diligent search for associated injuries are substantial.Screening cervical spine CT in a level I trauma center: overutilization?The objective of our study was to analyze the use of screening cervical spine CT performed after trauma and establish the opportunity of potentially avoidable studies when evidence-based clinical criteria are applied before imaging.All cervical spine CT examinations performed in the emergency department of a level 1 trauma center between January and December 2008 on adult patients with trauma were analyzed; 1589 studies were evaluated. Radiology reports and clinical data were reviewed for the presence of fracture or ligamentous injury and for the mode of injury. We also looked for documentation of clinical criteria used to perform the CT study. In particular, we looked for mention of posterior midline cervical tenderness, focal neurologic deficit, level of alertness, evidence of intoxication, and clinically apparent distracting injury. These five criteria were established by the National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study (NEXUS) to identify patients with a low probability of cervical spine injury who consequently needed no cervical spine imaging.Of the 1589 studies reviewed, 41 (2.6%) were positive for an acute cervical spine injury and 1524 (95.9%) were negative. The remaining 24 studies (1.5%) were indeterminate on the initial CT examination but subsequent imaging and clinical follow-up failed to show acute injury. Of the 1524 examinations with no acute injury, 364 (23.9%) had no documentation of any of the five NEXUS low-risk criteria.The strict application of the NEXUS low-risk criteria could potentially reduce the number of screening cervical spine CT examinations in the setting of trauma in more than 20% of cases, thereby avoiding a significant amount of unnecessary radiation and significant cost.Use of plain radiography to screen for cervical spine injuries.Standard radiographic screening may fail to reveal any evidence of injury in some patients with spinal injury. The purposes of this investigation were to document the efficacy of standard radiographic views and to categorize the frequencies and types of injuries missed on plain radiographic screening of the cervical spine.All patients with blunt trauma selected for radiographic cervical spine imaging at 21 participating institutions underwent a standard 3-view series (cross-table lateral, anteroposterior, and odontoid views), as well as any other imaging deemed necessary by their physicians. Injuries detected with screening radiography were then compared with final injury status for each patient, as determined by review of all radiographic studies.The study enrolled 34,069 patients with blunt trauma, including 818 patients (2.40% of all patients; 95% confidence interval [CI] 2.40% to 2.40%) having a total of 1,496 distinct cervical spine injuries. Plain radiographs revealed 932 injuries in 498 patients (1.46% of all patients; 95% CI 1.46% to 1.46%) but missed 564 injuries in 320 patients (0.94% of all patients; 95% CI 0.94% to 0.94%). The majority of missed injuries (436 injuries in 237 patients [representing 0.80% of all patients]; 95% CI 0.80% to 0.80%) occurred in cases in which plain radiographs were interpreted as abnormal (but not diagnostic of injury) or inadequate. However, 23 patients (0.07% of all patients; 95% CI 0.05% to 0.09%) had 35 injuries (including 3 potentially unstable injuries) that were not visualized on adequate plain film imaging. These patients represent 2.81% (95% CI 1.89% to 3.63%) of all injured patients with blunt trauma undergoing radiographic evaluation.Standard 3-view imaging provides reliable screening for most patients with blunt trauma. However, on rare occasions, such imaging may fail to detect significant unstable injuries. In addition, it is difficult to obtain adequate plain radiographic imaging in a substantial minority of patients.Computed tomography alone may clear the cervical spine in obtunded blunt trauma patients: a prospective evaluation of a revised protocol.Cervical spine (CS) clearance in obtunded blunt trauma patients (OBTPs) remains controversial. When computed tomography (CT) of the CS is negative for injury, debate continues over the role of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI). Use of MRI in OBTPs is costly, time-consuming, and potentially dangerous. Our study evaluated the safety of a protocol to discontinue the cervical collar in OBTPs based on CT scan alone.A prospective study was performed from October 2006 to September 2008 at a regional Level I trauma center on OBTPs with gross movement of all extremities. After a CT of the CS was read as negative for injury, the CS was cleared and the collar was removed. Patients were then followed prospectively for related complications.One hundred ninety-seven patients had their collars removed and CS cleared at a mean of 3.3 days. There were 144 males (73%), and the average age was 47.1 years. Sixty-two percent of patients were reexamined by a physician when no longer obtunded and found to have no CS signs or symptoms. Five patients (2.5%), when no longer obtunded, had persistent pain for which MRI CS was negative for injury. Coroner reports and autopsies were reviewed for missed spinal cord injuries in the 13% who died before reexamination. One of these patients had an autopsy report of an isolated CS ligamentous injury, deemed to be stable by our attending neurosurgeon. We followed up an additional 12% by phone or chart review, with no report of new onset neurologic deficit. The remaining 11% were lost to follow-up, but no patient contacted our hospital to report deterioration in function. One patient (0.5%) developed a minor CS decubitus ulceration.Removal of CS precautions in OBTPs with gross movement of all extremities is safe and efficacious if CT CS is negative for injury. Supplemental MRI CS is not needed in this patient population.Incidence of cervical spine injuries in association with blunt head trauma.To establish an incidence of cervical spine injuries in significant blunt head trauma and to evaluate the necessity of using cervical radiography, all consecutive cases of blunt head trauma admitted to the trauma service over a 7-month period were reviewed. Two hundred twenty-eight charts were reviewed for demographic information, circumstance of injury, complaints and physical findings referable to the cervical spine, presenting level of consciousness, severity of head injury, and cervical spine radiographic findings. Only three patients were found to have cervical spine injuries, for an incidence of 1.7%. Of the 122 alert and asymptomatic patients, none had cervical spine injury. The patient population was defined, yet the very low incidence of cervical spine injuries associated with blunt head trauma in this study precludes any identification of predictors. Nevertheless, the results suggest that alert and asymptomatic patients can be spared cervical spine radiography.Out-of-hospital cervical spine clearance: agreement between emergency medical technicians and emergency physicians.Determine the level of agreement between emergency medical technicians (EMTs) and emergency physicians (EPs) when applying an existing emergency medical services/fire department protocol for out-of-hospital clinical cervical spine injury (CSI) clearance in blunt trauma patients.Prospective observational study of consecutive blunt trauma patients transported by emergency medical services/fire department during a 3-month study period. The setting was an urban Level I trauma center. Measurement of interrater agreement (kappa) was determined.Mean age of the 190 patients was 34+/-19 years (range, 6 -98 years). Fifty-nine percent of the patients were male. One hundred forty-six patients (77%) were immobilized by EMTs; 17 of these patients were clinically cleared by EPs. Forty-four patients (23%) were clinically cleared by EMTs and presented without CSI precautions; of these, 61% (27 of 44) were immobilized by EPs and 57% (25 of 44) had cervical spine radiographs obtained. Overall, 141 patients (74%) required radiographic clearance. CSI were detected in five patients (2.6%); all five were immobilized in the out-of-hospital setting. Overall disagreement between EMTs and EPs regarding out-of-hospital CSI clearance occurred in 44 patients (23%) (kappa=0.29; 95% confidence interval, 0.15-0.43; p < 0.01).Significant disagreement in clinical CSI clearance exists between EMTs and EPs. Further research and education is recommended before widespread implementation of this practice.Multicentre prospective validation of use of the Canadian C-Spine Rule by triage nurses in the emergency department.The Canadian C-Spine Rule for imaging of the cervical spine was developed for use by physicians. We believe that nurses in the emergency department could use this rule to clinically clear the cervical spine. We prospectively evaluated the accuracy, reliability and acceptability of the Canadian C-Spine Rule when used by nurses.We conducted this three-year prospective cohort study in six Canadian emergency departments. The study involved adult trauma patients who were alert and whose condition was stable. We provided two hours of training to 191 triage nurses. The nurses then assessed patients using the Canadian C-Spine Rule, including determination of neck tenderness and range of motion, reapplied immobilization and completed a data form.Of the 3633 study patients, 42 (1.2%) had clinically important injuries of the cervical spine. The kappa value for interobserver assessments of 498 patients with the Canadian C-Spine Rule was 0.78. We calculated sensitivity of 100.0% (95% confidence interval [CI] 91.0%-100.0%) and specificity of 43.4% (95% CI 42.0%-45.0%) for the Canadian C-Spine Rule as interpreted by the investigators. The nurses classified patients with a sensitivity of 90.2% (95% CI 76.0%-95.0%) and a specificity of 43.9% (95% CI 42.0%-46.0%). Early in the study, nurses failed to identify four cases of injury, despite the presence of clear high-risk factors. None of these patients suffered sequelae, and after retraining there were no further missed cases. We estimated that for 40.7% of patients, the cervical spine could be cleared clinically by nurses. Nurses reported discomfort in applying the Canadian C-Spine Rule in only 4.8% of cases.Use of the Canadian C-Spine Rule by nurses was accurate, reliable and clinically acceptable. Widespread implementation by nurses throughout Canada and elsewhere would diminish patient discomfort and improve patient flow in overcrowded emergency departments.Patterns and risks in spinal trauma.Spinal injury in children is rare, and poses many difficulties in management.To ascertain the prevalence of spinal injury within the paediatric trauma population, and to assess relative risks of spinal injury according to age, conscious level, injury severity score (ISS), and associated injuries.Spine injured children were identified from the UK Trauma Audit & Research Network Database from 1989 to 2000. Relative risks of injury were calculated against the denominator paediatric trauma population.Of 19 538 on the database, 527 (2.7%) suffered spinal column fracture/dislocation without cord injury and 109 had cord injury (0.56% of all children; 16.5% of spine injured children). Thirty children (0.15% of all children; 4.5% of spine injured children) sustained spinal cord injury without radiological abnormality (SCIWORA). Cord injury and SCIWORA occurred more commonly in children aged < or =8. The risk of spine fracture/dislocation without cord injury was increased with an ISS >25 and with chest injuries. The risk of cord injury was increased with reduced GCS, head injury, and chest injury.Spinal cord injury and SCIWORA occur more frequently in young children. Multiple injuries and chest injuries increase the risk of fracture/dislocation and of cord injury. Reduced GCS and head injuries increase the risk of cord injury.Adequacy of plain radiography in the diagnosis of cervical spine injuries.Our hypotheses were (1) that plain radiography of the cervical spine in the evaluation of low risk patients with minor blunt trauma is accurate and (2) that computed tomography (CT) of the cervical spine in the evaluation of low risk patients is unnecessary. This study evaluates those hypotheses. We prospectively recorded findings of all patients with blunt trauma who underwent imaging over a period of 70 days. Injury status was determined by review of all radiographic studies obtained on each patient. Chart reviews were performed to determine mechanism of injury and neurological status. Patients were divided into three groups: very low risk, low risk, and high risk. Study end point was fracture. The study included 219 patients. The very low risk group had 107 patients, none of whom had fractures found on CT (projected specificity of plain radiography: 100%). The low risk group contained 78 patients who had no fractures seen on plain radiography or CT (specificity of plain radiography and CT: 100%). The high risk group consisted of 34 patients; 15 had fractures demonstrated on CT. Plain radiography missed one fracture out of 15. In low risk patients, plain radiography is an efficient diagnostic exam with a specificity of 100%. In high risk patients, plain radiography is a good adjunctive screening exam in conjunction with CT scan, with a sensitivity of 93.3% and specificity of 95%.Cervical radiographic evaluation of alert patients following blunt trauma.The records of 333 consecutive alert patients admitted to a trauma service for neurologic observation after sustaining significant blunt head trauma were reviewed. All patients had class I level of consciousness (alert, responds immediately to questions, may be disoriented and confused, follows complex commands); those with significant acute alcohol and/or drug intoxication were excluded from this study. Cervical spine injury did not correlate with the presence of major concomitant injuries, skull fractures, or major intracranial injuries. Cervical spine injury correlated only with the presence of signs and/or symptoms of cervical injury. This correlation was highly significant (P less than .05). Five of the 42 patients (11%) with signs and/or symptoms of cervical injury had cervical spine fractures. No patient without signs and/or symptoms of cervical injury had a cervical spine injury. These findings suggest that among alert patients with class I level of consciousness who have sustained blunt injury, only those who present with signs and/or symptoms of cervical injury require cervical radiographic evaluation.Role of routine emergency cervical radiography in head trauma.This review of 406 patients with head injury examines the role of emergency cervical radiography in head trauma and the frequency of associated cervical spine injury. Of 293 patients who had emergency cervical radiography (72 percent), 8 showed some abnormality, but only 5 (1.2 percent) were significant for cervical spine injury. All eight patients were, however, clinically suspected to have associated cervical spine injury before emergency cervical radiography. One hundred thirteen patients (28 percent) did not undergo emergency cervical radiography based on clinical evaluation, and none was subsequently found to have a missed cervical spine injury. There was no correlation between severity of head injury and the presence of associated cervical spine injury (p greater than 0.16). Head trauma is infrequently associated with cervical spine injury and when present is usually not clinically occult. Emergency cervical radiography is not efficacious and should not be routine in the emergency room management of head trauma. When associated cervical spine injury is clinically suspected, adequate cervical immobilization should be maintained and cervical radiography performed on a low priority basis. Head injury due to automobile and pedestrian or motorcycle and automobile accident may be more likely to be associated with cervical spine injury.Developing a clinical algorithm for early management of cervical spine injury in child trauma victims.To define a subset of injured children for whom emergency cervical spine radiography may be unnecessary, we performed a retrospective chart and radiologic review. Two entry methods were used: All injured children, from birth through 16 years, who had received cervical spine radiographs at The Children's Memorial Hospital from September 1983, to September 1984, were included. All patients from birth to 16 years with proven or suspected cases of cervical spine injury who had received cervical spine radiographs and who had been treated at either the Children's Memorial Hospital or the Northwestern University Spine Trauma Unit during period 1974 to 1984 also were included. Each child's chart was reviewed, and 84 clinical variables were recorded. All radiographs were reviewed by a pediatric neuroradiologist. Of 206 children studied, 59 had cervical spine injuries. A clinical algorithm was derived using the following eight variables: neck pain; neck tenderness; limitation of neck mobility; history of trauma to the neck; and abnormalities of reflexes, strength, sensation, or mental status. The following decision rule was selected: Positive findings in any of these eight variables mandates cervical spine radiography. This algorithm correctly identified 58 of 59 children with cervical spine injury, yielding a sensitivity of 98% and specificity of 54%. Cervical spine radiographs could have been avoided in 79 children (38% of the entire sample). This algorithm performed better than did models derived from logistic regression analysis of the same data. Validation trials are required prior to the implementation of this or other clinical decision algorithms in practice.Clinical examination in complement with computed tomography scan: an effective method for identification of cervical spine injury.The purpose of this study was to prospectively evaluate a protocol that assesses the efficacy and sensitivity of clinical examination in complement with computed tomographic (CT) scan in screening for cervical spine (c-spine) injury.During the 26-month period from March 2005 to May 2007, blunt trauma patients older than 13 years were prospectively entered into a study protocol. If patients were awake and alert with Glasgow Coma Score (GCS) >or=14, clinical examination of the neck was performed. Clinical examination was performed regardless of distracting injuries. If the patient had no complaints of pain or tenderness, the cervical collar was removed. Patients with complaints of c-spine pain or tenderness and patients with GCS score <14 underwent CT scanning for evaluation of the entire c-spine.One thousand six hundred eighty seven patients were prospectively assessed for blunt c-spine injury. Fourteen hundred thirty-nine patients had GCS score >or=14, 897 (62%) of which had a negative clinical examination of the c-spine and subsequently had cervical collars removed. Two patients (0.2%) whose clinical examination results disclosed nothing abnormal were later found to have a c-spine injury. Five hundred forty-two patients with GCS score >or=14 had a positive c-spine clinical examination, of which 134 (24%) were diagnosed with c-spine injury. One hundred thirty-three (99%) c-spine injuries were identified by CT scan. The c-spine injury missed by CT scan was a radiologic misinterpretation. For patients with c-spine injury with GCS score >or=14, both sensitivities of clinical examination and CT scan were 99%. Two hundred forty-eight patients had GCS score <14, of which 5 (2.0%) were diagnosed with c-spine injury. CT scan identified all c-spine injuries for patients with GCS score <14.In awake and alert blunt trauma patients, clinical examination is a sensitive screening method for c-spine injury. Clinical examination allows for the majority of blunt trauma patients to have their c-spines cleared safely without radiologic screening. Clinical examination in complement with CT scan is a sensitive and an effective method for identification of c-spine injury in awake and alert patients with symptoms of c-spine injury. CT scan is the sensitive and effective test for screening and diagnosis of c-spine injury in blunt trauma patients with altered mental status.Evaluation of pediatric cervical spine injuries.To compare historical features, clinical examination findings, and radiographic results among pediatric patients with cervical spine injury (CSI), a retrospective review of patients who were diagnosed with CSI was undertaken. Two main groups were identified: radiographically evident cervical spine injury (RESCI), and spinal cord injury without radiographic abnormality (SCIWORA). Demographic, historical, clinical, and radiographic information was obtained from patients' charts and analyzed to determine factors associated with CSI and to determine the efficacy of the various radiographic views. Seventy-two children, ages from 1 month to 15 years (median age, 9 yrs), were included in the study. Sports-related injuries were the most common. Forty patients had RESCI and 32 had SCIWORA. Forty-nine (80%) of all the patients had abnormal findings on neck examination, and six (16%) of the RECSI group had abnormal neurological findings. Lateral radiographs had a sensitivity for CSI of 79%; a three-view radiographic series had a sensitivity of 94%. All patients with CSI who were clinically asymptomatic had both a high-risk injury mechanism and a distracting injury. CSI should be suspected in any child with abnormal findings on neck or neurological examination. A minimum of three radiographic cervical spine views should be obtained in the evaluation of CSI in children. Even in the face of a three-view series, CSI should be suspected in patients with an abnormal neck or neurological exam, high-risk mechanism of injury, or distracting injury.Implementation of the Canadian C-Spine Rule: prospective 12 centre cluster randomised trial.To evaluate the effectiveness of an active strategy to implement the validated Canadian C-Spine Rule into multiple emergency departments.Matched pair cluster randomised trial.University and community emergency departments in Canada. Participants 11 824 alert and stable adults presenting with blunt trauma to the head or neck at one of 12 hospitals.Six hospitals were randomly allocated to the intervention and six to the control. At the intervention sites, active strategies were used to implement the Canadian C-Spine Rule, including education, policy, and real time reminders on radiology requisitions. No specific intervention was introduced to alter the behaviour of doctors requesting cervical spine imaging at the control sites.Diagnostic imaging rate of the cervical spine during two 12 month before and after periods.Patients were balanced between control and intervention sites. From the before to the after periods, the intervention group showed a relative reduction in cervical spine imaging of 12.8% (95% confidence interval 9% to 16%; 61.7% v 53.3%; P=0.01) and the control group a relative increase of 12.5% (7% to 18%; 52.8% v 58.9%; P=0.03). These changes were significant when both groups were compared (P<0.001). No fractures were missed and no adverse outcomes occurred.Implementation of the Canadian C-Spine Rule led to a significant decrease in imaging without injuries being missed or patient morbidity. Final imaging rates were much lower at intervention sites than at most US hospitals. Widespread implementation of this rule could lead to reduced healthcare costs and more efficient patient flow in busy emergency departments worldwide.Clinical trials NCT00290875.A pediatric cervical spine clearance protocol to reduce radiation exposure in children.To minimize radiation exposure in children and reduce resource use, we implemented an age-specific algorithm to evaluate cervical spine injuries at a Level 1 trauma center. The effects of protocol implementation on computed tomography (CT) use in children (≤ 10 y) were determined.With institutional review board approval, we conducted a retrospective review using the institutional trauma registry. All pediatric patients (≤ 10 y) (n = 324) between January 2007 and present were reviewed. We excluded cases in which no imaging or outside imaging was performed. Patients were evaluated by physical exam alone, with the aid of plain radiograms or with cervical spine CT. All patients who required head CT also had CT of cervical spine to C3. We analyzed demographic, injury, and outcome data using STATA to perform chi-square and t-test, and to determine P value. P < 0.05 was defined as significant. We used the WinDose program to calculate the radiation-effective dose used in cervical spine CT.There were 123 and 124 patients in the pre-protocol and post-protocol groups, respectively. Demographics, GCS, and injury analysis, specifically head-neck and face Injury Severity Scores showed no significant difference between groups. There was a 60% (P < 0.001) decrease in the use of full CTs after protocol implementation. We estimated that the protocol reduced the exposed area by 50% and decreased the radiation dose to the thyroid by > 80%. We extrapolated the combined effect results in a threefold reduction in radiation exposure.Implementation of a cervical spine protocol led to a significant reduction in radiation exposure among children.Computed tomography in the initial evaluation of the cervical spine.Unstable injury of the cervical spine must be considered in all victims of blunt trauma. To evaluate the role of limited, directed computed tomography (CT) in the initial evaluation of the cervical spine, a one-year study involving 104 high-risk patients was undertaken. Sensitivity was 0.78 overall, but in the group of patients scanned after inadequate plain radiographs, CT had a sensitivity of 1.0 for unstable cervical injury. All false-negative studies involved atlantoaxial rotary subluxation. We conclude that limited, directed CT of the cervical spine is appropriate in the initial evaluation of patients at risk, particularly if plain radiographs are inadequate, but is of limited value in the evaluation of ligamentous injury of the upper cervical spine.The Canadian C-spine rule versus the NEXUS low-risk criteria in patients with trauma.The Canadian C-Spine (cervical-spine) Rule (CCR) and the National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study (NEXUS) Low-Risk Criteria (NLC) are decision rules to guide the use of cervical-spine radiography in patients with trauma. It is unclear how the two decision rules compare in terms of clinical performance.We conducted a prospective cohort study in nine Canadian emergency departments comparing the CCR and NLC as applied to alert patients with trauma who were in stable condition. The CCR and NLC were interpreted by 394 physicians for patients before radiography.Among the 8283 patients, 169 (2.0 percent) had clinically important cervical-spine injuries. In 845 (10.2 percent) of the patients, physicians did not evaluate range of motion as required by the CCR algorithm. In analyses that excluded these indeterminate cases, the CCR was more sensitive than the NLC (99.4 percent vs. 90.7 percent, P<0.001) and more specific (45.1 percent vs. 36.8 percent, P<0.001) for injury, and its use would have resulted in lower radiography rates (55.9 percent vs. 66.6 percent, P<0.001). In secondary analyses that included all patients, the sensitivity and specificity of CCR, assuming that the indeterminate cases were all positive, were 99.4 percent and 40.4 percent, respectively (P<0.001 for both comparisons with the NLC). Assuming that the CCR was negative for all indeterminate cases, these rates were 95.3 percent (P=0.09 for the comparison with the NLC) and 50.7 percent (P=0.001). The CCR would have missed 1 patient and the NLC would have missed 16 patients with important injuries.For alert patients with trauma who are in stable condition, the CCR is superior to the NLC with respect to sensitivity and specificity for cervical-spine injury, and its use would result in reduced rates of radiography.Using CT of the cervical spine for early evaluation of pediatric patients with head trauma.The purpose of this study was to assess the effectiveness of CT of the cervical spine in addition to radiography in pediatric patients with suspected head trauma at the time of the CT head examination.We identified 63 pediatric patients admitted to the emergency department who had head trauma and who underwent both head CT and neck radiography. Those who underwent CT of the cervical spine at the time of the head CT examination during their initial evaluation were compared for demographics, clinical status, mechanism of injury, and number of excess radiographs (number required by protocol minus number of films obtained) required to evaluate the cervical spine with those patients who did not undergo early CT of the cervical spine.Twenty-one patients (33%) underwent cervical spine CT at the time of the head CT examination. The number of excess radiographs differed significantly between these patients (2.1 +/- 2.6 vs 3.6 +/- 2.7, p = 0.04) and the comparison group. Patients who did not undergo early CT for whom excess radiographs were obtained had the following characteristics: they were older than 8 years (p = 0.03), were unrestrained in a motor vehicle crash (p = 0.04), had a Glasgow coma score of 13-15 (p = 0.01), and were intubated (p = 0.02).The number of repeated radiographs required to ascertain that the cervical spine is free of injury after suspected head trauma is significantly fewer when initial CT of the neck is performed at the time of head CT examination. Including cervical spine CT in trauma protocols for subgroups of children with head injuries may lead to more effective clearance of the pediatric cervical spine.Cervical spine injuries in children: a review of 103 patients treated consecutively at a level 1 pediatric trauma center.Cervical spine (C-spine) injuries occur infrequently in children but may be associated with significant disability and mortality. The purpose of this study was to review the experience of a level 1 pediatric trauma center to determine the epidemiology, risk factors, mechanisms, levels, types of injury, comorbid factors, and outcomes associated with these potentially devastating injuries.A retrospective analysis of 103 consecutive C-spine injuries treated at a level 1 pediatric trauma center over a 9(1/2)-year period (January 1991 through August 2000) was performed.The mean age was 10.3 +/- 5.2 years, and the male-to-female ratio was 1.6:1. The most common mechanism of injury was motor vehicle related (52%), followed by sporting injuries (27%). Football injuries accounted for 29% of all sports-related injuries. Sixty-eight percent of all children sustained injuries to C1 to C4; 25% to C5 to C7; and 7% to both. Spinal cord injury without radiographic abnormality (SCIWORA) occurred in 38%. Five patients had complete cord lesions involving the lower C-spine (C4 to C7); 4 of these were motor vehicle related, and all 4 patients died. Isolated C-spine injuries occurred in 43%, whereas 38% had associated closed head injuries (CHI). The overall mortality rate was 18.5%, most commonly motor vehicle related (95%), occurring in younger children (mean and median age 5 years) and associated with upper C-spine injuries (74%) and CHI (89%). C1 dislocations occurred in younger children (mean age, 6.6 years), most often as a result of motor vehicle-related trauma (especially pedestrians) and were associated with the highest injury severity score (ISS), longest length of stay (LOS), most CHIs, and the highest mortality rate (50%). C-spine fractures with or without SCI occurred most commonly as a result of falls and dives. Sporting injuries occurred almost exclusively in adolescent boys (mean age, 13.8 years) and were isolated injuries associated with a relatively low ISS and shorter LOS. Interestingly, 75% of sporting injuries showed SCIWORA, and all infants suffering from child abuse had SCIWORA.Mechanisms of injury are age related, with younger children sustaining C-spine injuries as a result of motor vehicle-related trauma and older adolescents commonly injured during sporting activities. C-spine injuries in children most commonly involve the upper C-spine, but complete lesions of the cord are associated more frequently with lower C-spine injuries. The type of C-spine injury is related to the mechanism of injury: SCIWORA is associated with sporting activities and child abuse, C-spine dislocations most commonly result from motor vehicle-related trauma (especially among pedestrians), and C-spine fractures occur most commonly as a result of falls and dives. Predictors of mortality include younger age, motor vehicle-related mechanism, C1 dislocations, high ISS greater than 25, and associated CHI. A high index of suspicion for SCIWORA is essential when evaluating adolescents with neck trauma associated with sporting injuries or victims of child abuse.The Canadian C-spine rule performs better than unstructured physician judgment.We compare the predictive accuracy of emergency physicians' unstructured clinical judgment to the Canadian C-Spine rule.This prospective multicenter cohort study was conducted at 10 Canadian urban academic emergency departments. Included in the study were alert, stable, adult patients with a Glasgow Coma Scale score of 15 and trauma to the head or neck. This was a substudy of the Canadian C-Spine and CT Head Study. Eligible patients were prospectively evaluated before radiography. Physicians estimated the probability of unstable cervical spine injury from 0% to 100% according to clinical judgment alone and filled out a data form. Interobserver assessments were done when feasible. Patients underwent cervical spine radiography or follow-up to determine clinically important cervical spine injuries. Analyses included comparison of areas under the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve with 95% confidence intervals (CIs) and the kappa coefficient.During 18 months, 6265 patients were enrolled. The mean age was 36.6 years (range 16 to 97 years), and 50.1% were men. Sixty-four (1%) patients had a clinically important injury. The physicians' kappa for a 0% predicted probability of injury was 0.46 (95% CI 0.28 to 0.65). The respective areas under the ROC curve for predicting cervical spine injury were 0.85 (95% CI 0.80 to 0.89) for physician judgment and 0.91 (95% CI 0.89 to 0.92) for the Canadian C-Spine rule (P <.05). With a threshold of 0% predicted probability of injury, the respective indices of accuracy for physicians and the Canadian C-Spine rule were sensitivity 92.2% versus 100% (P <.001) and specificity 53.9% versus 44.0% (P <.001).Interobserver agreement of unstructured clinical judgment for predicting clinically important cervical spine injury is only fair, and the sensitivity is unacceptably low. The Canadian C-Spine rule was better at detecting clinically important injuries with a sensitivity of 100%. Prospective validation has recently been completed and should permit widespread use of the Canadian C-Spine rule.Radiographic clearance of blunt cervical spine injury: plain radiograph or computed tomography scan?The purpose of this study was to evaluate the roles of cervical spine radiographs (CSR) and computed tomography of the cervical spine (CTC) in the exclusion of cervical spine injury for adult blunt trauma patients.At the authors' institution, all adult blunt trauma patients with physical findings of posterior midline neck tenderness, altered mental status, or neurologic deficit are considered at risk of cervical spine injury and undergo both CSR and CTC for evaluation of the cervical spine. The TRACS database at level 1 of the trauma center at this institution was queried for all blunt trauma patients from November 2000 to October 2001. Patient injury severity score (ISS), Glascow Coma Score (GCS), age, gender, CSR results, CTC results, and treatment data were analyzed.The review included 3,018 blunt trauma patients with appropriate data. For 1,199 of these patients (779 men and 420 women) (40%) at risk for cervical spine injury, both CSR and CTC were performed for cervical spine evaluation. The average age of these patients was 39.4 years (range, 18-89 years). The average GCS was 13 and the average ISS was 8.4 in this study population. In 116 (9.5%) of these patients, a cervical spine injury (fracture or subluxation) was detected. The injury was identified on both CSR and CTC in 75 of these patients. In the remaining 41 patients (3.2%), the CSR results were negative, but injury was detected by CTC. All these injuries missed by CSR required treatment. For this group with false-negative CSR, the average GCS was 12 and the average ISS was 14.6. There were no missed cervical spine injuries among the patients with negative CTC results.No identifiable factors predicted false-negative CSR. There does not appear to be any role for CSR screening in this setting. The data from this study add to the growing body of evidence that CTC should replace CSR for the evaluation of the cervical spine in blunt trauma.Cervical spine clearance after trauma in children.Currently, no diagnostic or procedural standards exist for clearing the cervical spine in children after trauma. The establishment of protocols has been shown to reduce the time required to accomplish clearance and reduce the number of missed injuries. The purpose of this study was to determine if reeducation and initiation of a new protocol based on the National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study criteria could safely increase the number of pediatric cervical spines cleared by nonneurosurgical personnel.The authors collected and reviewed data regarding cervical spine clearance in children (age range 0-18 years) who presented to the emergency department at Primary Children's Medical Center in Salt Lake City, Utah, between 2001 and 2006 after sustaining significant trauma. Radiographic and clinical methods of clearing the cervical spine, as well as the type and management of injuries, were determined for two periods: Period I (January 2001-December 2003) and Period II (January 2004-February 2006). Between 2001 and 2003, 95% of 936 cervical spines were cleared by the neurosurgical service. Twenty-one ligamentous injuries (2.2%) and 12 fracture/dislocations (1.3%) were detected, and five patients (0.5%) required operative stabilization. Since January 2004, 585 (62.4%) of 937 cervical spines have been cleared by nonneurosurgical personnel. Twelve ligamentous injuries (1.3%) and 14 fracture/dislocations (1.5%) were identified, and four patients (0.4%) required operative stabilization. No late injuries were detected in either time period.The protocol outlined in the paper has been effective in detecting cervical spine injuries in children after trauma and has increased the number of cervical spines cleared by nonneurosurgical personnel by nearly 60%. Reeducation with the establishment of protocols can safely facilitate clearance of the cervical spine after trauma by nonneurosurgical personnel.Low-risk criteria for cervical-spine radiography in blunt trauma: a prospective study.Cervical-spine radiography does not need to be performed on selected blunt trauma patients who are awake, alert, nonintoxicated, do not complain of midline neck pain, and have no tenderness over the bony cervical spine.One thousand consecutive patients seen in the UCLA Emergency Medicine Center with a chief complaint of blunt trauma, for whom cervical-spine films were ordered and for whom prospective data questionnaires were completed.Clinicians completed data forms for each patient before radiograph results were known. Data items included mechanism of injury, evidence of intoxication, presence of cervical-spine pain and/or tenderness, level of alertness, presence of focal neurologic deficits, and presence of other severely painful injuries unrelated to the cervical spine. Physicians were also asked to estimate likelihood of significant cervical-spine injury.Twenty-seven patients with cervical-spine fracture were among the 974 patients for whom data forms were completed. A number of findings were statistically more common in the group of patients with fracture than without, but no single or paired findings identified all patients with fracture. All 27 patients with fracture had at least one of the following four characteristics: midline neck tenderness, evidence of intoxication, altered level of alertness, or a severely painful injury elsewhere. Three hundred fifty-three of 947 (37.3%) patients without cervical-spine fracture had none of these findings.Cervical-spine radiology may not be necessary in patients without spinous tenderness in the neck, intoxication, altered level of alertness, or other severely painful injury. A policy to limit films in such patients would have decreased film ordering by more than one third in this series, while identifying all patients with fracture.Can an out-of-hospital cervical spine clearance protocol identify all patients with injuries? An argument for selective immobilization.We sought to determine the sensitivity of the Fresno/Kings/Madera emergency medical services (EMS) selective spine immobilization protocol in identifying patients with potential cervical injuries. We also sought to determine whether the protocol was safe in the out-of-hospital setting.We conducted a retrospective chart review of all patients discharged from 5 trauma-receiving hospitals in Fresno County with the diagnosis of cervical spine injury between July 1, 1990, and June 30, 1996. All of these patients transported to the hospital by EMS personnel were selected for the study group. Medical records of those patients not immobilized were further investigated to identify protocol violations or deficiencies.There were 861 patients with significant cervical injuries during this time span. EMS personnel brought 504 patients to the hospital, of which 495 arrived in cervical spine immobilization. Of the remaining 9 patients, 2 refused immobilization, and 2 could not be immobilized; 3 injuries were missed by the protocol criteria, and 2 injuries were missed because of protocol violations. Of these last 5 patients, 1 patient had an adverse outcome, 2 injuries were considered unstable, 4 patients were older than 67 years, and one patient was 9 months old.The Fresno/Kings/Madera EMS selective spine immobilization protocol is 99% (95% CI, 97.7% to 99.7%) sensitive in identifying patients with cervical injuries for immobilization. Those patients not identified were at extremes of age. These results suggest that selective immobilization may be safely applied in the out-of-hospital setting but should be used with caution at extremes of age.Factors associated with the use of cervical spine computed tomography imaging in pediatric trauma patients.The objectives were to identify patient and hospital characteristics associated with the use of computed tomography (CT) imaging of the cervical spine (c-spine) in the evaluation of injured children and, in particular, to examine the influence of hospital setting.This was a retrospective cohort of children younger than 19 years of age from the Massachusetts Hospital Emergency Department (ED) database who were discharged from the ED with an injury diagnosis from 2005 through 2009. Multivariable logistic regression was used to analyze characteristics associated with CT imaging of the c-spine.Of the 929,626 pediatric patients diagnosed with an injury in Massachusetts EDs and then discharged home, 1.3% underwent CT imaging of the c-spine. Rates of CT imaging nearly doubled over the 5 years. In the multivariable model, patient age (adjusted odds ratio [AOR] = 2.3, 95% confidence interval [CI] = 2.0 to 2.7 for children age 12 to 18 years vs. under 1 year of age) and evaluation outside of a pediatric Level I trauma center (AOR = 2.2, 95% CI = 1.1 to 4.3 for children evaluated at non Level I trauma centers vs. pediatric Level I trauma centers; AOR = 2.1, 95% CI = 0.93 to 4.7 for children evaluated at adult Level I trauma centers vs. pediatric Level I trauma centers) were associated with higher rates of CT imaging of the c-spine.Cervical spine CT imaging for children discharged from the ED with trauma diagnoses increased from 2005 through 2009. Older age and evaluation outside a Level I pediatric trauma center were associated with a higher c-spine CT rate. Educational interventions focused outside pediatric trauma centers may be an effective approach to decreasing CT imaging of the c-spine of pediatric trauma patients.The usefulness of a modified adult protocol for the clearance of paediatric cervical spine injury in the emergency department.To determine if the use of a modified adult protocol that uses cervical spine imaging on presentation for the assessment of cervical spine injury in children improves clinical outcome.This is a case series study on all consecutive trauma patients presenting from April to July 2000 inclusive to the ED of a major paediatric trauma hospital. Children presenting to the ED with potential cervical spine injury (CSI) were identified using standard selection criteria. Patient demographics, mechanism of injury, method and time of presentation, associated injuries, radiological investigation and clinical outcome were recorded. The major outcome measures for this study were: time to clearance of the cervical spine, length of stay in the ED and admission to an in-hospital bed. Data were analysed for compliance to the protocol, this being the standard assessment pathway of cervical spine clearance used by our trauma service.The trauma registry identified 1721 trauma presentations during the 4-month study period; 208 presentations representing 200 children with potential CSI were entered into the study. Males represented 72.5% of the study population, having a mean age of 8.32 years, although 29% were less than 5 years of age. The majority of presentations (69%) occurred outside of normal working hours. In 17.8% of cases the cervical spine was cleared based on clinical assessment alone, half less than 5 years of age. Compliance to the protocol occurred in 78% of presentations. However, when examined by age group, children 5 years of age or above were 1.5 times more likely to comply with the protocol as compared with younger children. Adequate plain imaging was not obtained in 18% of presentations, this group almost exclusively less than 5 years of age. There were no missed injuries and no short or long-term neurological sequelae reported during this study. There were no differences in time to clearance, length of stay and admission rate between compliant and non-compliant groups.Modified adult protocols for cervical spine clearance offer guidance in managing the majority of children suffering blunt trauma. However, we recommend caution in rigidly applying such protocols, especially to children of young age.Clinical indications for cervical spine radiographs in alert trauma patients.Cervical spine fracture/dislocation is a potentially devastating injury that may be clinically difficult to diagnose. Therefore, a vast majority of trauma patients undergo cervical spine X rays when only a relatively small number of them will actually have a cervical spine injury. Because of the costly overuse of radiography, studies have been undertaken to define high yield criteria for evaluation of patients. This study examined the characteristics of acute cervical spine fracture/dislocation in alert trauma patients. Of 79 patients with this discharge diagnosis at St. Elizabeth Hospital Medical Center between 1982 and 1987, 47 met the criteria of Class I level of consciousness. All 47 patients complained of neck pain or demonstrated cervical tenderness to palpation. Other parameters (such as loss of consciousness, paresthesias, decreased sensation, weakness, cervical muscle spasm, decreased anal tone, and associated injuries) did not, individually or in combination with each other, consistently predict cervical spine injury. Although occult or painless cervical spine injuries have been reported in the literature, a careful review of these cases revealed that these injuries were not truly asymptomatic. Our study suggests that selected patients can be excluded from radiologic evaluation of the cervical spine. However, large prospective studies are needed to validate this finding.Cervical spine clearance in the nonalert, noncommunicative, or unreliable pediatric blunt trauma patient.Currently, there is no nationally recognized evidence-based guideline or protocol for cervical spine clearance in nonalert, noncommunicative, or unreliable pediatric blunt trauma patients. This descriptive survey study sought to identify current practices and elicit expert opinion data regarding pediatric cervical spine clearance in a specialized population of children in trauma centers in the United States. A 93-item electronic Pediatric Cervical Spine Clearance Survey was sent to 309 members of the Pediatric Special Interest Group of the National Society of Trauma Nurses. The main areas of interest in the survey included trauma verification, annual volume of pediatric trauma cases, and sequence and time frames of diagnostic testing for cervical spine clearance by age group. Additional areas of interest were perceived supports and barriers to meeting target time frames for diagnostic testing and outcomes to evaluate the impact of a cervical spine clearance guideline for pediatric blunt trauma. The results from 44 respondents demonstrate that trauma centers are using a variety of diagnostic testing sequences and time frames when clearing children for suspected cervical spine injury.Evaluation of the acute cervical spine: a management algorithm.Safe, efficient, and cost-effective evaluation of the spine is the goal in the trauma setting. At our Level I trauma facility, the trauma service, emergency medicine, radiology, anesthesia, and the spine service combined individual concerns into one agreed-upon clearance protocol. Here, we present the effectiveness of a new cervical spine clearance protocol.A retrospective review was initiated of all trauma patients evaluated in a Level I trauma center the year before and after implementation of a new cervical spine protocol to determine the incidence of missed cervical injuries. An additional 6 months were reviewed to detect any missed injuries late in the study period.During the 2-year study period, 4,460 patients presented to the emergency room with some form of cervical spine precautions. Blunt trauma comprised 90% of the study population. According to the protocol, approximately 45% required further cervical radiographs after presentation. In the preprotocol year, 77 of 2,217 (3.4%) patients were diagnosed with cervical spine injuries, 16 of 77 (21%) with multiple level of injuries, and 25 of 77 (32%) with neurologic compromise. Three of 2,217 patients had missed cervical spine injuries on their initial evaluations. In the postprotocol year, 84 of 2,243 (3.4%) patients had cervical injuries, 25 of 84 (30%) with multiple levels of injuries and 28 of 84 (28%) with neurologic compromise. No patient evaluated during the protocol year was missed. All statistics between the two groups were not significant.The current protocol by risk stratifying patients on presentation is effective in assessing patients for cervical spine injuries.Clinical clearance of the cervical spine in blunt trauma patients younger than 3 years: a multi-center study of the american association for the surgery of trauma.Cervical spine clearance in the very young child is challenging. Radiographic imaging to diagnose cervical spine injuries (CSI) even in the absence of clinical findings is common, raising concerns about radiation exposure and imaging-related complications. We examined whether simple clinical criteria can be used to safely rule out CSI in patients younger than 3 years.The trauma registries from 22 level I or II trauma centers were reviewed for the 10-year period (January 1995 to January 2005). Blunt trauma patients younger than 3 years were identified. The measured outcome was CSI. Independent predictors of CSI were identified by univariate and multivariate analysis. A weighted score was calculated by assigning 1, 2, or 3 points to each independent predictor according to its magnitude of effect. The score was established on two thirds of the population and validated using the remaining one third.Of 12,537 patients younger than 3 years, CSI was identified in 83 patients (0.66%), eight had spinal cord injury. Four independent predictors of CSI were identified: Glasgow Coma Score <14, GCSEYE = 1, motor vehicle crash, and age 2 years or older. A score of <2 had a negative predictive value of 99.93% in ruling out CSI. A total of 8,707 patients (69.5% of all patients) had a score of <2 and were eligible for cervical spine clearance without imaging. There were no missed CSI in this study.CSI in patients younger than 3 years is uncommon. Four simple clinical predictors can be used in conjunction to the physical examination to substantially reduce the use of radiographic imaging in this patient population.Evaluation of the use of plain cervical spine radiography in patients with head injury.The records of 457 head trauma patients who underwent plain cervical spine radiography following head injury between January 1991 and December 1991 inclusive were reviewed. Seventy-six patients (17%) all above ten years of age had abnormalities; forty five were clinically suspected to have cervical spine injury because of cervical tenderness and/or neurological deficits and in the remaining thirty-one patients the cervical spine injuries were detected first on plain radiograph. The 31 vertebral injuries consisted off fracture-dislocations 12 fractures, 4 dislocations and one odontoid fracture. None of the 235 patients below the age of 10 years had cervical vertebral or cord injury. It is recommended that plain cervical spine radiography be performed on all patients with head injury associated with altered level of consciousness and who are above ten years of age.Removing the pediatric cervical collar: current practice patterns.To identify the current practice patterns of emergency medicine practitioners and the typical criteria used in discontinuing cervical spine immobilization (CSI) in the pediatric patient.Mail-in survey.All physicians on the mailing list of the American Academy of Pediatrics Section of Emergency Medicine and an equal number of randomly chosen members of the American College of Emergency Physicians. The total number of participants was 1360.The survey consisted of a case scenario describing a 3-year-old child brought to the emergency department with CSI. The approach to such a scenario was assessed. Surveys were mailed with self-addressed stamped envelopes; repeat mailings were sent at 4 and 8 weeks after the first mailing. Those not currently in active practice or not involved in the decision to discontinue CSI were excluded from the study.The response rate was 55%. Most respondents were younger than 44 years (71%), in practice less than 10 years (56%), and practiced in an urban setting (68%). Nearly two thirds (62.6%) had completed residency training in pediatrics, 24% in emergency medicine and 36% a pediatric emergency medicine fellowship. Most (63%) would discontinue CSI without obtaining radiographs. Factors associated with removal were residency training in pediatrics and being in practice for less than 10 years. The most common criteria for discontinuing CSI were normal neurological (96%) and cervical spine (98%) examinations, normal mental status (92%), and absence of neck pain (93%).Discontinuing CSI without obtaining radiographs is common, especially among those with residency training in pediatrics and those in practice for less than 10 years. Knowledge of current practice is essential to future development of guidelines for managing pediatric trauma patients for whom cervical spine injury is a consideration.Prehospital clinical clearance of the cervical spine: a prospective study.Physician clinical clearance of the cervical spine after blunt trauma is practiced in many trauma centers. Prehospital clinical clearance of the cervical spine (c-spine) performed by emergency medical services (EMS) personnel can decrease cost, improve patient comfort, decrease complications, and decrease prehospital time. The purpose of this study was to assess whether EMS personnel can effectively clinically clear the c-spine of injury in the prehospital setting. All paramedics from a single urban fire department were trained in clinical clearance of the c-spine. During the 14-month period from January 2008 through March 2009, clinical examination of the c-spine was performed by paramedics on blunt trauma patients in the prehospital setting. Paramedics immobilized the c-spine and delivered the patients to the University of South Alabama Medical Center. After trauma center arrival, paramedics documented their clinical examination of the c-spine in a computerized data collection form. Paramedic clinical findings were compared with trauma surgeon clinical examination findings and computed tomographic findings of the c-spine. All patients had prehospital Glasgow Coma Score 14 or greater. Patients were not excluded for distracting injuries. One hundred ninety-three blunt trauma patients were entered. Sixty-five (34%) c-spines were clinically cleared by EMS. There were no known missed injuries in this patient group. Eight (6%) patients who were not clinically cleared by EMS were diagnosed with c-spine injury. Trauma surgeons clinically cleared 135 (70%) of the patients with no known missed injury. EMS personnel in the prehospital setting may reliably and effectively perform clinical clearance of the c-spine. Further prospective study for prehospital c-spine clinical clearance is warranted. Cervical spine injury: a clinical decision rule to identify high-risk patients for helical CT screening.We aimed to validate the routine use of a clinical decision rule to direct diagnostic imaging of adult blunt trauma patients at high risk for cervical spine injury.We previously developed and have since routinely used a prediction rule based on six clinical parameters to identify patients at greater than 5% risk of cervical spine injury to undergo screening helical CT of the cervical spine. During a 6-month period, 4285 screening imaging studies of the cervical spine were performed in adult blunt trauma patients. Six hundred one patients (398 males, 203 females; age range, 16-100 years; median age, 38 years) underwent helical CT, and the remainder underwent 3684 conventional radiographic examinations. Clinical and report data were extracted from the radiology department database, medical records, and the hospital trauma registry. Abnormal findings were independently confirmed by additional imaging studies, autopsy results, or clinical outcome.The true-positive cervical spine injury rates in helical CT- and conventional radiography-screened patients who presented directly to our trauma center were 40 (8.7%) of 462 and seven (0.2%) of 3684, respectively. The cervical spine injury rate in patients who were transferred from outside institutions to our trauma center and who underwent helical CT was 37 (26.6%) of 139. This figure included 20 patients already known to have cervical spine fracture.The clinical decision rule can distinguish patients at high and low risk of cervical spine injury, thus supporting its validity.Screening cervical spine CT in the emergency department, phase 3: increasing effectiveness of imaging.The aim of this study was to determine the effect of a clinical education initiative on the appropriate utilization of screening cervical spine CT in the emergency department. The purpose was to assess if clinical education can produce stricter adherence to the ACR Appropriateness Criteria and improve the utilization of screening CT examinations in the emergency department.Institutional review board approval was obtained for this HIPAA-compliant study. All adult patients presenting to a level 1 trauma center with blunt trauma prompting screening cervical spine CT were eligible. For each study, the requesting clinician completed a survey selecting all clinical indications. CT examinations were evaluated by a board-certified radiologist blinded to survey data. Results were compared with retrospective and prospective studies performed before the institution of the education initiative.Of the 388 cervical spine CT examinations performed, 12 (3.1%) were positive for acute cervical spine injury, compared to only 1.0% before the clinical education program (phase 2). Of the 376 examinations without injury, 13% met all 5 National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study criteria for nonimaging (down from 16.1% in phase 2), and 15 (4%) required no imaging when both National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study and abbreviated Canadian cervical spine rule criteria were applied.Implementation of a clinical education initiative resulted in improved adherence to ACR Appropriateness Criteria and improved clinical effectiveness of the studies by increasing fracture detection rate. Initiatives such as these could potentially influence imaging overutilization without burdening emergency department clinicians with excessive roadblocks to image ordering.Risk factors for cervical spine injury.The early recognition of cervical spine injury remains a top priority of acute trauma care. Missed diagnoses can lead to exacerbation of an existing injury and potentially devastating consequences. We sought to identify predictors of cervical spine injury.Trauma registry records for blunt trauma patients cared for at a Level I Trauma Centre from 1997 to 2002 were examined. Cervical spine injury included all cervical dislocations, fractures, fractures with spinal cord injury, and isolated spinal cord injuries. Univariate and adjusted odds ratios (ORs) were calculated to identify potential risk factors. Variables and two-way interaction terms were subjected to multivariate analysis using backward conditional stepwise logistic regression.Data from 18,644 patients, with 55,609 injuries, were examined. A total of 1255 individuals (6.7%) had cervical spine injuries. Motor Vehicle Collision (MVC) (odds ratio (OR) of 1.61 (1.26, 2.06)), fall (OR of 2.14 (1.63, 2.79)), age <40 (OR of 1.75 (1.38-2.17)), pelvic fracture (OR of 9.18 (6.96, 12.11)), Injury Severity Score (ISS) >15 (OR of 7.55 (6.16-9.25)), were all significant individual predictors of cervical spine injury. Neither facial fracture nor head injury alone were associated with an increased risk of cervical spine injury. Significant interactions between pelvic fracture and fall and pelvic fracture and head injury were associated with a markedly increased risk of cervical spine (OR 19.6 (13.1, 28.8)) and (OR 27.2 (10.0-51.3)).MVC and falls were independently associated with cervical spine injury. Pelvic fracture and fall and pelvic fracture and head injury, had a greater than multiplicative interaction and high risk for cervical spine injury, warranting increased vigilance in the evaluation of patients with this combination of injuries.Evaluation of acute cervical spine imaging based on ACR Appropriateness Criteria®.The objectives of this study were to determine the rate of acute blunt cervical spine injury at an academic urban level 1 trauma center and to evaluate the utilization of cervical spine imaging based on the established American College of Radiology (ACR) Appropriateness Criteria®. We retrospectively reviewed all radiography and CT imaging of the cervical spine performed over a year period in adult patients presenting with acute blunt cervical spine trauma. Exclusion criteria were children ≤17 years, non-acute trauma of ≥72 h, and penetrating trauma. Any fracture, dislocation, or ligamentous instability demonstrated by diagnostic imaging and requiring stabilization or specialized follow-up was defined as clinically significant cervical spine injury. A total of 1,325 cervical spine studies were reviewed in 1,245 patients; 32.7% (433/1,325) were cervical spine radiographs and 67.3% (892/1,325) were CT examinations. Approximately 1.5% (19/1,245) of the patients demonstrated clinically significant acute cervical spine injury. There were 6.4% (80/1,245) patients who received both cervical spine radiographs and CT as imaging evaluation. Based on the ACR Appropriateness Criteria®, all of the cervical spine radiographs performed (433) were determined to be "inappropriate" imaging in the setting of acute cervical spine injury.Routine cervical spine radiography for trauma victims: Does everybody need it?The purpose of this study was to evaluate the indication for routine cervical spine radiography in trauma patients.Prospective analysis of radiologic and clinical findings was performed during a 5-year period. Patients suitable for a clinical decision rule were reviewed separately.Of the 1,757 consecutive patients included in the study, 38 were diagnosed with a cervical spine injury. Of the 599 patients suitable for the clinical decision rule, 62 had midline cervical tenderness, including 2 with cervical spine injury. No additional cervical spine injuries were found during follow-up.It is within good practice, and it is also cost-effective, to obtain a cervical spine radiograph only on clinical parameters in trauma patients with no apparent bodily trauma and optimal parameters. With this clinical decision rule, 30.6% of all cervical spine series were redundant, and no (occult) spinal fractures would have been undetected.A multidisciplinary approach to the development of a cervical spine clearance protocol: process, rationale, and initial results.Assessment of potential spine injuries is inconsistent and controversial. Subsequent morbidity includes prolonged immobilization and missed injuries. To address these issues, a multidisciplinary team was organized to design a cervical spine management/clearance pathway. The process, algorithm, and initial results are described.Team members consisted of pediatric surgeons, orthopedic surgeons, neurosurgeons, emergency room physicians, and trauma nurse practitioners. Nationwide standards, guidelines, and experiences across disciplines were reviewed, and a consensus pathway evolved for cervical spine clearance in children 8 years and younger. A short-term retrospective review (5 months) was performed to assess initial performance. Time required for clearance, number and type of imaging studies, and number of missed injuries were compared between a group of patients before (n = 71) and after (n = 56) the implementation of the pathway.Strict guidelines for cervical spine immobilization and clearance criteria were defined. After implementation of this pathway, time required for cervical clearance in nonintubated children decreased (before, 12.3 +/- 1.5 v after, 7.5 +/- 0.9 hours; P =.014). A clear trend toward earlier clearance in intubated patients existed (before [n = 6], 40.0 +/- 16.8 v after [n = 6], 19.4 +/- 8.1 hours; P =.10); there need to be larger numbers to determine statistical significance. The 2 study groups were similar in age; mechanism of injury; Glasgow coma scale score; and number of plain x-rays, computed tomography scans, and magnetic resonance imaging studies obtained. Neither group had missed injuries.standards for cervical spine immobilization, assessment, and clearance. Implementation of such guidelines decreased time for cervical spine clearance, and ongoing analysis of sensitivity is encouraging.Clearing the cervical spine: initial radiologic evaluation.The identification of unstable cervical spine injury (UCSI) in blunt high-energy transfer injury (BHETI) patients is critical to management. In a prospective study of BHETI patients identified to be at high risk for UCSI, the use of lateral cervical spine view (LCV), three-view cervical spine series (FCS), and limited computerized tomography (CT) in the initial evaluation of these patients was analyzed. Thirteen of 204 patients sustained UCSI. Sensitivity of the LCV alone was 0.85 and the predictive value of the negative test was 0.97. Sensitivity and predictive value of a negative study were maximized by the use of FCS combined with CT when plain X-rays were inadequate. We conclude that technically adequate, normal FCS can be safely used to eliminate the presence of UCSI. If these studies are technically inadequate, the addition of a limited CT can be used to "clear" the spine.Canadian C-spine Rule and the National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Low-Risk Criteria for C-spine radiography in young trauma patients.The Canadian C-spine (cervical spine) Rule (CCR) and the National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Low-Risk Criteria (NLC) are criteria designed to guide C-spine radiography in trauma patients. It is unclear how these 2 rules compare with young children.This study retrospectively examined case-matched trauma patients 10 years or younger. Two cohorts were identified-cohort A where C-spine imaging was performed and cohort B where no imaging was conducted. The CCR and NLC criteria were then applied retrospectively to each cohort.Cohort A contained 125 cases and cohort B with 250 cases. Seven patients (3%) had significant C-spine injuries. In cohort A, NLC criteria could be applied in 108 (86.4%) of 125 and CCR in 109 (87.2%) of 125. National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Low-Risk Criteria suggested that 70 (58.3%) cases required C-spine imaging compared to 93 (76.2%) by CCR. National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Low-Risk Criteria missed 3 C-spine injuries, and CCR missed one. In cohort B, NLC criteria could be applied in 132 (88%) of 150 and CCR in 131 (87.3%) of 150. The NLC criteria identified 8 cases and CCR identified 13 cases that would need C-spine radiographs. Fisher's 2-sided Exact test demonstrated that CCR and NLC predictions were significantly different (P = .002) in both cohorts. The sensitivity of CCR was 86% and specificity was 94%, and the NLC had a sensitivity of 43% and a specificity of 96%.Although CCR and NLC criteria may reduce the need for C-spine imaging in children 10 years and younger; they are not sensitive or specific enough to be used as currently designed.Screening cervical spine CT in the emergency department, Phase 2: A prospective assessment of use.The National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study Low-Risk Criteria were established to identify patients with a low probability of cervical spine injury in whom imaging of the cervical spine was unnecessary. The purpose of this study was to ascertain the number of unnecessary cervical spine CT studies on the basis of proper application of established clinical guidelines and, secondarily, to determine indications for ordering studies in the absence of guideline criteria.All patients presenting to a level I trauma center for whom a screening cervical spine CT was ordered in the setting of blunt trauma were eligible for enrollment. For each study, the requesting clinician completed a survey regarding study indications. CT examinations were evaluated by a board-certified radiologist blinded to survey data to determine the presence or absence of cervical spine injury.Of 507 CT examinations, 5 (1%) were positive and 497 (98.0%) were negative for acute cervical spine injury. Five studies (1%) were indeterminate for acute injury but demonstrated no abnormality on subsequent imaging and clinical follow-up. Of the 502 studies without cervical spine injury, 81 (16.1%) were imaged despite meeting all 5 NEXUS criteria for nonimaging. Of these, the most common study indication was dangerous mechanism of injury (48.1%) followed by subjective neck pain (40.7%).Strict application of NEXUS criteria could potentially reduce the number of screening cervical spine CT scans in the setting of blunt trauma; this change would avoid a considerable amount of unnecessary radiation and cost.Detection of pediatric cervical spine injury.In evaluating the pediatric cervical spine for injury, the use of adult protocols without sufficient sensitivity to pediatric injury patterns may lead to excessive radiation doses. Data on injury location and means of detection can inform pediatric-specific guideline development.We retrospectively identified pediatric patients with codes from the International Classification of Diseases, 9th Revision, for cervical spine injury treated between 1980 and 2000. Collected data included physical findings, radiographic means of detection, and location of injury. Sensitivity of plain x-rays and diagnostic yield from additional radiographic studies were calculated.Of 239 patients, 190 had true injuries and adequate medical records; of these, 187 had adequate radiology records. Patients without radiographic abnormality were excluded. In 34 children younger than 8 years, National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study criteria missed two injuries (sensitivity, 94%), with 76% of injuries occurring from occiput-C2. In 158 children older than 8 years, National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study criteria identified all injured patients (sensitivity, 100%), with 25% of injuries occurring from occiput-C2. For children younger than 8 years, plain-film sensitivity was 75% and combination plain-film/occiput-C3 computed tomographic scan had a sensitivity of 94%, whereas combination plain-film and flexion-extension views had 81% sensitivity. In patients older than 8 years, the sensitivities were 93%, 97%, and 94%, respectively.Younger children tend to have more rostral (occiput-C2) injuries compared with older children. The National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study protocol may have lower sensitivity in young children than in adults. Limited computed tomography from occiput-C3 may increase diagnostic yield appreciably in young children compared with flexion-extension views. Further prospective studies, especially of young children, are needed to develop reliable pediatric protocols.[The cervical spine of children in the x-ray and clinical picture].Clearing the cervical spine in victims of blunt trauma.Cervical spine injuries occur in 2.3% to 6.4% of victims of blunt trauma. The difficulty of identifying the minority of patients with cervical spine injuries continues to challenge those who triage and treat the acutely injured. We retrospectively reviewed our practice for cervical spine clearance, which consists of three-view plain radiographs supplemented by focused further studies, such as computed or plain film tomography and flexion/extension views, as needed. Fifty-four patients with cervical spine injuries were identified during a 39-month period, which represented approximately 1% of the patients evaluated. Eighty cervical spine injuries were found, of which nine were missed. Review of the six patients in whom the nine cervical spine injuries were missed demonstrated error in the interpretation of radiographic studies in five patients, only two of whom were felt to have technically adequate films in hindsight. We conclude that a protocol based on three-view plain film radiographs supplemented by focused additional studies will allow the visualization of virtually all cervical spine injuries and that the main cause of missed injuries is errors of interpretation.Cervical spine evaluation in obtunded or comatose pediatric trauma patients: A pilot study.A uniformly accepted protocol for evaluation and clearance of the cervical spine of pediatric trauma patients with altered mental status does not currently exist. We sought to detect cervical spine injuries in this group with minimal risk. Patients were evaluated with standard three-view cervical spine radiographs and CT when necessary. Those patients without radiographic abnormality and altered mental status underwent flexion-extension of the cervical spine using fluoroscopy with somatosensory evoked potential (SSEP) monitoring. Those with abnormal movement by fluoroscopy or changes in SSEP underwent MRI. Fifteen patients were evaluated with this protocol. Two patients had movement on flexion-extension of the cervical spine and 5 had SSEP changes. Three patients had an MRI with only 1 showing injury. Five patients had residual hemiparesis. Evaluation of the cervical spine in obtunded or comatose pediatric trauma patients can be done safely with flexion-extension under fluoroscopy and SSEP monitoring. Further prospective studies are required to determine the efficacy of SSEP monitoring for cervical spine clearance in this select population.Cervical spine injuries to children under 11: should we use radiography more selectively in their initial assessment?To assess the effectiveness of cervical spine radiography in injured children under 11 years old, and suggest improvements.Retrospective survey of radiographs and accident and emergency records for children examined during a one year period in a large teaching hospital.No cervical spine fractures occurred in this age group during the year. The recorded clinical findings did not always justify radiography.Clinical examination appears undervalued by those assessing injured children and is poorly recorded. Radiography can be used more selectively. Initial assessment using a single lateral projection can be followed in doubtful cases by cross sectional imaging.Developing a spinal clearance protocol for unconscious pediatric trauma patients.Spinal injury in pediatric trauma is associated with significant morbidity and mortality, but no current consensus exists on the safest and most effective method of clearance in the high-risk pediatric trauma patient.A retrospective analysis was performed on the records of 115 pediatric patients who had suffered major trauma and required admission to the pediatric intensive care unit of a United Kingdom level I trauma centre during a 7-year period from January 2000 to December 2006. The spinal imaging performed, and methods of clearance for each spinal region were obtained from analysis of written and electronic medical documentation.In the cohort of 115 patients, there was a male predominance (63%) with motor vehicle accidents as the major mechanism of injury (63.5%). Ten patients (8.7%) were identified with spinal injuries, all of whom had sustained closed head injuries. Two of these patients had spinal cord injuries; one subsequently died. Spinal injury resulted in longer intubation times and intensive care stays, but no difference in new injury severity score or outcome. Clearance methods ranged from clinical examination to imaging with radiographs, computed tomography (CT), and dynamic screening. Magnetic resonance imaging was used as a secondary modality in two cases only, and in neither case was it used for clearance. CT demonstrated 100% specificity and sensitivity with positive and negative predictive values of 1 for all spinal regions. There were no cases of Spinal Cord Injury WithOut Radiologic Abnormality and no evidence of missed injuries.There is a need for an evidence-based protocol for the clearance of the spine in the obtunded and high-risk pediatric trauma patient. High-resolution CT with sagittal and coronal reconstructions should be the basis for cervical spinal clearance, in combination with the interpretation of films by an expert radiologist. All spinal regions should be imaged, and clearance should be formally documented. The role of magnetic resonance imaging in routine clearance remains controversial. Multicenter prospective studies are needed to develop consensus for an evidenced-based protocol for clearance in this high-risk group.A prospective analysis of a two-year experience using computed tomography as an adjunct for cervical spine clearance.The role of CT scanning as an adjunct to plain roentgenograms of the cervical spine was reviewed in acutely injured blunt trauma patients. Following institution of a protocol to evaluate the cervical spine in all blunt trauma patients, 179 patients underwent CT scanning of their cervical spine. This was performed for patients whose x-ray findings were positive, for patients with plain x-ray films suggestive of a pathologic condition, for patients with plain x-ray films that did not reveal all of the cervical vertebrae, and for patients who had persistent pain or neurologic deficits despite normal plain x-ray films. Of 123 patients not able to have their cervical spine cleared by normal roentgenograms, 93% were cleared within 24 hours of admission based on CT scans. There were no missed injuries in this setting. A false-positive rate of 28% and a false-negative rate of 1.5% were found for plain roentgenograms. Computed tomographic scans detected 98% of the injuries in our study and when combined with a three-view plain x-ray series of the cervical spine, 100% of cervical spine injuries were detected. Computed tomographic scanning as an adjunct to plain x-ray films of the cervical spine is a highly accurate and expedient modality to clear the cervical spine of blunt trauma patients.Retrospective application of the NEXUS low-risk criteria for cervical spine radiography in Canadian emergency departments.We evaluate the accuracy, reliability, and potential impact of the National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study (NEXUS) low-risk criteria for cervical spine radiography, when applied in Canadian emergency departments (EDs).The Canadian C-Spine Rule derivation study was a prospective cohort study conducted in 10 Canadian EDs that recruited alert and stable adult trauma patients. Physicians completed a 20-item data form for each patient and performed interobserver assessments when feasible. The prospective assessments included the 5 individual NEXUS criteria but not an explicit interpretation of the overall need for radiography according to the criteria. Patients underwent plain radiography, flexion-extension views, and computed tomography at the discretion of the treating physician. Patients who did not have radiography were followed up with a structured outcome assessment by telephone to determine clinically important cervical spine injury, a previously validated outcome measurement. Analyses included sensitivity and specificity with 95% confidence interval (CI), kappa coefficient, and potential radiography rates.Among 8,924 patients, 151 (1.7%) patients had an important cervical spine injury. The combined NEXUS criteria identified important cervical spine injury with a sensitivity of 92.7% (95% CI 87% to 96%) and a specificity of 37.8% (95% CI 37% to 39%). Application of the NEXUS criteria would have potentially reduced cervical spine radiography rates by 6.1% from the actual rate of 68.9% to 62.8%. Of 11 patients with important injuries not identified, 2 were treated with internal fixation and 3 with a halo.This retrospective validation found the NEXUS low-risk criteria to be less sensitive than previously reported. The NEXUS low-risk criteria should be further explicitly and prospectively evaluated for accuracy and reliability before widespread clinical use outside of the United States.Cervical injury in head trauma.Criteria for excluding cervical spine injury in patients who have sustained blunt head or neck trauma were prospectively studied at four hospitals in the Chicago area. The authors attempted to define a subset of these adult patients who, based on clinical criteria, could reliably be excluded from cervical spine radiography, thus avoiding unnecessary radiation and saving considerable time and money in their evaluation. Patients fell into four groups: (1) patients who were awake, alert, and had no complaint of neck pain or tenderness on physical examination; (2) patients who were awake, alert, but had complaint of neck pain or tenderness on physical examination laterally over the trapezius muscle only; (3) patients who were awake, alert, but had complaint of central neck pain or tenderness on physical examination over the cervical spine or center of the neck; and (4) patients who were not fully awake or alert, were clinically intoxicated, had other painful or distracting injuries, or had focal neurologic findings. Patients in group 4 had significantly more fractures (21/387) when compared with all other patients (7/478). Patients with central neck pain or tenderness (group 3) had significantly more fractures (7/237) than patients without pain or tenderness or with these findings limited to the trapezius area (0/236). It is clear that patients who have altered mental status, abnormal examination findings, distracting injury, or pain or tenderness over the cervical spine must have cervical spine radiographs.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Utility of a cervical spine clearance protocol after trauma in children between 0 and 3 years of age.Cervical spine clearance after trauma in children 0-3 years of age is deceptively difficult. Young children may not be able to communicate effectively, and severe injuries may require intubation and sedation. Currently, no published guidelines are available to aid in decision-making in these complex situations. The purpose of this study was to determine whether a safe and effective protocol-driven system could be developed for clearance of the cervical spine in noncommunicative children between 0 and 3 years of age.Children 0-3 years of age, including intubated patients, who were admitted after trauma activation at Primary Children's Medical Center in Salt Lake City or the Children's Hospital of New York from 2002 to 2006 were managed according to a cervical spine clearance protocol. Data were collected in a prospective fashion. Radiographic and clinical methods of clearing the cervical spine, as well as the type and management of injuries, were recorded.A total of 2828 pediatric trauma activations required cervical spine clearance during the study period. Of these, 575 (20%) were children <or= 3 years of age who were admitted to the hospital. To facilitate clearing the cervical spine in these children, plain radiographs (100%), CT studies (14%), and MR images (10%) were obtained. Nineteen ligamentous injuries (3.3%) and 9 fractures/dislocations (1.5%) were detected, with 4 patients requiring operative stabilization (0.7%). No late injuries have been detected.The protocol used has been effective in detecting cervical spine injuries in noncommunicative children after trauma. The combination of clinical information and radiographic studies is essential for safely clearing the cervical spine in these complex situations. Clearance of the cervical spine without CT or MR imaging studies is possible in the majority of cases, even in very young patients.Cervical spine clearance in blunt trauma: evaluation of a computed tomography-based protocol.Prompt identification of cervical spine injuries has been a critical issue in trauma management. In 1998, the authors developed a new protocol to evaluate cervical spines in blunt trauma. This protocol relies on clinical clearance for appropriate patients and helical computed tomography instead of plain radiographs for patients who cannot be clinically cleared. The authors then prospectively collected data on all cervical spine evaluations to assess the sensitivity and specificity of their approach.Any patient without clinical evidence of neurologic injury, alcohol or drug intoxication, or distracting injury underwent cervical spine evaluation by clinical examination. Patients who did not meet these criteria underwent helical computed tomographic scanning of the entire cervical spine. For patients who had neurologic deficits, a magnetic resonance image was obtained. If the patient was not evaluable secondary to coma, the computed tomographic scan was without abnormality, and the patient was moving all four extremities at arrival in the emergency department, the cervical spine was cleared, and spinal precautions were removed. Data were collected for all patients admitted to Santa Barbara Cottage Hospital trauma service between 1999 and 2002. The authors selected for analysis patients with blunt trauma and further identified those with closed head injuries (Glasgow Coma Scale score < 15 and loss of consciousness). In addition, all blunt cervical spine injuries were reviewed.During the period of study, 2,854 trauma patients were admitted, of whom 2,603 (91%) had blunt trauma. Of these, 1,462 (56%) had closed head injuries. One hundred patients (7% of patients admitted for blunt trauma) had cervical spine or spinal cord injuries, of which 99 were identified by the authors' protocol. Only one injury was not appreciated in a patient with syringomyelia. Fifteen percent of patients with spinal cord injury had no radiographic abnormality; all of these patients presented with neurologic deficits. The sensitivity for detecting cervical spine injury was thus 99%, and the specificity was 100%. The risk of missing a cervical spine injury in these blunt trauma patients was 0.04%. The authors missed no spine injuries in patients with head injuries.The use of the authors' protocol resulted in excellent sensitivity and specificity in detecting cervical spine injuries. In addition, it allowed early removal of spinal precautions.What defines a distracting injury in cervical spine assessment?The National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study defined five criteria for obtaining cervical spine radiographic investigations in blunt trauma patients. Distracting injury was given as the indication for more than 30% of all x-ray studies ordered. The hypothesis of this study was that upper and lower torso injuries would have different effects on clinical cervical spine assessment.This is a single-center, prospective, observational study of admitted, alert, adult blunt-trauma patients. All patients underwent cervical spine plain-film radiography. Data were collected on all injuries, physical examination findings, narcotic administration, and radiograph results. Patients with upper and lower torso injuries were compared in their ability complain of pain or midline tenderness relative to a cervical spine fracture.In all, 406 patients participated. All patients received narcotic analgesics before examination. Forty patients (9.9%) had cervical spine fractures, of whom seven had a nontender neck examination. All seven patients with a nontender cervical spine and a neck fracture had at least one upper torso injury. None of the 99 patients with injuries isolated to the lower torso and a nontender neck had a cervical spine fracture (p < 0.05). The frequency of cervical spine fracture among patients with cervical spine tenderness was 19.8% (n = 33).The National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study definition of a distracting injury may be narrowed. Upper torso injuries may be sufficiently painful to distract from a reliable cervical spine examination. Patients may detect spine tenderness in the presence of isolated painful lower torso injuries. Patients with spine tenderness warrant imaging.Epidemiology and predictors of spinal injury in adult major trauma patients: European cohort study.This is a European cohort study on predictors of spinal injury in adult (≥16 years) major trauma patients, using prospectively collected data of the Trauma Audit and Research Network from 1988 to 2009. Predictors for spinal fractures/dislocations or spinal cord injury were determined using univariate and multivariate logistic regression analysis. 250,584 patients were analysed. 24,000 patients (9.6%) sustained spinal fractures/dislocations alone and 4,489 (1.8%) sustained spinal cord injury with or without fractures/dislocations. Spinal injury patients had a median age of 44.5 years (IQR = 28.8-64.0) and Injury Severity Score of 9 (IQR = 4-17). 64.9% were male. 45% of patients suffered associated injuries to other body regions. Age <45 years (≥45 years OR 0.83-0.94), Glasgow Coma Score (GCS) 3-8 (OR 1.10, 95% CI 1.02-1.19), falls >2 m (OR 4.17, 95% CI 3.98-4.37), sports injuries (OR 2.79, 95% CI 2.41-3.23) and road traffic collisions (RTCs) (OR 1.91, 95% CI 1.83-2.00) were predictors for spinal fractures/dislocations. Age <45 years (≥45 years OR 0.78-0.90), male gender (female OR 0.78, 95% CI 0.72-0.85), GCS <15 (OR 1.36-1.93), associated chest injury (OR 1.10, 95% CI 1.01-1.20), sports injuries (OR 3.98, 95% CI 3.04-5.21), falls >2 m (OR 3.60, 95% CI 3.21-4.04), RTCs (OR 2.20, 95% CI 1.96-2.46) and shooting (OR 1.91, 95% CI 1.21-3.00) were predictors for spinal cord injury. Multilevel injury was found in 10.4% of fractures/dislocations and in 1.3% of cord injury patients. As spinal trauma occurred in >10% of major trauma patients, aggressive evaluation of the spine is warranted, especially, in males, patients <45 years, with a GCS <15, concomitant chest injury and/or dangerous injury mechanisms (falls >2 m, sports injuries, RTCs and shooting). Diagnostic imaging of the whole spine and a diligent search for associated injuries are substantial.Screening cervical spine CT in a level I trauma center: overutilization?The objective of our study was to analyze the use of screening cervical spine CT performed after trauma and establish the opportunity of potentially avoidable studies when evidence-based clinical criteria are applied before imaging.All cervical spine CT examinations performed in the emergency department of a level 1 trauma center between January and December 2008 on adult patients with trauma were analyzed; 1589 studies were evaluated. Radiology reports and clinical data were reviewed for the presence of fracture or ligamentous injury and for the mode of injury. We also looked for documentation of clinical criteria used to perform the CT study. In particular, we looked for mention of posterior midline cervical tenderness, focal neurologic deficit, level of alertness, evidence of intoxication, and clinically apparent distracting injury. These five criteria were established by the National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study (NEXUS) to identify patients with a low probability of cervical spine injury who consequently needed no cervical spine imaging.Of the 1589 studies reviewed, 41 (2.6%) were positive for an acute cervical spine injury and 1524 (95.9%) were negative. The remaining 24 studies (1.5%) were indeterminate on the initial CT examination but subsequent imaging and clinical follow-up failed to show acute injury. Of the 1524 examinations with no acute injury, 364 (23.9%) had no documentation of any of the five NEXUS low-risk criteria.The strict application of the NEXUS low-risk criteria could potentially reduce the number of screening cervical spine CT examinations in the setting of trauma in more than 20% of cases, thereby avoiding a significant amount of unnecessary radiation and significant cost.Use of plain radiography to screen for cervical spine injuries.Standard radiographic screening may fail to reveal any evidence of injury in some patients with spinal injury. The purposes of this investigation were to document the efficacy of standard radiographic views and to categorize the frequencies and types of injuries missed on plain radiographic screening of the cervical spine.All patients with blunt trauma selected for radiographic cervical spine imaging at 21 participating institutions underwent a standard 3-view series (cross-table lateral, anteroposterior, and odontoid views), as well as any other imaging deemed necessary by their physicians. Injuries detected with screening radiography were then compared with final injury status for each patient, as determined by review of all radiographic studies.The study enrolled 34,069 patients with blunt trauma, including 818 patients (2.40% of all patients; 95% confidence interval [CI] 2.40% to 2.40%) having a total of 1,496 distinct cervical spine injuries. Plain radiographs revealed 932 injuries in 498 patients (1.46% of all patients; 95% CI 1.46% to 1.46%) but missed 564 injuries in 320 patients (0.94% of all patients; 95% CI 0.94% to 0.94%). The majority of missed injuries (436 injuries in 237 patients [representing 0.80% of all patients]; 95% CI 0.80% to 0.80%) occurred in cases in which plain radiographs were interpreted as abnormal (but not diagnostic of injury) or inadequate. However, 23 patients (0.07% of all patients; 95% CI 0.05% to 0.09%) had 35 injuries (including 3 potentially unstable injuries) that were not visualized on adequate plain film imaging. These patients represent 2.81% (95% CI 1.89% to 3.63%) of all injured patients with blunt trauma undergoing radiographic evaluation.Standard 3-view imaging provides reliable screening for most patients with blunt trauma. However, on rare occasions, such imaging may fail to detect significant unstable injuries. In addition, it is difficult to obtain adequate plain radiographic imaging in a substantial minority of patients.Computed tomography alone may clear the cervical spine in obtunded blunt trauma patients: a prospective evaluation of a revised protocol.Cervical spine (CS) clearance in obtunded blunt trauma patients (OBTPs) remains controversial. When computed tomography (CT) of the CS is negative for injury, debate continues over the role of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI). Use of MRI in OBTPs is costly, time-consuming, and potentially dangerous. Our study evaluated the safety of a protocol to discontinue the cervical collar in OBTPs based on CT scan alone.A prospective study was performed from October 2006 to September 2008 at a regional Level I trauma center on OBTPs with gross movement of all extremities. After a CT of the CS was read as negative for injury, the CS was cleared and the collar was removed. Patients were then followed prospectively for related complications.One hundred ninety-seven patients had their collars removed and CS cleared at a mean of 3.3 days. There were 144 males (73%), and the average age was 47.1 years. Sixty-two percent of patients were reexamined by a physician when no longer obtunded and found to have no CS signs or symptoms. Five patients (2.5%), when no longer obtunded, had persistent pain for which MRI CS was negative for injury. Coroner reports and autopsies were reviewed for missed spinal cord injuries in the 13% who died before reexamination. One of these patients had an autopsy report of an isolated CS ligamentous injury, deemed to be stable by our attending neurosurgeon. We followed up an additional 12% by phone or chart review, with no report of new onset neurologic deficit. The remaining 11% were lost to follow-up, but no patient contacted our hospital to report deterioration in function. One patient (0.5%) developed a minor CS decubitus ulceration.Removal of CS precautions in OBTPs with gross movement of all extremities is safe and efficacious if CT CS is negative for injury. Supplemental MRI CS is not needed in this patient population.Incidence of cervical spine injuries in association with blunt head trauma.To establish an incidence of cervical spine injuries in significant blunt head trauma and to evaluate the necessity of using cervical radiography, all consecutive cases of blunt head trauma admitted to the trauma service over a 7-month period were reviewed. Two hundred twenty-eight charts were reviewed for demographic information, circumstance of injury, complaints and physical findings referable to the cervical spine, presenting level of consciousness, severity of head injury, and cervical spine radiographic findings. Only three patients were found to have cervical spine injuries, for an incidence of 1.7%. Of the 122 alert and asymptomatic patients, none had cervical spine injury. The patient population was defined, yet the very low incidence of cervical spine injuries associated with blunt head trauma in this study precludes any identification of predictors. Nevertheless, the results suggest that alert and asymptomatic patients can be spared cervical spine radiography.Out-of-hospital cervical spine clearance: agreement between emergency medical technicians and emergency physicians.Determine the level of agreement between emergency medical technicians (EMTs) and emergency physicians (EPs) when applying an existing emergency medical services/fire department protocol for out-of-hospital clinical cervical spine injury (CSI) clearance in blunt trauma patients.Prospective observational study of consecutive blunt trauma patients transported by emergency medical services/fire department during a 3-month study period. The setting was an urban Level I trauma center. Measurement of interrater agreement (kappa) was determined.Mean age of the 190 patients was 34+/-19 years (range, 6 -98 years). Fifty-nine percent of the patients were male. One hundred forty-six patients (77%) were immobilized by EMTs; 17 of these patients were clinically cleared by EPs. Forty-four patients (23%) were clinically cleared by EMTs and presented without CSI precautions; of these, 61% (27 of 44) were immobilized by EPs and 57% (25 of 44) had cervical spine radiographs obtained. Overall, 141 patients (74%) required radiographic clearance. CSI were detected in five patients (2.6%); all five were immobilized in the out-of-hospital setting. Overall disagreement between EMTs and EPs regarding out-of-hospital CSI clearance occurred in 44 patients (23%) (kappa=0.29; 95% confidence interval, 0.15-0.43; p < 0.01).Significant disagreement in clinical CSI clearance exists between EMTs and EPs. Further research and education is recommended before widespread implementation of this practice.Multicentre prospective validation of use of the Canadian C-Spine Rule by triage nurses in the emergency department.The Canadian C-Spine Rule for imaging of the cervical spine was developed for use by physicians. We believe that nurses in the emergency department could use this rule to clinically clear the cervical spine. We prospectively evaluated the accuracy, reliability and acceptability of the Canadian C-Spine Rule when used by nurses.We conducted this three-year prospective cohort study in six Canadian emergency departments. The study involved adult trauma patients who were alert and whose condition was stable. We provided two hours of training to 191 triage nurses. The nurses then assessed patients using the Canadian C-Spine Rule, including determination of neck tenderness and range of motion, reapplied immobilization and completed a data form.Of the 3633 study patients, 42 (1.2%) had clinically important injuries of the cervical spine. The kappa value for interobserver assessments of 498 patients with the Canadian C-Spine Rule was 0.78. We calculated sensitivity of 100.0% (95% confidence interval [CI] 91.0%-100.0%) and specificity of 43.4% (95% CI 42.0%-45.0%) for the Canadian C-Spine Rule as interpreted by the investigators. The nurses classified patients with a sensitivity of 90.2% (95% CI 76.0%-95.0%) and a specificity of 43.9% (95% CI 42.0%-46.0%). Early in the study, nurses failed to identify four cases of injury, despite the presence of clear high-risk factors. None of these patients suffered sequelae, and after retraining there were no further missed cases. We estimated that for 40.7% of patients, the cervical spine could be cleared clinically by nurses. Nurses reported discomfort in applying the Canadian C-Spine Rule in only 4.8% of cases.Use of the Canadian C-Spine Rule by nurses was accurate, reliable and clinically acceptable. Widespread implementation by nurses throughout Canada and elsewhere would diminish patient discomfort and improve patient flow in overcrowded emergency departments.Patterns and risks in spinal trauma.Spinal injury in children is rare, and poses many difficulties in management.To ascertain the prevalence of spinal injury within the paediatric trauma population, and to assess relative risks of spinal injury according to age, conscious level, injury severity score (ISS), and associated injuries.Spine injured children were identified from the UK Trauma Audit & Research Network Database from 1989 to 2000. Relative risks of injury were calculated against the denominator paediatric trauma population.Of 19 538 on the database, 527 (2.7%) suffered spinal column fracture/dislocation without cord injury and 109 had cord injury (0.56% of all children; 16.5% of spine injured children). Thirty children (0.15% of all children; 4.5% of spine injured children) sustained spinal cord injury without radiological abnormality (SCIWORA). Cord injury and SCIWORA occurred more commonly in children aged < or =8. The risk of spine fracture/dislocation without cord injury was increased with an ISS >25 and with chest injuries. The risk of cord injury was increased with reduced GCS, head injury, and chest injury.Spinal cord injury and SCIWORA occur more frequently in young children. Multiple injuries and chest injuries increase the risk of fracture/dislocation and of cord injury. Reduced GCS and head injuries increase the risk of cord injury.Adequacy of plain radiography in the diagnosis of cervical spine injuries.Our hypotheses were (1) that plain radiography of the cervical spine in the evaluation of low risk patients with minor blunt trauma is accurate and (2) that computed tomography (CT) of the cervical spine in the evaluation of low risk patients is unnecessary. This study evaluates those hypotheses. We prospectively recorded findings of all patients with blunt trauma who underwent imaging over a period of 70 days. Injury status was determined by review of all radiographic studies obtained on each patient. Chart reviews were performed to determine mechanism of injury and neurological status. Patients were divided into three groups: very low risk, low risk, and high risk. Study end point was fracture. The study included 219 patients. The very low risk group had 107 patients, none of whom had fractures found on CT (projected specificity of plain radiography: 100%). The low risk group contained 78 patients who had no fractures seen on plain radiography or CT (specificity of plain radiography and CT: 100%). The high risk group consisted of 34 patients; 15 had fractures demonstrated on CT. Plain radiography missed one fracture out of 15. In low risk patients, plain radiography is an efficient diagnostic exam with a specificity of 100%. In high risk patients, plain radiography is a good adjunctive screening exam in conjunction with CT scan, with a sensitivity of 93.3% and specificity of 95%.Cervical radiographic evaluation of alert patients following blunt trauma.The records of 333 consecutive alert patients admitted to a trauma service for neurologic observation after sustaining significant blunt head trauma were reviewed. All patients had class I level of consciousness (alert, responds immediately to questions, may be disoriented and confused, follows complex commands); those with significant acute alcohol and/or drug intoxication were excluded from this study. Cervical spine injury did not correlate with the presence of major concomitant injuries, skull fractures, or major intracranial injuries. Cervical spine injury correlated only with the presence of signs and/or symptoms of cervical injury. This correlation was highly significant (P less than .05). Five of the 42 patients (11%) with signs and/or symptoms of cervical injury had cervical spine fractures. No patient without signs and/or symptoms of cervical injury had a cervical spine injury. These findings suggest that among alert patients with class I level of consciousness who have sustained blunt injury, only those who present with signs and/or symptoms of cervical injury require cervical radiographic evaluation.Role of routine emergency cervical radiography in head trauma.This review of 406 patients with head injury examines the role of emergency cervical radiography in head trauma and the frequency of associated cervical spine injury. Of 293 patients who had emergency cervical radiography (72 percent), 8 showed some abnormality, but only 5 (1.2 percent) were significant for cervical spine injury. All eight patients were, however, clinically suspected to have associated cervical spine injury before emergency cervical radiography. One hundred thirteen patients (28 percent) did not undergo emergency cervical radiography based on clinical evaluation, and none was subsequently found to have a missed cervical spine injury. There was no correlation between severity of head injury and the presence of associated cervical spine injury (p greater than 0.16). Head trauma is infrequently associated with cervical spine injury and when present is usually not clinically occult. Emergency cervical radiography is not efficacious and should not be routine in the emergency room management of head trauma. When associated cervical spine injury is clinically suspected, adequate cervical immobilization should be maintained and cervical radiography performed on a low priority basis. Head injury due to automobile and pedestrian or motorcycle and automobile accident may be more likely to be associated with cervical spine injury.Developing a clinical algorithm for early management of cervical spine injury in child trauma victims.To define a subset of injured children for whom emergency cervical spine radiography may be unnecessary, we performed a retrospective chart and radiologic review. Two entry methods were used: All injured children, from birth through 16 years, who had received cervical spine radiographs at The Children's Memorial Hospital from September 1983, to September 1984, were included. All patients from birth to 16 years with proven or suspected cases of cervical spine injury who had received cervical spine radiographs and who had been treated at either the Children's Memorial Hospital or the Northwestern University Spine Trauma Unit during period 1974 to 1984 also were included. Each child's chart was reviewed, and 84 clinical variables were recorded. All radiographs were reviewed by a pediatric neuroradiologist. Of 206 children studied, 59 had cervical spine injuries. A clinical algorithm was derived using the following eight variables: neck pain; neck tenderness; limitation of neck mobility; history of trauma to the neck; and abnormalities of reflexes, strength, sensation, or mental status. The following decision rule was selected: Positive findings in any of these eight variables mandates cervical spine radiography. This algorithm correctly identified 58 of 59 children with cervical spine injury, yielding a sensitivity of 98% and specificity of 54%. Cervical spine radiographs could have been avoided in 79 children (38% of the entire sample). This algorithm performed better than did models derived from logistic regression analysis of the same data. Validation trials are required prior to the implementation of this or other clinical decision algorithms in practice.Clinical examination in complement with computed tomography scan: an effective method for identification of cervical spine injury.The purpose of this study was to prospectively evaluate a protocol that assesses the efficacy and sensitivity of clinical examination in complement with computed tomographic (CT) scan in screening for cervical spine (c-spine) injury.During the 26-month period from March 2005 to May 2007, blunt trauma patients older than 13 years were prospectively entered into a study protocol. If patients were awake and alert with Glasgow Coma Score (GCS) >or=14, clinical examination of the neck was performed. Clinical examination was performed regardless of distracting injuries. If the patient had no complaints of pain or tenderness, the cervical collar was removed. Patients with complaints of c-spine pain or tenderness and patients with GCS score <14 underwent CT scanning for evaluation of the entire c-spine.One thousand six hundred eighty seven patients were prospectively assessed for blunt c-spine injury. Fourteen hundred thirty-nine patients had GCS score >or=14, 897 (62%) of which had a negative clinical examination of the c-spine and subsequently had cervical collars removed. Two patients (0.2%) whose clinical examination results disclosed nothing abnormal were later found to have a c-spine injury. Five hundred forty-two patients with GCS score >or=14 had a positive c-spine clinical examination, of which 134 (24%) were diagnosed with c-spine injury. One hundred thirty-three (99%) c-spine injuries were identified by CT scan. The c-spine injury missed by CT scan was a radiologic misinterpretation. For patients with c-spine injury with GCS score >or=14, both sensitivities of clinical examination and CT scan were 99%. Two hundred forty-eight patients had GCS score <14, of which 5 (2.0%) were diagnosed with c-spine injury. CT scan identified all c-spine injuries for patients with GCS score <14.In awake and alert blunt trauma patients, clinical examination is a sensitive screening method for c-spine injury. Clinical examination allows for the majority of blunt trauma patients to have their c-spines cleared safely without radiologic screening. Clinical examination in complement with CT scan is a sensitive and an effective method for identification of c-spine injury in awake and alert patients with symptoms of c-spine injury. CT scan is the sensitive and effective test for screening and diagnosis of c-spine injury in blunt trauma patients with altered mental status.Evaluation of pediatric cervical spine injuries.To compare historical features, clinical examination findings, and radiographic results among pediatric patients with cervical spine injury (CSI), a retrospective review of patients who were diagnosed with CSI was undertaken. Two main groups were identified: radiographically evident cervical spine injury (RESCI), and spinal cord injury without radiographic abnormality (SCIWORA). Demographic, historical, clinical, and radiographic information was obtained from patients' charts and analyzed to determine factors associated with CSI and to determine the efficacy of the various radiographic views. Seventy-two children, ages from 1 month to 15 years (median age, 9 yrs), were included in the study. Sports-related injuries were the most common. Forty patients had RESCI and 32 had SCIWORA. Forty-nine (80%) of all the patients had abnormal findings on neck examination, and six (16%) of the RECSI group had abnormal neurological findings. Lateral radiographs had a sensitivity for CSI of 79%; a three-view radiographic series had a sensitivity of 94%. All patients with CSI who were clinically asymptomatic had both a high-risk injury mechanism and a distracting injury. CSI should be suspected in any child with abnormal findings on neck or neurological examination. A minimum of three radiographic cervical spine views should be obtained in the evaluation of CSI in children. Even in the face of a three-view series, CSI should be suspected in patients with an abnormal neck or neurological exam, high-risk mechanism of injury, or distracting injury.Implementation of the Canadian C-Spine Rule: prospective 12 centre cluster randomised trial.To evaluate the effectiveness of an active strategy to implement the validated Canadian C-Spine Rule into multiple emergency departments.Matched pair cluster randomised trial.University and community emergency departments in Canada. Participants 11 824 alert and stable adults presenting with blunt trauma to the head or neck at one of 12 hospitals.Six hospitals were randomly allocated to the intervention and six to the control. At the intervention sites, active strategies were used to implement the Canadian C-Spine Rule, including education, policy, and real time reminders on radiology requisitions. No specific intervention was introduced to alter the behaviour of doctors requesting cervical spine imaging at the control sites.Diagnostic imaging rate of the cervical spine during two 12 month before and after periods.Patients were balanced between control and intervention sites. From the before to the after periods, the intervention group showed a relative reduction in cervical spine imaging of 12.8% (95% confidence interval 9% to 16%; 61.7% v 53.3%; P=0.01) and the control group a relative increase of 12.5% (7% to 18%; 52.8% v 58.9%; P=0.03). These changes were significant when both groups were compared (P<0.001). No fractures were missed and no adverse outcomes occurred.Implementation of the Canadian C-Spine Rule led to a significant decrease in imaging without injuries being missed or patient morbidity. Final imaging rates were much lower at intervention sites than at most US hospitals. Widespread implementation of this rule could lead to reduced healthcare costs and more efficient patient flow in busy emergency departments worldwide.Clinical trials NCT00290875.A pediatric cervical spine clearance protocol to reduce radiation exposure in children.To minimize radiation exposure in children and reduce resource use, we implemented an age-specific algorithm to evaluate cervical spine injuries at a Level 1 trauma center. The effects of protocol implementation on computed tomography (CT) use in children (≤ 10 y) were determined.With institutional review board approval, we conducted a retrospective review using the institutional trauma registry. All pediatric patients (≤ 10 y) (n = 324) between January 2007 and present were reviewed. We excluded cases in which no imaging or outside imaging was performed. Patients were evaluated by physical exam alone, with the aid of plain radiograms or with cervical spine CT. All patients who required head CT also had CT of cervical spine to C3. We analyzed demographic, injury, and outcome data using STATA to perform chi-square and t-test, and to determine P value. P < 0.05 was defined as significant. We used the WinDose program to calculate the radiation-effective dose used in cervical spine CT.There were 123 and 124 patients in the pre-protocol and post-protocol groups, respectively. Demographics, GCS, and injury analysis, specifically head-neck and face Injury Severity Scores showed no significant difference between groups. There was a 60% (P < 0.001) decrease in the use of full CTs after protocol implementation. We estimated that the protocol reduced the exposed area by 50% and decreased the radiation dose to the thyroid by > 80%. We extrapolated the combined effect results in a threefold reduction in radiation exposure.Implementation of a cervical spine protocol led to a significant reduction in radiation exposure among children.Computed tomography in the initial evaluation of the cervical spine.Unstable injury of the cervical spine must be considered in all victims of blunt trauma. To evaluate the role of limited, directed computed tomography (CT) in the initial evaluation of the cervical spine, a one-year study involving 104 high-risk patients was undertaken. Sensitivity was 0.78 overall, but in the group of patients scanned after inadequate plain radiographs, CT had a sensitivity of 1.0 for unstable cervical injury. All false-negative studies involved atlantoaxial rotary subluxation. We conclude that limited, directed CT of the cervical spine is appropriate in the initial evaluation of patients at risk, particularly if plain radiographs are inadequate, but is of limited value in the evaluation of ligamentous injury of the upper cervical spine.The Canadian C-spine rule versus the NEXUS low-risk criteria in patients with trauma.The Canadian C-Spine (cervical-spine) Rule (CCR) and the National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study (NEXUS) Low-Risk Criteria (NLC) are decision rules to guide the use of cervical-spine radiography in patients with trauma. It is unclear how the two decision rules compare in terms of clinical performance.We conducted a prospective cohort study in nine Canadian emergency departments comparing the CCR and NLC as applied to alert patients with trauma who were in stable condition. The CCR and NLC were interpreted by 394 physicians for patients before radiography.Among the 8283 patients, 169 (2.0 percent) had clinically important cervical-spine injuries. In 845 (10.2 percent) of the patients, physicians did not evaluate range of motion as required by the CCR algorithm. In analyses that excluded these indeterminate cases, the CCR was more sensitive than the NLC (99.4 percent vs. 90.7 percent, P<0.001) and more specific (45.1 percent vs. 36.8 percent, P<0.001) for injury, and its use would have resulted in lower radiography rates (55.9 percent vs. 66.6 percent, P<0.001). In secondary analyses that included all patients, the sensitivity and specificity of CCR, assuming that the indeterminate cases were all positive, were 99.4 percent and 40.4 percent, respectively (P<0.001 for both comparisons with the NLC). Assuming that the CCR was negative for all indeterminate cases, these rates were 95.3 percent (P=0.09 for the comparison with the NLC) and 50.7 percent (P=0.001). The CCR would have missed 1 patient and the NLC would have missed 16 patients with important injuries.For alert patients with trauma who are in stable condition, the CCR is superior to the NLC with respect to sensitivity and specificity for cervical-spine injury, and its use would result in reduced rates of radiography.Using CT of the cervical spine for early evaluation of pediatric patients with head trauma.The purpose of this study was to assess the effectiveness of CT of the cervical spine in addition to radiography in pediatric patients with suspected head trauma at the time of the CT head examination.We identified 63 pediatric patients admitted to the emergency department who had head trauma and who underwent both head CT and neck radiography. Those who underwent CT of the cervical spine at the time of the head CT examination during their initial evaluation were compared for demographics, clinical status, mechanism of injury, and number of excess radiographs (number required by protocol minus number of films obtained) required to evaluate the cervical spine with those patients who did not undergo early CT of the cervical spine.Twenty-one patients (33%) underwent cervical spine CT at the time of the head CT examination. The number of excess radiographs differed significantly between these patients (2.1 +/- 2.6 vs 3.6 +/- 2.7, p = 0.04) and the comparison group. Patients who did not undergo early CT for whom excess radiographs were obtained had the following characteristics: they were older than 8 years (p = 0.03), were unrestrained in a motor vehicle crash (p = 0.04), had a Glasgow coma score of 13-15 (p = 0.01), and were intubated (p = 0.02).The number of repeated radiographs required to ascertain that the cervical spine is free of injury after suspected head trauma is significantly fewer when initial CT of the neck is performed at the time of head CT examination. Including cervical spine CT in trauma protocols for subgroups of children with head injuries may lead to more effective clearance of the pediatric cervical spine.Cervical spine injuries in children: a review of 103 patients treated consecutively at a level 1 pediatric trauma center.Cervical spine (C-spine) injuries occur infrequently in children but may be associated with significant disability and mortality. The purpose of this study was to review the experience of a level 1 pediatric trauma center to determine the epidemiology, risk factors, mechanisms, levels, types of injury, comorbid factors, and outcomes associated with these potentially devastating injuries.A retrospective analysis of 103 consecutive C-spine injuries treated at a level 1 pediatric trauma center over a 9(1/2)-year period (January 1991 through August 2000) was performed.The mean age was 10.3 +/- 5.2 years, and the male-to-female ratio was 1.6:1. The most common mechanism of injury was motor vehicle related (52%), followed by sporting injuries (27%). Football injuries accounted for 29% of all sports-related injuries. Sixty-eight percent of all children sustained injuries to C1 to C4; 25% to C5 to C7; and 7% to both. Spinal cord injury without radiographic abnormality (SCIWORA) occurred in 38%. Five patients had complete cord lesions involving the lower C-spine (C4 to C7); 4 of these were motor vehicle related, and all 4 patients died. Isolated C-spine injuries occurred in 43%, whereas 38% had associated closed head injuries (CHI). The overall mortality rate was 18.5%, most commonly motor vehicle related (95%), occurring in younger children (mean and median age 5 years) and associated with upper C-spine injuries (74%) and CHI (89%). C1 dislocations occurred in younger children (mean age, 6.6 years), most often as a result of motor vehicle-related trauma (especially pedestrians) and were associated with the highest injury severity score (ISS), longest length of stay (LOS), most CHIs, and the highest mortality rate (50%). C-spine fractures with or without SCI occurred most commonly as a result of falls and dives. Sporting injuries occurred almost exclusively in adolescent boys (mean age, 13.8 years) and were isolated injuries associated with a relatively low ISS and shorter LOS. Interestingly, 75% of sporting injuries showed SCIWORA, and all infants suffering from child abuse had SCIWORA.Mechanisms of injury are age related, with younger children sustaining C-spine injuries as a result of motor vehicle-related trauma and older adolescents commonly injured during sporting activities. C-spine injuries in children most commonly involve the upper C-spine, but complete lesions of the cord are associated more frequently with lower C-spine injuries. The type of C-spine injury is related to the mechanism of injury: SCIWORA is associated with sporting activities and child abuse, C-spine dislocations most commonly result from motor vehicle-related trauma (especially among pedestrians), and C-spine fractures occur most commonly as a result of falls and dives. Predictors of mortality include younger age, motor vehicle-related mechanism, C1 dislocations, high ISS greater than 25, and associated CHI. A high index of suspicion for SCIWORA is essential when evaluating adolescents with neck trauma associated with sporting injuries or victims of child abuse.Evaluation of the acute cervical spine: a management algorithm.Safe, efficient, and cost-effective evaluation of the spine is the goal in the trauma setting. At our Level I trauma facility, the trauma service, emergency medicine, radiology, anesthesia, and the spine service combined individual concerns into one agreed-upon clearance protocol. Here, we present the effectiveness of a new cervical spine clearance protocol.A retrospective review was initiated of all trauma patients evaluated in a Level I trauma center the year before and after implementation of a new cervical spine protocol to determine the incidence of missed cervical injuries. An additional 6 months were reviewed to detect any missed injuries late in the study period.During the 2-year study period, 4,460 patients presented to the emergency room with some form of cervical spine precautions. Blunt trauma comprised 90% of the study population. According to the protocol, approximately 45% required further cervical radiographs after presentation. In the preprotocol year, 77 of 2,217 (3.4%) patients were diagnosed with cervical spine injuries, 16 of 77 (21%) with multiple level of injuries, and 25 of 77 (32%) with neurologic compromise. Three of 2,217 patients had missed cervical spine injuries on their initial evaluations. In the postprotocol year, 84 of 2,243 (3.4%) patients had cervical injuries, 25 of 84 (30%) with multiple levels of injuries and 28 of 84 (28%) with neurologic compromise. No patient evaluated during the protocol year was missed. All statistics between the two groups were not significant.The current protocol by risk stratifying patients on presentation is effective in assessing patients for cervical spine injuries.Using CT of the cervical spine for early evaluation of pediatric patients with head trauma.The purpose of this study was to assess the effectiveness of CT of the cervical spine in addition to radiography in pediatric patients with suspected head trauma at the time of the CT head examination.We identified 63 pediatric patients admitted to the emergency department who had head trauma and who underwent both head CT and neck radiography. Those who underwent CT of the cervical spine at the time of the head CT examination during their initial evaluation were compared for demographics, clinical status, mechanism of injury, and number of excess radiographs (number required by protocol minus number of films obtained) required to evaluate the cervical spine with those patients who did not undergo early CT of the cervical spine.Twenty-one patients (33%) underwent cervical spine CT at the time of the head CT examination. The number of excess radiographs differed significantly between these patients (2.1 +/- 2.6 vs 3.6 +/- 2.7, p = 0.04) and the comparison group. Patients who did not undergo early CT for whom excess radiographs were obtained had the following characteristics: they were older than 8 years (p = 0.03), were unrestrained in a motor vehicle crash (p = 0.04), had a Glasgow coma score of 13-15 (p = 0.01), and were intubated (p = 0.02).The number of repeated radiographs required to ascertain that the cervical spine is free of injury after suspected head trauma is significantly fewer when initial CT of the neck is performed at the time of head CT examination. Including cervical spine CT in trauma protocols for subgroups of children with head injuries may lead to more effective clearance of the pediatric cervical spine.Evaluation of pediatric cervical spine injuries.To compare historical features, clinical examination findings, and radiographic results among pediatric patients with cervical spine injury (CSI), a retrospective review of patients who were diagnosed with CSI was undertaken. Two main groups were identified: radiographically evident cervical spine injury (RESCI), and spinal cord injury without radiographic abnormality (SCIWORA). Demographic, historical, clinical, and radiographic information was obtained from patients' charts and analyzed to determine factors associated with CSI and to determine the efficacy of the various radiographic views. Seventy-two children, ages from 1 month to 15 years (median age, 9 yrs), were included in the study. Sports-related injuries were the most common. Forty patients had RESCI and 32 had SCIWORA. Forty-nine (80%) of all the patients had abnormal findings on neck examination, and six (16%) of the RECSI group had abnormal neurological findings. Lateral radiographs had a sensitivity for CSI of 79%; a three-view radiographic series had a sensitivity of 94%. All patients with CSI who were clinically asymptomatic had both a high-risk injury mechanism and a distracting injury. CSI should be suspected in any child with abnormal findings on neck or neurological examination. A minimum of three radiographic cervical spine views should be obtained in the evaluation of CSI in children. Even in the face of a three-view series, CSI should be suspected in patients with an abnormal neck or neurological exam, high-risk mechanism of injury, or distracting injury.Clearing the cervical spine in critically injured patients: a comprehensive C-spine protocol to avoid unnecessary delays in diagnosis.Clearing the cervical spine in polytrauma patients still presents a challenge to the trauma team. The risk of an overlooked cervical spine injury is substantial since these patients show painful and life-threatening injuries to one or more organ systems so that clinical examination is usually not reliable. A generally approved guideline to assess the cervical spine in polytrauma patients might significantly reduce delays in diagnosis, but a consistent protocol for evaluating the cervical spine has not been uniformly accepted or followed by clinicians. One purpose of this study was to analyse the common methods for cervical spine evaluation in critically injured patients and its safety and efficacy at this trauma centre. The second purpose was to present a comprehensive diagnostic C-spine protocol, based on the authors' experiences with documented cases. From a prospectively gathered polytrauma database, we retrospectively analysed the clinical records of all polytrauma patients, with skeletal and/or non-skeletal cervical spine injuries, who were admitted to this level I trauma centre between 1980 and 2004. All patients were assessed following the trauma algorithm of our unit (modified by Nast-Kolb). Standard radiological evaluation of the cervical spine consisted of either a single lateral view or a three-view cervical spine series (anteroposterior, lateral, odontoid). Further radiological examinations (functional flexion/extension views, oblique views, CT scan, MRI) were carried out for clinical suspicion of an injury or when indicated by the standard radiographs. Sixteen patients (14%) had a single cross-table lateral view for radiological assessment of the cervical spine during initial trauma evaluation, Twenty-nine patients had a three-view cervical spine series (anteroposterior, lateral, odontoid) and 81 patients underwent extended radiological examinations by cervical CT scan (n=52), functional flexion/extension views (n=26) or MRI (n=3). Correct diagnosis was made in 107 patients (91%) during primary trauma evaluation, whereas in 11 patients (9%) our approach to clear the cervical spine failed to detect significant cervical spine injuries. In six patients skeletal injuries were missed by a single lateral view and in two patients by a three-view standard series because inadequate radiographs with poor technical quality or incomplete visualization of the cervical spine did not show the extent of the injury. In three cases ligamentous injuries were missed despite complete sets of standard radiographs and cervical CT scan, but without functional radiography. Common methods for cervical spine evaluation in critically injured patients were plain radiographs, cervical CT scan and functional flexion/extension views. Cervical CT scan was the most efficient imaging tool in detecting skeletal injuries, showing a sensitivity of 100%. A single cross-table lateral view appeared to be insufficient, as we found a sensitivity of only 63%. Functional radiography or MRI was also necessary, as plain radiographs and CT scan failed to detect significant ligamentous injuries in 6% of the patients. For more comprehensive assessment of the C-spine, we presented a new C-spine protocol based on the authors' experiences, with the aim to avoid unnecessary delays in diagnosis.Prehospital clinical clearance of the cervical spine: a prospective study.Physician clinical clearance of the cervical spine after blunt trauma is practiced in many trauma centers. Prehospital clinical clearance of the cervical spine (c-spine) performed by emergency medical services (EMS) personnel can decrease cost, improve patient comfort, decrease complications, and decrease prehospital time. The purpose of this study was to assess whether EMS personnel can effectively clinically clear the c-spine of injury in the prehospital setting. All paramedics from a single urban fire department were trained in clinical clearance of the c-spine. During the 14-month period from January 2008 through March 2009, clinical examination of the c-spine was performed by paramedics on blunt trauma patients in the prehospital setting. Paramedics immobilized the c-spine and delivered the patients to the University of South Alabama Medical Center. After trauma center arrival, paramedics documented their clinical examination of the c-spine in a computerized data collection form. Paramedic clinical findings were compared with trauma surgeon clinical examination findings and computed tomographic findings of the c-spine. All patients had prehospital Glasgow Coma Score 14 or greater. Patients were not excluded for distracting injuries. One hundred ninety-three blunt trauma patients were entered. Sixty-five (34%) c-spines were clinically cleared by EMS. There were no known missed injuries in this patient group. Eight (6%) patients who were not clinically cleared by EMS were diagnosed with c-spine injury. Trauma surgeons clinically cleared 135 (70%) of the patients with no known missed injury. EMS personnel in the prehospital setting may reliably and effectively perform clinical clearance of the c-spine. Further prospective study for prehospital c-spine clinical clearance is warranted. Developing a clinical algorithm for early management of cervical spine injury in child trauma victims.To define a subset of injured children for whom emergency cervical spine radiography may be unnecessary, we performed a retrospective chart and radiologic review. Two entry methods were used: All injured children, from birth through 16 years, who had received cervical spine radiographs at The Children's Memorial Hospital from September 1983, to September 1984, were included. All patients from birth to 16 years with proven or suspected cases of cervical spine injury who had received cervical spine radiographs and who had been treated at either the Children's Memorial Hospital or the Northwestern University Spine Trauma Unit during period 1974 to 1984 also were included. Each child's chart was reviewed, and 84 clinical variables were recorded. All radiographs were reviewed by a pediatric neuroradiologist. Of 206 children studied, 59 had cervical spine injuries. A clinical algorithm was derived using the following eight variables: neck pain; neck tenderness; limitation of neck mobility; history of trauma to the neck; and abnormalities of reflexes, strength, sensation, or mental status. The following decision rule was selected: Positive findings in any of these eight variables mandates cervical spine radiography. This algorithm correctly identified 58 of 59 children with cervical spine injury, yielding a sensitivity of 98% and specificity of 54%. Cervical spine radiographs could have been avoided in 79 children (38% of the entire sample). This algorithm performed better than did models derived from logistic regression analysis of the same data. Validation trials are required prior to the implementation of this or other clinical decision algorithms in practice.The safety of nurse clearance of the cervical spine using the National Emergency X-radiography Utilization Study low-risk criteria.To determine the level of agreement between trained ED nursing staff and senior ED medical staff in the application and interpretation of the National Emergency X-radiography Utilization Study (NEXUS) low-risk criteria (NLC).A NEXUS training and accreditation package was developed. It was successfully undertaken by 22 senior ED nursing staff and 26 senior ED medical staff. A study nurse and doctor independently applied the NLC to a convenience sample of patients who had been placed in a hard cervical collar prior to arrival in the ED. The findings for each of the NLC and the overall decision regarding collar removal were recorded on specific case report forms. The primary endpoint was the level of agreement for the overall decision to leave the collar in place. Levels of agreement for the individual NLC were also examined.In total, 183 patients were recruited. The level of 'safe agreement' where nursing and medical staff agreed that the collar should be left in place was 94.3% (95% CI: 89.5-97.2%). Agreement with regard to individual NLC varied from good to fair. The median times from patient arrival to completion of study nurse and doctor assessments were 14 min (interquartile ranges [IQR] 5-30) and 29 min (IQR 15-47), respectively.The study demonstrated a high level of agreement between nursing and medical staff for stable low-risk trauma patients.A pediatric cervical spine clearance protocol to reduce radiation exposure in children.To minimize radiation exposure in children and reduce resource use, we implemented an age-specific algorithm to evaluate cervical spine injuries at a Level 1 trauma center. The effects of protocol implementation on computed tomography (CT) use in children (≤ 10 y) were determined.With institutional review board approval, we conducted a retrospective review using the institutional trauma registry. All pediatric patients (≤ 10 y) (n = 324) between January 2007 and present were reviewed. We excluded cases in which no imaging or outside imaging was performed. Patients were evaluated by physical exam alone, with the aid of plain radiograms or with cervical spine CT. All patients who required head CT also had CT of cervical spine to C3. We analyzed demographic, injury, and outcome data using STATA to perform chi-square and t-test, and to determine P value. P < 0.05 was defined as significant. We used the WinDose program to calculate the radiation-effective dose used in cervical spine CT.There were 123 and 124 patients in the pre-protocol and post-protocol groups, respectively. Demographics, GCS, and injury analysis, specifically head-neck and face Injury Severity Scores showed no significant difference between groups. There was a 60% (P < 0.001) decrease in the use of full CTs after protocol implementation. We estimated that the protocol reduced the exposed area by 50% and decreased the radiation dose to the thyroid by > 80%. We extrapolated the combined effect results in a threefold reduction in radiation exposure.Implementation of a cervical spine protocol led to a significant reduction in radiation exposure among children.Screening cervical spine CT in the emergency department, Phase 2: A prospective assessment of use.The National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study Low-Risk Criteria were established to identify patients with a low probability of cervical spine injury in whom imaging of the cervical spine was unnecessary. The purpose of this study was to ascertain the number of unnecessary cervical spine CT studies on the basis of proper application of established clinical guidelines and, secondarily, to determine indications for ordering studies in the absence of guideline criteria.All patients presenting to a level I trauma center for whom a screening cervical spine CT was ordered in the setting of blunt trauma were eligible for enrollment. For each study, the requesting clinician completed a survey regarding study indications. CT examinations were evaluated by a board-certified radiologist blinded to survey data to determine the presence or absence of cervical spine injury.Of 507 CT examinations, 5 (1%) were positive and 497 (98.0%) were negative for acute cervical spine injury. Five studies (1%) were indeterminate for acute injury but demonstrated no abnormality on subsequent imaging and clinical follow-up. Of the 502 studies without cervical spine injury, 81 (16.1%) were imaged despite meeting all 5 NEXUS criteria for nonimaging. Of these, the most common study indication was dangerous mechanism of injury (48.1%) followed by subjective neck pain (40.7%).Strict application of NEXUS criteria could potentially reduce the number of screening cervical spine CT scans in the setting of blunt trauma; this change would avoid a considerable amount of unnecessary radiation and cost.Incidence of cervical spine injuries in association with blunt head trauma.To establish an incidence of cervical spine injuries in significant blunt head trauma and to evaluate the necessity of using cervical radiography, all consecutive cases of blunt head trauma admitted to the trauma service over a 7-month period were reviewed. Two hundred twenty-eight charts were reviewed for demographic information, circumstance of injury, complaints and physical findings referable to the cervical spine, presenting level of consciousness, severity of head injury, and cervical spine radiographic findings. Only three patients were found to have cervical spine injuries, for an incidence of 1.7%. Of the 122 alert and asymptomatic patients, none had cervical spine injury. The patient population was defined, yet the very low incidence of cervical spine injuries associated with blunt head trauma in this study precludes any identification of predictors. Nevertheless, the results suggest that alert and asymptomatic patients can be spared cervical spine radiography.The pediatric cervical spine instability study. A pilot study assessing the prognostic value of four imaging modalities in clearing the cervical spine for children with severe traumatic injuries.Cervical spine clearance in severely injured children after trauma is often difficult because of unique injury patterns, concerns about radiation exposure to growing tissue, and unfamiliarity with unstable cervical injuries. We prospectively assessed the utility of four radiographic modalities to clear the cervical spine in children after severe trauma.Twenty-four comatose, intubated children with severe traumatic injuries underwent radiographic evaluation to clear the cervical spine. Each patient had plain radiographs, flexion-extension radiographs under fluoroscopy, computed tomography (CT), and magnetic resonance (MR) imaging within 10 days of admission. Patients underwent cervical spine flexion-extension radiographs 2-3 months after trauma to detect late instability. Sensitivity and specificity for each radiographic modality was determined.Plain cervical spine radiographs demonstrated sensitivity of 100% and specificity of 95%; flexion-extension radiographs had “indeterminate” sensitivity and specificity of 100%. For CT, sensitivity was 100% and specificity was 95%, and for MR imaging, sensitivity was 100% and specificity was 74%.There was a low prevalence of cervical instability in this high-risk group. Plain radiographs, flexion-extension radiographs, and CT all had high sensitivities and specificities. MR imaging had a high false-positive rate, making it sensitive but not specific. The data support using either CT or plain radiographs as the initial cervical spine screening study, but CT is recommended because of its superior ability to detect critical injuries. To definitively rule out ligamentous instability after a negative screening CT scan or cervical spine X-ray, these data support using flexion-extension X-rays with fluoroscopy and not MR imaging.Cervical spine injuries to children under 11: should we use radiography more selectively in their initial assessment?To assess the effectiveness of cervical spine radiography in injured children under 11 years old, and suggest improvements.Retrospective survey of radiographs and accident and emergency records for children examined during a one year period in a large teaching hospital.No cervical spine fractures occurred in this age group during the year. The recorded clinical findings did not always justify radiography.Clinical examination appears undervalued by those assessing injured children and is poorly recorded. Radiography can be used more selectively. Initial assessment using a single lateral projection can be followed in doubtful cases by cross sectional imaging.A prospective multicenter study of cervical spine injury in children.Pediatric victims of blunt trauma have developmental and anatomic characteristics that can make it difficult to assess their risk of cervical spine injury (CSI). Previous reports, all retrospective in nature, have not identified any cases of CSI in either children or adults in the absence of neck pain, neurologic symptoms, distracting injury, or altered mental status. The objective of this study was to examine the incidence and spectrum of spine injury in patients who are younger than 18 years and to evaluate the efficacy of the National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study (NEXUS) decision instrument for obtaining cervical spine radiography in pediatric trauma victims.We performed a prospective, multicenter study to evaluate pediatric blunt trauma victims. All patients who presented to participating emergency departments underwent clinical evaluation before radiographic imaging. The presence or absence of the following criteria was noted: midline cervical tenderness, altered level of alertness, evidence of intoxication, neurologic abnormality, and presence of painful distracting injury. Presence or absence of each individual criterion was documented for each patient before radiographic imaging, unless the patient was judged to be too unstable to complete the clinical evaluation before radiographs. The decision to radiograph a patient was entirely at the physician's discretion and not driven by the NEXUS questionnaire. The presence or absence of CSI was based on the final interpretation of all radiographic studies. Data on all patients who were younger than 18 years were sequestered from the main database for separate analysis.There were 3065 patients (9.0% of all NEXUS patients) who were younger than 18 years in this cohort, 30 of whom (0.98%) sustained a CSI. Included in the study were 88 children who were younger than 2, 817 who were between 2 and 8, and 2160 who were 8 to 17. Fractures of the lower cervical vertebrae (C5-C7) accounted for 45.9% of pediatric CSIs. No case of spinal cord injury without radiographic abnormality was reported in any child in this study, although 22 cases were reported in adults. Only 4 of the 30 injured children were younger than 9 years, and none was younger than 2 years. Tenderness and distracting injury were the 2 most common abnormalities noted in patients with and without CSI. The decision rule correctly identified all pediatric CSI victims (sensitivity: 100.0%; 95% confidence interval: 87.8%-100.0%) and correctly designated 603 patients as low risk for CSI (negative predictive value: 100.0%; 95% confidence interval: 99.4%-100.0%).The lower cervical spine is the most common site of CSI in children, and fractures are the most common type of injury. CSI is rare among patients aged 8 years or younger. The NEXUS decision instrument performed well in children, and its use could reduce pediatric cervical spine imaging by nearly 20%. However, the small number of infants and toddlers in the study suggests caution in applying the NEXUS criteria to this particular age group.Removing the pediatric cervical collar: current practice patterns.To identify the current practice patterns of emergency medicine practitioners and the typical criteria used in discontinuing cervical spine immobilization (CSI) in the pediatric patient.Mail-in survey.All physicians on the mailing list of the American Academy of Pediatrics Section of Emergency Medicine and an equal number of randomly chosen members of the American College of Emergency Physicians. The total number of participants was 1360.The survey consisted of a case scenario describing a 3-year-old child brought to the emergency department with CSI. The approach to such a scenario was assessed. Surveys were mailed with self-addressed stamped envelopes; repeat mailings were sent at 4 and 8 weeks after the first mailing. Those not currently in active practice or not involved in the decision to discontinue CSI were excluded from the study.The response rate was 55%. Most respondents were younger than 44 years (71%), in practice less than 10 years (56%), and practiced in an urban setting (68%). Nearly two thirds (62.6%) had completed residency training in pediatrics, 24% in emergency medicine and 36% a pediatric emergency medicine fellowship. Most (63%) would discontinue CSI without obtaining radiographs. Factors associated with removal were residency training in pediatrics and being in practice for less than 10 years. The most common criteria for discontinuing CSI were normal neurological (96%) and cervical spine (98%) examinations, normal mental status (92%), and absence of neck pain (93%).Discontinuing CSI without obtaining radiographs is common, especially among those with residency training in pediatrics and those in practice for less than 10 years. Knowledge of current practice is essential to future development of guidelines for managing pediatric trauma patients for whom cervical spine injury is a consideration.Screening cervical spine CT in the emergency department, phase 3: increasing effectiveness of imaging.The aim of this study was to determine the effect of a clinical education initiative on the appropriate utilization of screening cervical spine CT in the emergency department. The purpose was to assess if clinical education can produce stricter adherence to the ACR Appropriateness Criteria and improve the utilization of screening CT examinations in the emergency department.Institutional review board approval was obtained for this HIPAA-compliant study. All adult patients presenting to a level 1 trauma center with blunt trauma prompting screening cervical spine CT were eligible. For each study, the requesting clinician completed a survey selecting all clinical indications. CT examinations were evaluated by a board-certified radiologist blinded to survey data. Results were compared with retrospective and prospective studies performed before the institution of the education initiative.Of the 388 cervical spine CT examinations performed, 12 (3.1%) were positive for acute cervical spine injury, compared to only 1.0% before the clinical education program (phase 2). Of the 376 examinations without injury, 13% met all 5 National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study criteria for nonimaging (down from 16.1% in phase 2), and 15 (4%) required no imaging when both National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study and abbreviated Canadian cervical spine rule criteria were applied.Implementation of a clinical education initiative resulted in improved adherence to ACR Appropriateness Criteria and improved clinical effectiveness of the studies by increasing fracture detection rate. Initiatives such as these could potentially influence imaging overutilization without burdening emergency department clinicians with excessive roadblocks to image ordering.Clearing the cervical spine in victims of blunt trauma.Cervical spine injuries occur in 2.3% to 6.4% of victims of blunt trauma. The difficulty of identifying the minority of patients with cervical spine injuries continues to challenge those who triage and treat the acutely injured. We retrospectively reviewed our practice for cervical spine clearance, which consists of three-view plain radiographs supplemented by focused further studies, such as computed or plain film tomography and flexion/extension views, as needed. Fifty-four patients with cervical spine injuries were identified during a 39-month period, which represented approximately 1% of the patients evaluated. Eighty cervical spine injuries were found, of which nine were missed. Review of the six patients in whom the nine cervical spine injuries were missed demonstrated error in the interpretation of radiographic studies in five patients, only two of whom were felt to have technically adequate films in hindsight. We conclude that a protocol based on three-view plain film radiographs supplemented by focused additional studies will allow the visualization of virtually all cervical spine injuries and that the main cause of missed injuries is errors of interpretation.Implementation of the Canadian C-spine rule reduces cervical spine x-ray rate for alert patients with potential neck injury.The objectives of this before-and-after study of alert, stable adult patients presenting to the Emergency Department of Western Hospital with potential neck injuries who were immobilized in hard cervical collars were to determine the impact of implementation of the Canadian C-spine rule on x-ray ordering rates and whether implementation of the rule reduced time in hard collars for patients with potential neck injury. Data collected included demographics, mechanism of injury, x-ray rate, and time in hard collar. Data analysis was by chi-square test for proportions and Mann-Whitney U test for continuous variables. There were 211 patients studied. The x-ray ordering rate decreased from 67% to 50% (25% relative reduction, p = 0.0187). Time in hard collar was also reduced from a median of 128 min to a median of 103 min (effect size 25.5 min), but this did not reach statistical significance. Implementation of the Canadian C-spine rule reduced x-ray ordering by 25%.Radiographic clearance of blunt cervical spine injury: plain radiograph or computed tomography scan?The purpose of this study was to evaluate the roles of cervical spine radiographs (CSR) and computed tomography of the cervical spine (CTC) in the exclusion of cervical spine injury for adult blunt trauma patients.At the authors' institution, all adult blunt trauma patients with physical findings of posterior midline neck tenderness, altered mental status, or neurologic deficit are considered at risk of cervical spine injury and undergo both CSR and CTC for evaluation of the cervical spine. The TRACS database at level 1 of the trauma center at this institution was queried for all blunt trauma patients from November 2000 to October 2001. Patient injury severity score (ISS), Glascow Coma Score (GCS), age, gender, CSR results, CTC results, and treatment data were analyzed.The review included 3,018 blunt trauma patients with appropriate data. For 1,199 of these patients (779 men and 420 women) (40%) at risk for cervical spine injury, both CSR and CTC were performed for cervical spine evaluation. The average age of these patients was 39.4 years (range, 18-89 years). The average GCS was 13 and the average ISS was 8.4 in this study population. In 116 (9.5%) of these patients, a cervical spine injury (fracture or subluxation) was detected. The injury was identified on both CSR and CTC in 75 of these patients. In the remaining 41 patients (3.2%), the CSR results were negative, but injury was detected by CTC. All these injuries missed by CSR required treatment. For this group with false-negative CSR, the average GCS was 12 and the average ISS was 14.6. There were no missed cervical spine injuries among the patients with negative CTC results.No identifiable factors predicted false-negative CSR. There does not appear to be any role for CSR screening in this setting. The data from this study add to the growing body of evidence that CTC should replace CSR for the evaluation of the cervical spine in blunt trauma.Screening cervical spine CT in a level I trauma center: overutilization?The objective of our study was to analyze the use of screening cervical spine CT performed after trauma and establish the opportunity of potentially avoidable studies when evidence-based clinical criteria are applied before imaging.All cervical spine CT examinations performed in the emergency department of a level 1 trauma center between January and December 2008 on adult patients with trauma were analyzed; 1589 studies were evaluated. Radiology reports and clinical data were reviewed for the presence of fracture or ligamentous injury and for the mode of injury. We also looked for documentation of clinical criteria used to perform the CT study. In particular, we looked for mention of posterior midline cervical tenderness, focal neurologic deficit, level of alertness, evidence of intoxication, and clinically apparent distracting injury. These five criteria were established by the National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study (NEXUS) to identify patients with a low probability of cervical spine injury who consequently needed no cervical spine imaging.Of the 1589 studies reviewed, 41 (2.6%) were positive for an acute cervical spine injury and 1524 (95.9%) were negative. The remaining 24 studies (1.5%) were indeterminate on the initial CT examination but subsequent imaging and clinical follow-up failed to show acute injury. Of the 1524 examinations with no acute injury, 364 (23.9%) had no documentation of any of the five NEXUS low-risk criteria.The strict application of the NEXUS low-risk criteria could potentially reduce the number of screening cervical spine CT examinations in the setting of trauma in more than 20% of cases, thereby avoiding a significant amount of unnecessary radiation and significant cost.Evaluation of the Oxford protocol for total spinal clearance in the unconscious trauma patient.Prolonged use of spinal precautions in unconscious trauma patients is associated with significant morbidity. The trauma service of the John Radcliffe Hospital uses full-length radiography, computed tomographic scanning, and dynamic screening of the cervical spine to clear the spine at the earliest opportunity.The results in 210 consecutive patients were reviewed. Seventy-eight patients underwent dynamic screening of the cervical spine.Five of these patients had a cervical fracture or instability. One patient had demonstrated minor changes only on plain radiography but gross instability on dynamic screening. There were no neurologic sequelae from dynamic screening and no fractures were missed. Collar removal was possible in all but one patient a median 3 days before extubation and 1 day after admission to the intensive care unit.Full length spinal radiography and dynamic cervical screening may allow early and safe discontinuation of spinal precautions in the unconscious trauma patient in whom clinical signs are absent or unreliable.Low-risk criteria for cervical-spine radiography in blunt trauma: a prospective study.Cervical-spine radiography does not need to be performed on selected blunt trauma patients who are awake, alert, nonintoxicated, do not complain of midline neck pain, and have no tenderness over the bony cervical spine.One thousand consecutive patients seen in the UCLA Emergency Medicine Center with a chief complaint of blunt trauma, for whom cervical-spine films were ordered and for whom prospective data questionnaires were completed.Clinicians completed data forms for each patient before radiograph results were known. Data items included mechanism of injury, evidence of intoxication, presence of cervical-spine pain and/or tenderness, level of alertness, presence of focal neurologic deficits, and presence of other severely painful injuries unrelated to the cervical spine. Physicians were also asked to estimate likelihood of significant cervical-spine injury.Twenty-seven patients with cervical-spine fracture were among the 974 patients for whom data forms were completed. A number of findings were statistically more common in the group of patients with fracture than without, but no single or paired findings identified all patients with fracture. All 27 patients with fracture had at least one of the following four characteristics: midline neck tenderness, evidence of intoxication, altered level of alertness, or a severely painful injury elsewhere. Three hundred fifty-three of 947 (37.3%) patients without cervical-spine fracture had none of these findings.Cervical-spine radiology may not be necessary in patients without spinous tenderness in the neck, intoxication, altered level of alertness, or other severely painful injury. A policy to limit films in such patients would have decreased film ordering by more than one third in this series, while identifying all patients with fracture.Out-of-hospital cervical spine clearance: agreement between emergency medical technicians and emergency physicians.Determine the level of agreement between emergency medical technicians (EMTs) and emergency physicians (EPs) when applying an existing emergency medical services/fire department protocol for out-of-hospital clinical cervical spine injury (CSI) clearance in blunt trauma patients.Prospective observational study of consecutive blunt trauma patients transported by emergency medical services/fire department during a 3-month study period. The setting was an urban Level I trauma center. Measurement of interrater agreement (kappa) was determined.Mean age of the 190 patients was 34+/-19 years (range, 6 -98 years). Fifty-nine percent of the patients were male. One hundred forty-six patients (77%) were immobilized by EMTs; 17 of these patients were clinically cleared by EPs. Forty-four patients (23%) were clinically cleared by EMTs and presented without CSI precautions; of these, 61% (27 of 44) were immobilized by EPs and 57% (25 of 44) had cervical spine radiographs obtained. Overall, 141 patients (74%) required radiographic clearance. CSI were detected in five patients (2.6%); all five were immobilized in the out-of-hospital setting. Overall disagreement between EMTs and EPs regarding out-of-hospital CSI clearance occurred in 44 patients (23%) (kappa=0.29; 95% confidence interval, 0.15-0.43; p < 0.01).Significant disagreement in clinical CSI clearance exists between EMTs and EPs. Further research and education is recommended before widespread implementation of this practice.Application of imaging guidelines in patients with suspected cervical spine trauma: retrospective analysis and literature review.Safe and efficient clearance of cervical spine injury in blunt trauma patients has been a controversial topic among health professionals. The increased availability of CT scanners in major trauma centers seems to be a factor that has led to increased number of unnecessary cervical spine imaging using this imaging modality. The objective of this study was to investigate the applicability and efficacy of a pre-test clinical criterion in order to stratify post-blunt trauma victims based on their risk of sustaining cervical spine injury and in turn recommend an appropriate imaging modality accordingly. Goergen's criteria (Australas Radiol 48(3):287, 2004), a pre-investigation diagnostic algorithm was retrospectively applied to 106 blunt trauma victims who presented to a level 1 trauma center in Sydney, Australia, and had a CT scan of cervical spine as part of their initial management. Overall, nine (8.5%) of patients sustained a significant cervical spine injury. All nine patients would be classified as high-risk victims according to the algorithm investigated in this study, warranting CT scanning. No patients with low-risk injuries were demonstrated to have a significant cervical spine injury. There was a statistically significant greater proportion of acute cervical spine injuries detected in the high-risk group (p value = 0.0024). Hence, using Goergen's diagnostic algorithm could reduce the number of unnecessary cervical spine CT scans ordered, while not compromising the quality of care in post-blunt trauma victims.Evaluation of the use of plain cervical spine radiography in patients with head injury.The records of 457 head trauma patients who underwent plain cervical spine radiography following head injury between January 1991 and December 1991 inclusive were reviewed. Seventy-six patients (17%) all above ten years of age had abnormalities; forty five were clinically suspected to have cervical spine injury because of cervical tenderness and/or neurological deficits and in the remaining thirty-one patients the cervical spine injuries were detected first on plain radiograph. The 31 vertebral injuries consisted off fracture-dislocations 12 fractures, 4 dislocations and one odontoid fracture. None of the 235 patients below the age of 10 years had cervical vertebral or cord injury. It is recommended that plain cervical spine radiography be performed on all patients with head injury associated with altered level of consciousness and who are above ten years of age.Cervical spine evaluation in obtunded or comatose pediatric trauma patients: A pilot study.A uniformly accepted protocol for evaluation and clearance of the cervical spine of pediatric trauma patients with altered mental status does not currently exist. We sought to detect cervical spine injuries in this group with minimal risk. Patients were evaluated with standard three-view cervical spine radiographs and CT when necessary. Those patients without radiographic abnormality and altered mental status underwent flexion-extension of the cervical spine using fluoroscopy with somatosensory evoked potential (SSEP) monitoring. Those with abnormal movement by fluoroscopy or changes in SSEP underwent MRI. Fifteen patients were evaluated with this protocol. Two patients had movement on flexion-extension of the cervical spine and 5 had SSEP changes. Three patients had an MRI with only 1 showing injury. Five patients had residual hemiparesis. Evaluation of the cervical spine in obtunded or comatose pediatric trauma patients can be done safely with flexion-extension under fluoroscopy and SSEP monitoring. Further prospective studies are required to determine the efficacy of SSEP monitoring for cervical spine clearance in this select population.Cervical spine injury: a clinical decision rule to identify high-risk patients for helical CT screening.We aimed to validate the routine use of a clinical decision rule to direct diagnostic imaging of adult blunt trauma patients at high risk for cervical spine injury.We previously developed and have since routinely used a prediction rule based on six clinical parameters to identify patients at greater than 5% risk of cervical spine injury to undergo screening helical CT of the cervical spine. During a 6-month period, 4285 screening imaging studies of the cervical spine were performed in adult blunt trauma patients. Six hundred one patients (398 males, 203 females; age range, 16-100 years; median age, 38 years) underwent helical CT, and the remainder underwent 3684 conventional radiographic examinations. Clinical and report data were extracted from the radiology department database, medical records, and the hospital trauma registry. Abnormal findings were independently confirmed by additional imaging studies, autopsy results, or clinical outcome.The true-positive cervical spine injury rates in helical CT- and conventional radiography-screened patients who presented directly to our trauma center were 40 (8.7%) of 462 and seven (0.2%) of 3684, respectively. The cervical spine injury rate in patients who were transferred from outside institutions to our trauma center and who underwent helical CT was 37 (26.6%) of 139. This figure included 20 patients already known to have cervical spine fracture.The clinical decision rule can distinguish patients at high and low risk of cervical spine injury, thus supporting its validity.Evaluation of acute cervical spine imaging based on ACR Appropriateness Criteria®.The objectives of this study were to determine the rate of acute blunt cervical spine injury at an academic urban level 1 trauma center and to evaluate the utilization of cervical spine imaging based on the established American College of Radiology (ACR) Appropriateness Criteria®. We retrospectively reviewed all radiography and CT imaging of the cervical spine performed over a year period in adult patients presenting with acute blunt cervical spine trauma. Exclusion criteria were children ≤17 years, non-acute trauma of ≥72 h, and penetrating trauma. Any fracture, dislocation, or ligamentous instability demonstrated by diagnostic imaging and requiring stabilization or specialized follow-up was defined as clinically significant cervical spine injury. A total of 1,325 cervical spine studies were reviewed in 1,245 patients; 32.7% (433/1,325) were cervical spine radiographs and 67.3% (892/1,325) were CT examinations. Approximately 1.5% (19/1,245) of the patients demonstrated clinically significant acute cervical spine injury. There were 6.4% (80/1,245) patients who received both cervical spine radiographs and CT as imaging evaluation. Based on the ACR Appropriateness Criteria®, all of the cervical spine radiographs performed (433) were determined to be "inappropriate" imaging in the setting of acute cervical spine injury.Role of routine emergency cervical radiography in head trauma.This review of 406 patients with head injury examines the role of emergency cervical radiography in head trauma and the frequency of associated cervical spine injury. Of 293 patients who had emergency cervical radiography (72 percent), 8 showed some abnormality, but only 5 (1.2 percent) were significant for cervical spine injury. All eight patients were, however, clinically suspected to have associated cervical spine injury before emergency cervical radiography. One hundred thirteen patients (28 percent) did not undergo emergency cervical radiography based on clinical evaluation, and none was subsequently found to have a missed cervical spine injury. There was no correlation between severity of head injury and the presence of associated cervical spine injury (p greater than 0.16). Head trauma is infrequently associated with cervical spine injury and when present is usually not clinically occult. Emergency cervical radiography is not efficacious and should not be routine in the emergency room management of head trauma. When associated cervical spine injury is clinically suspected, adequate cervical immobilization should be maintained and cervical radiography performed on a low priority basis. Head injury due to automobile and pedestrian or motorcycle and automobile accident may be more likely to be associated with cervical spine injury.A multidisciplinary approach to the development of a cervical spine clearance protocol: process, rationale, and initial results.Assessment of potential spine injuries is inconsistent and controversial. Subsequent morbidity includes prolonged immobilization and missed injuries. To address these issues, a multidisciplinary team was organized to design a cervical spine management/clearance pathway. The process, algorithm, and initial results are described.Team members consisted of pediatric surgeons, orthopedic surgeons, neurosurgeons, emergency room physicians, and trauma nurse practitioners. Nationwide standards, guidelines, and experiences across disciplines were reviewed, and a consensus pathway evolved for cervical spine clearance in children 8 years and younger. A short-term retrospective review (5 months) was performed to assess initial performance. Time required for clearance, number and type of imaging studies, and number of missed injuries were compared between a group of patients before (n = 71) and after (n = 56) the implementation of the pathway.Strict guidelines for cervical spine immobilization and clearance criteria were defined. After implementation of this pathway, time required for cervical clearance in nonintubated children decreased (before, 12.3 +/- 1.5 v after, 7.5 +/- 0.9 hours; P =.014). A clear trend toward earlier clearance in intubated patients existed (before [n = 6], 40.0 +/- 16.8 v after [n = 6], 19.4 +/- 8.1 hours; P =.10); there need to be larger numbers to determine statistical significance. The 2 study groups were similar in age; mechanism of injury; Glasgow coma scale score; and number of plain x-rays, computed tomography scans, and magnetic resonance imaging studies obtained. Neither group had missed injuries.standards for cervical spine immobilization, assessment, and clearance. Implementation of such guidelines decreased time for cervical spine clearance, and ongoing analysis of sensitivity is encouraging.Frequency and significance of fractures of the upper cervical spine detected by CT in patients with severe neck trauma.Radiographic evaluation of the upper cervical spine in patients who have suffered severe trauma is often problematic because of the difficulty of obtaining adequate open-mouth views of the odontoid in these critically ill patients. This study was undertaken to determine the frequency and clinical significance of upper cervical spine fractures detected by CT in this patient population.The study group consisted of 100 consecutive patients brought to the emergency department after severe trauma who had CT of the craniocervical junction done instead of an open-mouth view. Plain film evaluation consisted of a cross-table lateral view, an anteroposterior view, and, if necessary, a swimmer's view. The radiographic studies were reviewed retrospectively by a musculoskeletal radiologist and a neuroradiologist, respectively. Hospital records were reviewed to ascertain the patients' clinical signs and symptoms on admittance and to determine how identification of the fractures changed the treatment plan.Eight fractures in seven patients were identified with CT of the craniocervical junction. Three of the fractures were of the occipital condyle, and five were at the C1-C2 level. None of the fractures were seen directly on plain radiographs, although secondary signs of injury such as prevertebral soft-tissue swelling were seen in two of the seven cases.CT of the craniocervical junction revealed an 8% frequency of fractures of the occipital condyle and C1-C2 that were undetected on the cross-table lateral cervical spine radiographs. Fractures occurred in greater numbers than expected, and all surviving patients were stabilized with a halo. This experience shows that CT is an efficient method of evaluating patients in whom the standard open-mouth radiograph of the odontoid cannot be done.Role of clinical examination in screening for blunt cervical spine injury.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the hypothesis that awake and alert blunt trauma patients with Glasgow Coma Scores of 14 or 15 (regardless of blood ethanol level or other injuries sustained) can be effectively evaluated with clinical examination without radiographic evaluation of the cervical spine.During a 32-month period at an urban Level 1 Trauma Center, 2,176 consecutive blunt trauma patients who presented with Glasgow Coma Scores of 14 or 15 were prospectively evaluated by trauma resident housestaff. Housestaff performed physical examinations of the neck and questioned the patients for the presence of neck pain. Following study form documentation of the cervical neck examination, a lateral cervical spine x-ray was performed. Further studies such as swimmer's view and CAT scan were performed if the lateral x-ray could not completely evaluate C1 to C7. These further studies were considered part of the lateral cervical spine (c-spine) x-ray screen. Attending radiologists performed final x-ray interpretations.The study consisted of 2,176 patients, 33 (1.6%) of whom were diagnosed with cervical spine injury. Of the 33 patients with cervical spine injury, 3 had negative clinical examinations (sensitivity, 91%). Lateral c-spine x-ray screen was negative in 1 of these 3 patients. The 2 patients with negative c-spine clinical examination but positive lateral c-spine x-ray screens were diagnosed with C2 spinous process fracture and C6-C7 body fractures. Thirteen patients with negative lateral c-spine screens (sensitivity, 61%) were diagnosed with cervical spine injury. We evaluated 463 patients with blood ethanol levels greater than 100 mg/dL, and 6 (1.3%) were diagnosed with c-spine injury. No injuries were missed on clinical examination in this subgroup with elevated blood ethanol levels.1) Clinical examination of the neck can reliably rule out significant cervical spine injury in the awake and alert blunt trauma patient. Addition of lateral c-spine x-ray does not improve the sensitivity of clinical examination in the diagnosis of significant cervical spine injury. 2) Elevated ethanol level is not a contraindication to the use of clinical examination as the screening tool for cervical spine injury. Level of consciousness, as determined by Glasgow Coma Score, is a more effective criterion to dictate a screening method for cervical spine injury.Can an out-of-hospital cervical spine clearance protocol identify all patients with injuries? An argument for selective immobilization.We sought to determine the sensitivity of the Fresno/Kings/Madera emergency medical services (EMS) selective spine immobilization protocol in identifying patients with potential cervical injuries. We also sought to determine whether the protocol was safe in the out-of-hospital setting.We conducted a retrospective chart review of all patients discharged from 5 trauma-receiving hospitals in Fresno County with the diagnosis of cervical spine injury between July 1, 1990, and June 30, 1996. All of these patients transported to the hospital by EMS personnel were selected for the study group. Medical records of those patients not immobilized were further investigated to identify protocol violations or deficiencies.There were 861 patients with significant cervical injuries during this time span. EMS personnel brought 504 patients to the hospital, of which 495 arrived in cervical spine immobilization. Of the remaining 9 patients, 2 refused immobilization, and 2 could not be immobilized; 3 injuries were missed by the protocol criteria, and 2 injuries were missed because of protocol violations. Of these last 5 patients, 1 patient had an adverse outcome, 2 injuries were considered unstable, 4 patients were older than 67 years, and one patient was 9 months old.The Fresno/Kings/Madera EMS selective spine immobilization protocol is 99% (95% CI, 97.7% to 99.7%) sensitive in identifying patients with cervical injuries for immobilization. Those patients not identified were at extremes of age. These results suggest that selective immobilization may be safely applied in the out-of-hospital setting but should be used with caution at extremes of age.Retrospective application of the NEXUS low-risk criteria for cervical spine radiography in Canadian emergency departments.We evaluate the accuracy, reliability, and potential impact of the National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study (NEXUS) low-risk criteria for cervical spine radiography, when applied in Canadian emergency departments (EDs).The Canadian C-Spine Rule derivation study was a prospective cohort study conducted in 10 Canadian EDs that recruited alert and stable adult trauma patients. Physicians completed a 20-item data form for each patient and performed interobserver assessments when feasible. The prospective assessments included the 5 individual NEXUS criteria but not an explicit interpretation of the overall need for radiography according to the criteria. Patients underwent plain radiography, flexion-extension views, and computed tomography at the discretion of the treating physician. Patients who did not have radiography were followed up with a structured outcome assessment by telephone to determine clinically important cervical spine injury, a previously validated outcome measurement. Analyses included sensitivity and specificity with 95% confidence interval (CI), kappa coefficient, and potential radiography rates.Among 8,924 patients, 151 (1.7%) patients had an important cervical spine injury. The combined NEXUS criteria identified important cervical spine injury with a sensitivity of 92.7% (95% CI 87% to 96%) and a specificity of 37.8% (95% CI 37% to 39%). Application of the NEXUS criteria would have potentially reduced cervical spine radiography rates by 6.1% from the actual rate of 68.9% to 62.8%. Of 11 patients with important injuries not identified, 2 were treated with internal fixation and 3 with a halo.This retrospective validation found the NEXUS low-risk criteria to be less sensitive than previously reported. The NEXUS low-risk criteria should be further explicitly and prospectively evaluated for accuracy and reliability before widespread clinical use outside of the United States.Computed tomography alone may clear the cervical spine in obtunded blunt trauma patients: a prospective evaluation of a revised protocol.Cervical spine (CS) clearance in obtunded blunt trauma patients (OBTPs) remains controversial. When computed tomography (CT) of the CS is negative for injury, debate continues over the role of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI). Use of MRI in OBTPs is costly, time-consuming, and potentially dangerous. Our study evaluated the safety of a protocol to discontinue the cervical collar in OBTPs based on CT scan alone.A prospective study was performed from October 2006 to September 2008 at a regional Level I trauma center on OBTPs with gross movement of all extremities. After a CT of the CS was read as negative for injury, the CS was cleared and the collar was removed. Patients were then followed prospectively for related complications.One hundred ninety-seven patients had their collars removed and CS cleared at a mean of 3.3 days. There were 144 males (73%), and the average age was 47.1 years. Sixty-two percent of patients were reexamined by a physician when no longer obtunded and found to have no CS signs or symptoms. Five patients (2.5%), when no longer obtunded, had persistent pain for which MRI CS was negative for injury. Coroner reports and autopsies were reviewed for missed spinal cord injuries in the 13% who died before reexamination. One of these patients had an autopsy report of an isolated CS ligamentous injury, deemed to be stable by our attending neurosurgeon. We followed up an additional 12% by phone or chart review, with no report of new onset neurologic deficit. The remaining 11% were lost to follow-up, but no patient contacted our hospital to report deterioration in function. One patient (0.5%) developed a minor CS decubitus ulceration.Removal of CS precautions in OBTPs with gross movement of all extremities is safe and efficacious if CT CS is negative for injury. Supplemental MRI CS is not needed in this patient population.Use of plain radiography to screen for cervical spine injuries.Standard radiographic screening may fail to reveal any evidence of injury in some patients with spinal injury. The purposes of this investigation were to document the efficacy of standard radiographic views and to categorize the frequencies and types of injuries missed on plain radiographic screening of the cervical spine.All patients with blunt trauma selected for radiographic cervical spine imaging at 21 participating institutions underwent a standard 3-view series (cross-table lateral, anteroposterior, and odontoid views), as well as any other imaging deemed necessary by their physicians. Injuries detected with screening radiography were then compared with final injury status for each patient, as determined by review of all radiographic studies.The study enrolled 34,069 patients with blunt trauma, including 818 patients (2.40% of all patients; 95% confidence interval [CI] 2.40% to 2.40%) having a total of 1,496 distinct cervical spine injuries. Plain radiographs revealed 932 injuries in 498 patients (1.46% of all patients; 95% CI 1.46% to 1.46%) but missed 564 injuries in 320 patients (0.94% of all patients; 95% CI 0.94% to 0.94%). The majority of missed injuries (436 injuries in 237 patients [representing 0.80% of all patients]; 95% CI 0.80% to 0.80%) occurred in cases in which plain radiographs were interpreted as abnormal (but not diagnostic of injury) or inadequate. However, 23 patients (0.07% of all patients; 95% CI 0.05% to 0.09%) had 35 injuries (including 3 potentially unstable injuries) that were not visualized on adequate plain film imaging. These patients represent 2.81% (95% CI 1.89% to 3.63%) of all injured patients with blunt trauma undergoing radiographic evaluation.Standard 3-view imaging provides reliable screening for most patients with blunt trauma. However, on rare occasions, such imaging may fail to detect significant unstable injuries. In addition, it is difficult to obtain adequate plain radiographic imaging in a substantial minority of patients.Cervical spine computed tomography utilization in pediatric trauma patients.Guidelines for evaluating the cervical spine in pediatric trauma patients recommend cervical spine CT (CSCT) when plain radiographs suggest an injury. Our objective was to compare usage of CSCT between a pediatric trauma center (PTC) and referral general emergency departments (GEDs).Patient data from a pediatric trauma registry from 2002 to 2011 were analyzed. Rates of CSI and CSCT of patients presenting to the PTC and GED were compared. Factors associated with use of CSCT were assessed using multivariate logistic regression.5148 patients were evaluated, 2142 (41.6%) at the PTC and 3006 (58.4%) at the GED. Groups were similar with regard to age, gender, GCS, and triage category. GED patients had a higher median ISS (14 vs. 9, p<0.05) and more frequent ICU admissions (44.3% vs. 26.1% p<0.05). CSI rate was 2.1% (107/5148) and remained stable. CSCT use increased from 3.5% to 16.1% over time at the PTC (mean 9.6% 95% CI=8.3, 10.9) and increased from 6.8% to 42.0% (mean 26.9%, CI=25.4, 28.4) at the GED. Initial care at a GED remained strongly associated with CSCT.Despite a stable rate of CSI, rate of CSCT increased significantly over time, especially among patients initially evaluated at a GED.Are cervical spine X-rays mandatory in all blunt trauma patients?Traumatic cervical spine injuries can result in severe disability or death unless promptly diagnosed and treated. Advanced trauma life support guidelines recommend that three-view cervical spine X-rays should be obtained routinely in all blunt trauma patients. In this retrospective study, we evaluated whether cervical spine X-rays are indeed necessary in all such patients. The study comprised those patients who were conscious, fully orientated, co-operative and non-intoxicated. Among the 303 blunt trauma patients seen at our emergency department between January and December 1993, a total of 267 patients had well-written charts and met our inclusion criteria. Thirteen (5%) patients who complained of neck pain or had neck tenderness on initial examination were found to harbour cervical spine injuries. Of those patients sustaining cervical spine injuries, examination of three (23%) disclosed abnormal neurological findings. On the other hand, none of the patients without neck pain and tenderness were found to have cervical spine injury. We conclude that pain and/or tenderness in the neck area are valid criteria with regard to the timely diagnosis of cervical spine injuries, and that routine cervical spine X-rays may be unnecessary for those blunt trauma patients who are conscious, fully orientated, co-operative, non-intoxicated, exhibit no neurological deficits and who do not have neck pain or tenderness. Omitting cervical X-rays speeds up patient evaluation, protects the department staff from unnecessary exposure to ionizing radiation and mitigates treatment costs, while maintaining the quality of the healthcare provided.[Roentgenologic diagnosis of the cervical spine in childhood].The degree of lordosis and mobility of the cervical spine, the "formation of steps" at the top end of the cervical spine, the Atlas-Dens distance, the diameter of the bony cervical spine canal and the breadth of the retropharyngeal and retrotracheal space were measured on 360 lateral radiograms of the cervical spine in the median position, at maximum flexion and maximum extension. The subjects were 120 children aged three to 14 years. The discussion of the results draws attention to their practical value and to the importance of functional radiographical examination of the cervical spine during childhood.Clinical indications for cervical spine radiographs in alert trauma patients.Cervical spine fracture/dislocation is a potentially devastating injury that may be clinically difficult to diagnose. Therefore, a vast majority of trauma patients undergo cervical spine X rays when only a relatively small number of them will actually have a cervical spine injury. Because of the costly overuse of radiography, studies have been undertaken to define high yield criteria for evaluation of patients. This study examined the characteristics of acute cervical spine fracture/dislocation in alert trauma patients. Of 79 patients with this discharge diagnosis at St. Elizabeth Hospital Medical Center between 1982 and 1987, 47 met the criteria of Class I level of consciousness. All 47 patients complained of neck pain or demonstrated cervical tenderness to palpation. Other parameters (such as loss of consciousness, paresthesias, decreased sensation, weakness, cervical muscle spasm, decreased anal tone, and associated injuries) did not, individually or in combination with each other, consistently predict cervical spine injury. Although occult or painless cervical spine injuries have been reported in the literature, a careful review of these cases revealed that these injuries were not truly asymptomatic. Our study suggests that selected patients can be excluded from radiologic evaluation of the cervical spine. However, large prospective studies are needed to validate this finding.The Canadian C-spine rule performs better than unstructured physician judgment.We compare the predictive accuracy of emergency physicians' unstructured clinical judgment to the Canadian C-Spine rule.This prospective multicenter cohort study was conducted at 10 Canadian urban academic emergency departments. Included in the study were alert, stable, adult patients with a Glasgow Coma Scale score of 15 and trauma to the head or neck. This was a substudy of the Canadian C-Spine and CT Head Study. Eligible patients were prospectively evaluated before radiography. Physicians estimated the probability of unstable cervical spine injury from 0% to 100% according to clinical judgment alone and filled out a data form. Interobserver assessments were done when feasible. Patients underwent cervical spine radiography or follow-up to determine clinically important cervical spine injuries. Analyses included comparison of areas under the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve with 95% confidence intervals (CIs) and the kappa coefficient.During 18 months, 6265 patients were enrolled. The mean age was 36.6 years (range 16 to 97 years), and 50.1% were men. Sixty-four (1%) patients had a clinically important injury. The physicians' kappa for a 0% predicted probability of injury was 0.46 (95% CI 0.28 to 0.65). The respective areas under the ROC curve for predicting cervical spine injury were 0.85 (95% CI 0.80 to 0.89) for physician judgment and 0.91 (95% CI 0.89 to 0.92) for the Canadian C-Spine rule (P <.05). With a threshold of 0% predicted probability of injury, the respective indices of accuracy for physicians and the Canadian C-Spine rule were sensitivity 92.2% versus 100% (P <.001) and specificity 53.9% versus 44.0% (P <.001).Interobserver agreement of unstructured clinical judgment for predicting clinically important cervical spine injury is only fair, and the sensitivity is unacceptably low. The Canadian C-Spine rule was better at detecting clinically important injuries with a sensitivity of 100%. Prospective validation has recently been completed and should permit widespread use of the Canadian C-Spine rule.Radiographic cervical spine evaluation in the alert asymptomatic blunt trauma victim: much ado about nothing.To evaluate the hypothesis that alert nonintoxicated trauma patients with negative clinical examinations are at no risk of cervical spine injury and do not need any radiographic investigation.Prospective study.A university-affiliated teaching county hospital.Five hundred and forty-nine consecutive alert, oriented, and clinically nonintoxicated blunt trauma victims with no neck symptoms.All patients had negative clinical neck examinations. After radiographic assessment, no cervical spine injuries were identified. Less than half the patients could be evaluated adequately with the three standard initial views (anteroposterior, lateral, and odontoid). All the rest needed more radiographs and/or computed tomographic scans. A total of 2,27 cervical spine radiographs, 78 computed tomographic scans and magnetic resonance imagings were performed. Seventeen patients stayed one day in the hospital for no other reason but radiographic clearance of an asymptomatic neck. The total cost for x-rays and extra hospital days was $242,000. These patients stayed in the collar for an average of 3.3 hours (range, 0.5-72 hours). There was never an injury missed.Clinical examination alone can reliably assess all blunt trauma patients who are alert, nonintoxicated, and report no neck symptoms. In the absence of any palpation or motion neck tenderness during examination, the patient may be released from cervical spine precautions without any radiographic investigations.Patterns and risks in spinal trauma.Spinal injury in children is rare, and poses many difficulties in management.To ascertain the prevalence of spinal injury within the paediatric trauma population, and to assess relative risks of spinal injury according to age, conscious level, injury severity score (ISS), and associated injuries.Spine injured children were identified from the UK Trauma Audit & Research Network Database from 1989 to 2000. Relative risks of injury were calculated against the denominator paediatric trauma population.Of 19 538 on the database, 527 (2.7%) suffered spinal column fracture/dislocation without cord injury and 109 had cord injury (0.56% of all children; 16.5% of spine injured children). Thirty children (0.15% of all children; 4.5% of spine injured children) sustained spinal cord injury without radiological abnormality (SCIWORA). Cord injury and SCIWORA occurred more commonly in children aged < or =8. The risk of spine fracture/dislocation without cord injury was increased with an ISS >25 and with chest injuries. The risk of cord injury was increased with reduced GCS, head injury, and chest injury.Spinal cord injury and SCIWORA occur more frequently in young children. Multiple injuries and chest injuries increase the risk of fracture/dislocation and of cord injury. Reduced GCS and head injuries increase the risk of cord injury.A prospective analysis of a two-year experience using computed tomography as an adjunct for cervical spine clearance.The role of CT scanning as an adjunct to plain roentgenograms of the cervical spine was reviewed in acutely injured blunt trauma patients. Following institution of a protocol to evaluate the cervical spine in all blunt trauma patients, 179 patients underwent CT scanning of their cervical spine. This was performed for patients whose x-ray findings were positive, for patients with plain x-ray films suggestive of a pathologic condition, for patients with plain x-ray films that did not reveal all of the cervical vertebrae, and for patients who had persistent pain or neurologic deficits despite normal plain x-ray films. Of 123 patients not able to have their cervical spine cleared by normal roentgenograms, 93% were cleared within 24 hours of admission based on CT scans. There were no missed injuries in this setting. A false-positive rate of 28% and a false-negative rate of 1.5% were found for plain roentgenograms. Computed tomographic scans detected 98% of the injuries in our study and when combined with a three-view plain x-ray series of the cervical spine, 100% of cervical spine injuries were detected. Computed tomographic scanning as an adjunct to plain x-ray films of the cervical spine is a highly accurate and expedient modality to clear the cervical spine of blunt trauma patients.Cervical spine clearance in the nonalert, noncommunicative, or unreliable pediatric blunt trauma patient.Currently, there is no nationally recognized evidence-based guideline or protocol for cervical spine clearance in nonalert, noncommunicative, or unreliable pediatric blunt trauma patients. This descriptive survey study sought to identify current practices and elicit expert opinion data regarding pediatric cervical spine clearance in a specialized population of children in trauma centers in the United States. A 93-item electronic Pediatric Cervical Spine Clearance Survey was sent to 309 members of the Pediatric Special Interest Group of the National Society of Trauma Nurses. The main areas of interest in the survey included trauma verification, annual volume of pediatric trauma cases, and sequence and time frames of diagnostic testing for cervical spine clearance by age group. Additional areas of interest were perceived supports and barriers to meeting target time frames for diagnostic testing and outcomes to evaluate the impact of a cervical spine clearance guideline for pediatric blunt trauma. The results from 44 respondents demonstrate that trauma centers are using a variety of diagnostic testing sequences and time frames when clearing children for suspected cervical spine injury.Utility of a cervical spine clearance protocol after trauma in children between 0 and 3 years of age.Cervical spine clearance after trauma in children 0-3 years of age is deceptively difficult. Young children may not be able to communicate effectively, and severe injuries may require intubation and sedation. Currently, no published guidelines are available to aid in decision-making in these complex situations. The purpose of this study was to determine whether a safe and effective protocol-driven system could be developed for clearance of the cervical spine in noncommunicative children between 0 and 3 years of age.Children 0-3 years of age, including intubated patients, who were admitted after trauma activation at Primary Children's Medical Center in Salt Lake City or the Children's Hospital of New York from 2002 to 2006 were managed according to a cervical spine clearance protocol. Data were collected in a prospective fashion. Radiographic and clinical methods of clearing the cervical spine, as well as the type and management of injuries, were recorded.A total of 2828 pediatric trauma activations required cervical spine clearance during the study period. Of these, 575 (20%) were children <or= 3 years of age who were admitted to the hospital. To facilitate clearing the cervical spine in these children, plain radiographs (100%), CT studies (14%), and MR images (10%) were obtained. Nineteen ligamentous injuries (3.3%) and 9 fractures/dislocations (1.5%) were detected, with 4 patients requiring operative stabilization (0.7%). No late injuries have been detected.The protocol used has been effective in detecting cervical spine injuries in noncommunicative children after trauma. The combination of clinical information and radiographic studies is essential for safely clearing the cervical spine in these complex situations. Clearance of the cervical spine without CT or MR imaging studies is possible in the majority of cases, even in very young patients.[The cervical spine of children in the x-ray and clinical picture].Epidemiology and predictors of spinal injury in adult major trauma patients: European cohort study.This is a European cohort study on predictors of spinal injury in adult (≥16 years) major trauma patients, using prospectively collected data of the Trauma Audit and Research Network from 1988 to 2009. Predictors for spinal fractures/dislocations or spinal cord injury were determined using univariate and multivariate logistic regression analysis. 250,584 patients were analysed. 24,000 patients (9.6%) sustained spinal fractures/dislocations alone and 4,489 (1.8%) sustained spinal cord injury with or without fractures/dislocations. Spinal injury patients had a median age of 44.5 years (IQR = 28.8-64.0) and Injury Severity Score of 9 (IQR = 4-17). 64.9% were male. 45% of patients suffered associated injuries to other body regions. Age <45 years (≥45 years OR 0.83-0.94), Glasgow Coma Score (GCS) 3-8 (OR 1.10, 95% CI 1.02-1.19), falls >2 m (OR 4.17, 95% CI 3.98-4.37), sports injuries (OR 2.79, 95% CI 2.41-3.23) and road traffic collisions (RTCs) (OR 1.91, 95% CI 1.83-2.00) were predictors for spinal fractures/dislocations. Age <45 years (≥45 years OR 0.78-0.90), male gender (female OR 0.78, 95% CI 0.72-0.85), GCS <15 (OR 1.36-1.93), associated chest injury (OR 1.10, 95% CI 1.01-1.20), sports injuries (OR 3.98, 95% CI 3.04-5.21), falls >2 m (OR 3.60, 95% CI 3.21-4.04), RTCs (OR 2.20, 95% CI 1.96-2.46) and shooting (OR 1.91, 95% CI 1.21-3.00) were predictors for spinal cord injury. Multilevel injury was found in 10.4% of fractures/dislocations and in 1.3% of cord injury patients. As spinal trauma occurred in >10% of major trauma patients, aggressive evaluation of the spine is warranted, especially, in males, patients <45 years, with a GCS <15, concomitant chest injury and/or dangerous injury mechanisms (falls >2 m, sports injuries, RTCs and shooting). Diagnostic imaging of the whole spine and a diligent search for associated injuries are substantial.Canadian C-spine Rule and the National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Low-Risk Criteria for C-spine radiography in young trauma patients.The Canadian C-spine (cervical spine) Rule (CCR) and the National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Low-Risk Criteria (NLC) are criteria designed to guide C-spine radiography in trauma patients. It is unclear how these 2 rules compare with young children.This study retrospectively examined case-matched trauma patients 10 years or younger. Two cohorts were identified-cohort A where C-spine imaging was performed and cohort B where no imaging was conducted. The CCR and NLC criteria were then applied retrospectively to each cohort.Cohort A contained 125 cases and cohort B with 250 cases. Seven patients (3%) had significant C-spine injuries. In cohort A, NLC criteria could be applied in 108 (86.4%) of 125 and CCR in 109 (87.2%) of 125. National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Low-Risk Criteria suggested that 70 (58.3%) cases required C-spine imaging compared to 93 (76.2%) by CCR. National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Low-Risk Criteria missed 3 C-spine injuries, and CCR missed one. In cohort B, NLC criteria could be applied in 132 (88%) of 150 and CCR in 131 (87.3%) of 150. The NLC criteria identified 8 cases and CCR identified 13 cases that would need C-spine radiographs. Fisher's 2-sided Exact test demonstrated that CCR and NLC predictions were significantly different (P = .002) in both cohorts. The sensitivity of CCR was 86% and specificity was 94%, and the NLC had a sensitivity of 43% and a specificity of 96%.Although CCR and NLC criteria may reduce the need for C-spine imaging in children 10 years and younger; they are not sensitive or specific enough to be used as currently designed.Implementation of the Canadian C-Spine Rule: prospective 12 centre cluster randomised trial.To evaluate the effectiveness of an active strategy to implement the validated Canadian C-Spine Rule into multiple emergency departments.Matched pair cluster randomised trial.University and community emergency departments in Canada. Participants 11 824 alert and stable adults presenting with blunt trauma to the head or neck at one of 12 hospitals.Six hospitals were randomly allocated to the intervention and six to the control. At the intervention sites, active strategies were used to implement the Canadian C-Spine Rule, including education, policy, and real time reminders on radiology requisitions. No specific intervention was introduced to alter the behaviour of doctors requesting cervical spine imaging at the control sites.Diagnostic imaging rate of the cervical spine during two 12 month before and after periods.Patients were balanced between control and intervention sites. From the before to the after periods, the intervention group showed a relative reduction in cervical spine imaging of 12.8% (95% confidence interval 9% to 16%; 61.7% v 53.3%; P=0.01) and the control group a relative increase of 12.5% (7% to 18%; 52.8% v 58.9%; P=0.03). These changes were significant when both groups were compared (P<0.001). No fractures were missed and no adverse outcomes occurred.Implementation of the Canadian C-Spine Rule led to a significant decrease in imaging without injuries being missed or patient morbidity. Final imaging rates were much lower at intervention sites than at most US hospitals. Widespread implementation of this rule could lead to reduced healthcare costs and more efficient patient flow in busy emergency departments worldwide.Clinical trials NCT00290875.What defines a distracting injury in cervical spine assessment?The National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study defined five criteria for obtaining cervical spine radiographic investigations in blunt trauma patients. Distracting injury was given as the indication for more than 30% of all x-ray studies ordered. The hypothesis of this study was that upper and lower torso injuries would have different effects on clinical cervical spine assessment.This is a single-center, prospective, observational study of admitted, alert, adult blunt-trauma patients. All patients underwent cervical spine plain-film radiography. Data were collected on all injuries, physical examination findings, narcotic administration, and radiograph results. Patients with upper and lower torso injuries were compared in their ability complain of pain or midline tenderness relative to a cervical spine fracture.In all, 406 patients participated. All patients received narcotic analgesics before examination. Forty patients (9.9%) had cervical spine fractures, of whom seven had a nontender neck examination. All seven patients with a nontender cervical spine and a neck fracture had at least one upper torso injury. None of the 99 patients with injuries isolated to the lower torso and a nontender neck had a cervical spine fracture (p < 0.05). The frequency of cervical spine fracture among patients with cervical spine tenderness was 19.8% (n = 33).The National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study definition of a distracting injury may be narrowed. Upper torso injuries may be sufficiently painful to distract from a reliable cervical spine examination. Patients may detect spine tenderness in the presence of isolated painful lower torso injuries. Patients with spine tenderness warrant imaging.Detection of pediatric cervical spine injury.In evaluating the pediatric cervical spine for injury, the use of adult protocols without sufficient sensitivity to pediatric injury patterns may lead to excessive radiation doses. Data on injury location and means of detection can inform pediatric-specific guideline development.We retrospectively identified pediatric patients with codes from the International Classification of Diseases, 9th Revision, for cervical spine injury treated between 1980 and 2000. Collected data included physical findings, radiographic means of detection, and location of injury. Sensitivity of plain x-rays and diagnostic yield from additional radiographic studies were calculated.Of 239 patients, 190 had true injuries and adequate medical records; of these, 187 had adequate radiology records. Patients without radiographic abnormality were excluded. In 34 children younger than 8 years, National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study criteria missed two injuries (sensitivity, 94%), with 76% of injuries occurring from occiput-C2. In 158 children older than 8 years, National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study criteria identified all injured patients (sensitivity, 100%), with 25% of injuries occurring from occiput-C2. For children younger than 8 years, plain-film sensitivity was 75% and combination plain-film/occiput-C3 computed tomographic scan had a sensitivity of 94%, whereas combination plain-film and flexion-extension views had 81% sensitivity. In patients older than 8 years, the sensitivities were 93%, 97%, and 94%, respectively.Younger children tend to have more rostral (occiput-C2) injuries compared with older children. The National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study protocol may have lower sensitivity in young children than in adults. Limited computed tomography from occiput-C3 may increase diagnostic yield appreciably in young children compared with flexion-extension views. Further prospective studies, especially of young children, are needed to develop reliable pediatric protocols.Factors associated with the use of cervical spine computed tomography imaging in pediatric trauma patients.The objectives were to identify patient and hospital characteristics associated with the use of computed tomography (CT) imaging of the cervical spine (c-spine) in the evaluation of injured children and, in particular, to examine the influence of hospital setting.This was a retrospective cohort of children younger than 19 years of age from the Massachusetts Hospital Emergency Department (ED) database who were discharged from the ED with an injury diagnosis from 2005 through 2009. Multivariable logistic regression was used to analyze characteristics associated with CT imaging of the c-spine.Of the 929,626 pediatric patients diagnosed with an injury in Massachusetts EDs and then discharged home, 1.3% underwent CT imaging of the c-spine. Rates of CT imaging nearly doubled over the 5 years. In the multivariable model, patient age (adjusted odds ratio [AOR] = 2.3, 95% confidence interval [CI] = 2.0 to 2.7 for children age 12 to 18 years vs. under 1 year of age) and evaluation outside of a pediatric Level I trauma center (AOR = 2.2, 95% CI = 1.1 to 4.3 for children evaluated at non Level I trauma centers vs. pediatric Level I trauma centers; AOR = 2.1, 95% CI = 0.93 to 4.7 for children evaluated at adult Level I trauma centers vs. pediatric Level I trauma centers) were associated with higher rates of CT imaging of the c-spine.Cervical spine CT imaging for children discharged from the ED with trauma diagnoses increased from 2005 through 2009. Older age and evaluation outside a Level I pediatric trauma center were associated with a higher c-spine CT rate. Educational interventions focused outside pediatric trauma centers may be an effective approach to decreasing CT imaging of the c-spine of pediatric trauma patients.The usefulness of a modified adult protocol for the clearance of paediatric cervical spine injury in the emergency department.To determine if the use of a modified adult protocol that uses cervical spine imaging on presentation for the assessment of cervical spine injury in children improves clinical outcome.This is a case series study on all consecutive trauma patients presenting from April to July 2000 inclusive to the ED of a major paediatric trauma hospital. Children presenting to the ED with potential cervical spine injury (CSI) were identified using standard selection criteria. Patient demographics, mechanism of injury, method and time of presentation, associated injuries, radiological investigation and clinical outcome were recorded. The major outcome measures for this study were: time to clearance of the cervical spine, length of stay in the ED and admission to an in-hospital bed. Data were analysed for compliance to the protocol, this being the standard assessment pathway of cervical spine clearance used by our trauma service.The trauma registry identified 1721 trauma presentations during the 4-month study period; 208 presentations representing 200 children with potential CSI were entered into the study. Males represented 72.5% of the study population, having a mean age of 8.32 years, although 29% were less than 5 years of age. The majority of presentations (69%) occurred outside of normal working hours. In 17.8% of cases the cervical spine was cleared based on clinical assessment alone, half less than 5 years of age. Compliance to the protocol occurred in 78% of presentations. However, when examined by age group, children 5 years of age or above were 1.5 times more likely to comply with the protocol as compared with younger children. Adequate plain imaging was not obtained in 18% of presentations, this group almost exclusively less than 5 years of age. There were no missed injuries and no short or long-term neurological sequelae reported during this study. There were no differences in time to clearance, length of stay and admission rate between compliant and non-compliant groups.Modified adult protocols for cervical spine clearance offer guidance in managing the majority of children suffering blunt trauma. However, we recommend caution in rigidly applying such protocols, especially to children of young age.Clinical clearance of the cervical spine in blunt trauma patients younger than 3 years: a multi-center study of the american association for the surgery of trauma.Cervical spine clearance in the very young child is challenging. Radiographic imaging to diagnose cervical spine injuries (CSI) even in the absence of clinical findings is common, raising concerns about radiation exposure and imaging-related complications. We examined whether simple clinical criteria can be used to safely rule out CSI in patients younger than 3 years.The trauma registries from 22 level I or II trauma centers were reviewed for the 10-year period (January 1995 to January 2005). Blunt trauma patients younger than 3 years were identified. The measured outcome was CSI. Independent predictors of CSI were identified by univariate and multivariate analysis. A weighted score was calculated by assigning 1, 2, or 3 points to each independent predictor according to its magnitude of effect. The score was established on two thirds of the population and validated using the remaining one third.Of 12,537 patients younger than 3 years, CSI was identified in 83 patients (0.66%), eight had spinal cord injury. Four independent predictors of CSI were identified: Glasgow Coma Score <14, GCSEYE = 1, motor vehicle crash, and age 2 years or older. A score of <2 had a negative predictive value of 99.93% in ruling out CSI. A total of 8,707 patients (69.5% of all patients) had a score of <2 and were eligible for cervical spine clearance without imaging. There were no missed CSI in this study.CSI in patients younger than 3 years is uncommon. Four simple clinical predictors can be used in conjunction to the physical examination to substantially reduce the use of radiographic imaging in this patient population.Developing a spinal clearance protocol for unconscious pediatric trauma patients.Spinal injury in pediatric trauma is associated with significant morbidity and mortality, but no current consensus exists on the safest and most effective method of clearance in the high-risk pediatric trauma patient.A retrospective analysis was performed on the records of 115 pediatric patients who had suffered major trauma and required admission to the pediatric intensive care unit of a United Kingdom level I trauma centre during a 7-year period from January 2000 to December 2006. The spinal imaging performed, and methods of clearance for each spinal region were obtained from analysis of written and electronic medical documentation.In the cohort of 115 patients, there was a male predominance (63%) with motor vehicle accidents as the major mechanism of injury (63.5%). Ten patients (8.7%) were identified with spinal injuries, all of whom had sustained closed head injuries. Two of these patients had spinal cord injuries; one subsequently died. Spinal injury resulted in longer intubation times and intensive care stays, but no difference in new injury severity score or outcome. Clearance methods ranged from clinical examination to imaging with radiographs, computed tomography (CT), and dynamic screening. Magnetic resonance imaging was used as a secondary modality in two cases only, and in neither case was it used for clearance. CT demonstrated 100% specificity and sensitivity with positive and negative predictive values of 1 for all spinal regions. There were no cases of Spinal Cord Injury WithOut Radiologic Abnormality and no evidence of missed injuries.There is a need for an evidence-based protocol for the clearance of the spine in the obtunded and high-risk pediatric trauma patient. High-resolution CT with sagittal and coronal reconstructions should be the basis for cervical spinal clearance, in combination with the interpretation of films by an expert radiologist. All spinal regions should be imaged, and clearance should be formally documented. The role of magnetic resonance imaging in routine clearance remains controversial. Multicenter prospective studies are needed to develop consensus for an evidenced-based protocol for clearance in this high-risk group.Multicentre prospective validation of use of the Canadian C-Spine Rule by triage nurses in the emergency department.The Canadian C-Spine Rule for imaging of the cervical spine was developed for use by physicians. We believe that nurses in the emergency department could use this rule to clinically clear the cervical spine. We prospectively evaluated the accuracy, reliability and acceptability of the Canadian C-Spine Rule when used by nurses.We conducted this three-year prospective cohort study in six Canadian emergency departments. The study involved adult trauma patients who were alert and whose condition was stable. We provided two hours of training to 191 triage nurses. The nurses then assessed patients using the Canadian C-Spine Rule, including determination of neck tenderness and range of motion, reapplied immobilization and completed a data form.Of the 3633 study patients, 42 (1.2%) had clinically important injuries of the cervical spine. The kappa value for interobserver assessments of 498 patients with the Canadian C-Spine Rule was 0.78. We calculated sensitivity of 100.0% (95% confidence interval [CI] 91.0%-100.0%) and specificity of 43.4% (95% CI 42.0%-45.0%) for the Canadian C-Spine Rule as interpreted by the investigators. The nurses classified patients with a sensitivity of 90.2% (95% CI 76.0%-95.0%) and a specificity of 43.9% (95% CI 42.0%-46.0%). Early in the study, nurses failed to identify four cases of injury, despite the presence of clear high-risk factors. None of these patients suffered sequelae, and after retraining there were no further missed cases. We estimated that for 40.7% of patients, the cervical spine could be cleared clinically by nurses. Nurses reported discomfort in applying the Canadian C-Spine Rule in only 4.8% of cases.Use of the Canadian C-Spine Rule by nurses was accurate, reliable and clinically acceptable. Widespread implementation by nurses throughout Canada and elsewhere would diminish patient discomfort and improve patient flow in overcrowded emergency departments.Cervical radiographic evaluation of alert patients following blunt trauma.The records of 333 consecutive alert patients admitted to a trauma service for neurologic observation after sustaining significant blunt head trauma were reviewed. All patients had class I level of consciousness (alert, responds immediately to questions, may be disoriented and confused, follows complex commands); those with significant acute alcohol and/or drug intoxication were excluded from this study. Cervical spine injury did not correlate with the presence of major concomitant injuries, skull fractures, or major intracranial injuries. Cervical spine injury correlated only with the presence of signs and/or symptoms of cervical injury. This correlation was highly significant (P less than .05). Five of the 42 patients (11%) with signs and/or symptoms of cervical injury had cervical spine fractures. No patient without signs and/or symptoms of cervical injury had a cervical spine injury. These findings suggest that among alert patients with class I level of consciousness who have sustained blunt injury, only those who present with signs and/or symptoms of cervical injury require cervical radiographic evaluation.Clearing the cervical spine: initial radiologic evaluation.The identification of unstable cervical spine injury (UCSI) in blunt high-energy transfer injury (BHETI) patients is critical to management. In a prospective study of BHETI patients identified to be at high risk for UCSI, the use of lateral cervical spine view (LCV), three-view cervical spine series (FCS), and limited computerized tomography (CT) in the initial evaluation of these patients was analyzed. Thirteen of 204 patients sustained UCSI. Sensitivity of the LCV alone was 0.85 and the predictive value of the negative test was 0.97. Sensitivity and predictive value of a negative study were maximized by the use of FCS combined with CT when plain X-rays were inadequate. We conclude that technically adequate, normal FCS can be safely used to eliminate the presence of UCSI. If these studies are technically inadequate, the addition of a limited CT can be used to "clear" the spine.Computed tomography in the initial evaluation of the cervical spine.Unstable injury of the cervical spine must be considered in all victims of blunt trauma. To evaluate the role of limited, directed computed tomography (CT) in the initial evaluation of the cervical spine, a one-year study involving 104 high-risk patients was undertaken. Sensitivity was 0.78 overall, but in the group of patients scanned after inadequate plain radiographs, CT had a sensitivity of 1.0 for unstable cervical injury. All false-negative studies involved atlantoaxial rotary subluxation. We conclude that limited, directed CT of the cervical spine is appropriate in the initial evaluation of patients at risk, particularly if plain radiographs are inadequate, but is of limited value in the evaluation of ligamentous injury of the upper cervical spine.The Canadian C-spine rule versus the NEXUS low-risk criteria in patients with trauma.The Canadian C-Spine (cervical-spine) Rule (CCR) and the National Emergency X-Radiography Utilization Study (NEXUS) Low-Risk Criteria (NLC) are decision rules to guide the use of cervical-spine radiography in patients with trauma. It is unclear how the two decision rules compare in terms of clinical performance.We conducted a prospective cohort study in nine Canadian emergency departments comparing the CCR and NLC as applied to alert patients with trauma who were in stable condition. The CCR and NLC were interpreted by 394 physicians for patients before radiography.Among the 8283 patients, 169 (2.0 percent) had clinically important cervical-spine injuries. In 845 (10.2 percent) of the patients, physicians did not evaluate range of motion as required by the CCR algorithm. In analyses that excluded these indeterminate cases, the CCR was more sensitive than the NLC (99.4 percent vs. 90.7 percent, P<0.001) and more specific (45.1 percent vs. 36.8 percent, P<0.001) for injury, and its use would have resulted in lower radiography rates (55.9 percent vs. 66.6 percent, P<0.001). In secondary analyses that included all patients, the sensitivity and specificity of CCR, assuming that the indeterminate cases were all positive, were 99.4 percent and 40.4 percent, respectively (P<0.001 for both comparisons with the NLC). Assuming that the CCR was negative for all indeterminate cases, these rates were 95.3 percent (P=0.09 for the comparison with the NLC) and 50.7 percent (P=0.001). The CCR would have missed 1 patient and the NLC would have missed 16 patients with important injuries.For alert patients with trauma who are in stable condition, the CCR is superior to the NLC with respect to sensitivity and specificity for cervical-spine injury, and its use would result in reduced rates of radiography.Adequacy of plain radiography in the diagnosis of cervical spine injuries.Our hypotheses were (1) that plain radiography of the cervical spine in the evaluation of low risk patients with minor blunt trauma is accurate and (2) that computed tomography (CT) of the cervical spine in the evaluation of low risk patients is unnecessary. This study evaluates those hypotheses. We prospectively recorded findings of all patients with blunt trauma who underwent imaging over a period of 70 days. Injury status was determined by review of all radiographic studies obtained on each patient. Chart reviews were performed to determine mechanism of injury and neurological status. Patients were divided into three groups: very low risk, low risk, and high risk. Study end point was fracture. The study included 219 patients. The very low risk group had 107 patients, none of whom had fractures found on CT (projected specificity of plain radiography: 100%). The low risk group contained 78 patients who had no fractures seen on plain radiography or CT (specificity of plain radiography and CT: 100%). The high risk group consisted of 34 patients; 15 had fractures demonstrated on CT. Plain radiography missed one fracture out of 15. In low risk patients, plain radiography is an efficient diagnostic exam with a specificity of 100%. In high risk patients, plain radiography is a good adjunctive screening exam in conjunction with CT scan, with a sensitivity of 93.3% and specificity of 95%.Cervical spine injuries in children: a review of 103 patients treated consecutively at a level 1 pediatric trauma center.Cervical spine (C-spine) injuries occur infrequently in children but may be associated with significant disability and mortality. The purpose of this study was to review the experience of a level 1 pediatric trauma center to determine the epidemiology, risk factors, mechanisms, levels, types of injury, comorbid factors, and outcomes associated with these potentially devastating injuries.A retrospective analysis of 103 consecutive C-spine injuries treated at a level 1 pediatric trauma center over a 9(1/2)-year period (January 1991 through August 2000) was performed.The mean age was 10.3 +/- 5.2 years, and the male-to-female ratio was 1.6:1. The most common mechanism of injury was motor vehicle related (52%), followed by sporting injuries (27%). Football injuries accounted for 29% of all sports-related injuries. Sixty-eight percent of all children sustained injuries to C1 to C4; 25% to C5 to C7; and 7% to both. Spinal cord injury without radiographic abnormality (SCIWORA) occurred in 38%. Five patients had complete cord lesions involving the lower C-spine (C4 to C7); 4 of these were motor vehicle related, and all 4 patients died. Isolated C-spine injuries occurred in 43%, whereas 38% had associated closed head injuries (CHI). The overall mortality rate was 18.5%, most commonly motor vehicle related (95%), occurring in younger children (mean and median age 5 years) and associated with upper C-spine injuries (74%) and CHI (89%). C1 dislocations occurred in younger children (mean age, 6.6 years), most often as a result of motor vehicle-related trauma (especially pedestrians) and were associated with the highest injury severity score (ISS), longest length of stay (LOS), most CHIs, and the highest mortality rate (50%). C-spine fractures with or without SCI occurred most commonly as a result of falls and dives. Sporting injuries occurred almost exclusively in adolescent boys (mean age, 13.8 years) and were isolated injuries associated with a relatively low ISS and shorter LOS. Interestingly, 75% of sporting injuries showed SCIWORA, and all infants suffering from child abuse had SCIWORA.Mechanisms of injury are age related, with younger children sustaining C-spine injuries as a result of motor vehicle-related trauma and older adolescents commonly injured during sporting activities. C-spine injuries in children most commonly involve the upper C-spine, but complete lesions of the cord are associated more frequently with lower C-spine injuries. The type of C-spine injury is related to the mechanism of injury: SCIWORA is associated with sporting activities and child abuse, C-spine dislocations most commonly result from motor vehicle-related trauma (especially among pedestrians), and C-spine fractures occur most commonly as a result of falls and dives. Predictors of mortality include younger age, motor vehicle-related mechanism, C1 dislocations, high ISS greater than 25, and associated CHI. A high index of suspicion for SCIWORA is essential when evaluating adolescents with neck trauma associated with sporting injuries or victims of child abuse.Routine cervical spine radiography for trauma victims: Does everybody need it?The purpose of this study was to evaluate the indication for routine cervical spine radiography in trauma patients.Prospective analysis of radiologic and clinical findings was performed during a 5-year period. Patients suitable for a clinical decision rule were reviewed separately.Of the 1,757 consecutive patients included in the study, 38 were diagnosed with a cervical spine injury. Of the 599 patients suitable for the clinical decision rule, 62 had midline cervical tenderness, including 2 with cervical spine injury. No additional cervical spine injuries were found during follow-up.It is within good practice, and it is also cost-effective, to obtain a cervical spine radiograph only on clinical parameters in trauma patients with no apparent bodily trauma and optimal parameters. With this clinical decision rule, 30.6% of all cervical spine series were redundant, and no (occult) spinal fractures would have been undetected.Cervical spine clearance in blunt trauma: evaluation of a computed tomography-based protocol.Prompt identification of cervical spine injuries has been a critical issue in trauma management. In 1998, the authors developed a new protocol to evaluate cervical spines in blunt trauma. This protocol relies on clinical clearance for appropriate patients and helical computed tomography instead of plain radiographs for patients who cannot be clinically cleared. The authors then prospectively collected data on all cervical spine evaluations to assess the sensitivity and specificity of their approach.Any patient without clinical evidence of neurologic injury, alcohol or drug intoxication, or distracting injury underwent cervical spine evaluation by clinical examination. Patients who did not meet these criteria underwent helical computed tomographic scanning of the entire cervical spine. For patients who had neurologic deficits, a magnetic resonance image was obtained. If the patient was not evaluable secondary to coma, the computed tomographic scan was without abnormality, and the patient was moving all four extremities at arrival in the emergency department, the cervical spine was cleared, and spinal precautions were removed. Data were collected for all patients admitted to Santa Barbara Cottage Hospital trauma service between 1999 and 2002. The authors selected for analysis patients with blunt trauma and further identified those with closed head injuries (Glasgow Coma Scale score < 15 and loss of consciousness). In addition, all blunt cervical spine injuries were reviewed.During the period of study, 2,854 trauma patients were admitted, of whom 2,603 (91%) had blunt trauma. Of these, 1,462 (56%) had closed head injuries. One hundred patients (7% of patients admitted for blunt trauma) had cervical spine or spinal cord injuries, of which 99 were identified by the authors' protocol. Only one injury was not appreciated in a patient with syringomyelia. Fifteen percent of patients with spinal cord injury had no radiographic abnormality; all of these patients presented with neurologic deficits. The sensitivity for detecting cervical spine injury was thus 99%, and the specificity was 100%. The risk of missing a cervical spine injury in these blunt trauma patients was 0.04%. The authors missed no spine injuries in patients with head injuries.The use of the authors' protocol resulted in excellent sensitivity and specificity in detecting cervical spine injuries. In addition, it allowed early removal of spinal precautions.